<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88708-0027 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.7-08-88.f2.A1026</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"> <ITAG tagnum="52">40 CFR Parts 156 and 170 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. OPP-300164; FRL 3314-4] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Worker Protection Standards for Agricultural Pesticides </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY:</T2> Environmental Protection Agency (EPA). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION:</T2> Proposed rule.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY:</T2> EPA proposes to revise its regulations governing workerprotection from agricultural pesticides. These revisions would expand thescope of the standards to include not only workers performing hand laboroperations in fields treated with pesticides, but workers in forests, nurseries,and greenhouses, and workers who handle (mix, load, apply, etc.) pesticidesin these locations. The proposal would expand requirements for warningsabout applications, personal protective equipment, and reentry restrictions,and would add new provisions for decontamination, emergency medical duties,contact with handlers of highly toxic pesticides, cholinesterase monitoring,and training. EPA also proposes to revise its labeling regulations to requirestatements pertaining to general worker protection, reentry intervals,personal protective equipment, and posting of treated areas. EPA is concernedabout the adequacy of the present regulations to protect agricultural workersfrom occupational exposure to pesticides. The proposal is intended to provideinterim protection to workers until the pesticide reregisteration processcan be completed, without creating undue burdens on agricultural producers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE:</T2> Written comments, data, and other evidence concerning theproposal should be submitted on or before October 6, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES:</T2> Comments should be submitted in triplicate and addressedto the Document Control Officer (TS-757C), Program Management and SupportDivision, Office of Pesticide Programs, Environmental Protection Agency,Rm. 236, CM andplusmin;2, 1921 Jefferson Davis Highway, Arlington, VA 22202.All comments should bear the document control number OPP-300164 and willbe available for public inspection from 8:30 a.m. to 4 p.m., Monday throughFriday, at the OPP Document Control Office, Rm. 236, CM andplusmin;2, 1921Jefferson Davis Highway, Arlington, VA 22202. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> Dr. Patricia Breslin, Director,Pesticide Farm Safety Staff, Office of Pesticide Programs, EnvironmentalProtection Agency, Room 1009, CM andplusmin;2, 1921 Jefferson Davis Highway,Arlington, VA 22202, (703) 557-7666. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2> This <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice discusses the background and events leadingto this proposal, the new health and safety data and other concerns givingrise to the proposal, the rationale underlying its specific provisions,the relationship of the proposal to State regulations, implementation ofthe proposal, and the applicable statutory and regulatory review requirements.References are identified in the text by the author's last name and thereference number while full bibliographic information is found in the Referencessection near the end of this notice. Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto average 6.5 hours, including time for reviewing instructions, searchingexisting data sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed, and completingand reviewing the collection of information. Send comments regarding theburden estimate or any other aspect of this collection of information,including suggestions for reducing this burden, to Chief, Information PolicyBranch, PM-223, U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M. Street SW.,Washington, DC 20460; and to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs,Office of Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503. As an aid to the reader, the following is an outline of the contents ofthis notice:<ITAG tagnum="26">I. Background </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Statutory Authority </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Promulgation of 40 CFR Part 170 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Regulatory Negotiation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">II. Reasons for This Proposal </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Pesticide Poisoning Data </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Enforcement </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Registration and Reregistration </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">III. Proposed Worker Protection Standards </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Organization of Regulation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Applicability </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Definitions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Duties </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">E. Enforcement </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">F. Training and Information </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">G. Notification </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">H. Personal Protective Equipment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">I. Application and Reentry Restrictions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">J. Decontamination </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">K. Emergency Duties </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">L. Cholinesterase Monitoring </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">M. Juvenile Workers </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">IV. Proposed Labeling Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Background </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Proposed Approach </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Applicability </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Reference Statement </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">E. General Statements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">F. Reentry Statements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">G. Posting Statements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">H. Personal Protective Equipment Statements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">I. Implementation of Labeling Changes </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">V. Relationship to States </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VI. Implementation of Regulation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VII. Statutory Review </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. U.S. Department of Agriculture </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Congressional Committees </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. FIFRA Scientific Advisory Panel </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VIII. References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">IX. Regulatory Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Executive Order 12291 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Regulatory Flexibility Act </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Paperwork Reduction Act </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>A. Statutory Authority The Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (FIFRA) was originallyenacted in 1947 (7 U.S.C. 135 <T3>et seq.</T3>). Since that time, pesticide products have been subjectto Federal regulation under FIFRA and are required to be registered withEPA. In 1972, FIFRA was amended by the Federal Environmental PesticideControl Act (7 U.S.C. 136 <T3>et seq.</T3>). Among other things, the amendments broadened Federalpesticide regulatory authority by making it ``unlawful for any person touse any registered pesticide in a manner inconsistent with its labeling''(7 U.S.C. 136j(a)(2)(G)). The amendments provided civil and criminal penaltiesfor violations of the Act (7 U.S.C. 1361) and authorized the Administratorto provide regulations to carry out the Act (7 U.S.C. 136w(a)). The legislativehistory of the 1972 amendments indicates an expressed intent on the partof Congress that farmers, farm workers, and others be afforded protectionunder FIFRA. B. Promulgation of 40 CFR Part 170 In 1974, EPA promulgated the regulations found at 40 CFR Part 170 pursuantto its authority under FIFRA (7 U.S.C. 136w(a)). These regulations dealwith pesticide-related occupational safety and health of workers performinghand labor operations in fields during or after application of pesticides.They contain four basic requirements: (1) A prohibition against sprayingworkers; (2) specific reentry intervals for 12 pesticides and a generalreentry interval for all agricultural pesticides prohibiting reentry intotreated fields until the sprays had dried or dusts had settled; (3) a requirementfor protective clothing for any worker who had to reenter treated fieldsbefore the specific reentry period had expired; and (4) a requirement for``appropriate and timely'' warnings. Specifically exempted from coveragewere soil-incorporated pesticides, mosquito abatement treatments and relatedpublic pest control programs, greenhouse treatments, livestock and otheranimal treatments, and treatments of golf courses and similar nonagriculturalareas. EPA's authority to promulgate such requirements is well established.<T3>Organized Migrants in Community Action (OMICA) v. Brennan</T3>, 520F.2d 1161 (D.C. Cir. 1975). See also <T3>Public Citizen Health Research Group et al. v. Auchter</T3>, 702 F2d.1150 (D.C. Cir. 1983). In 1983, EPA issued PR Notice 83-2 requiring thebasic provisions of 40 CFR Part 170 to be placed on labels of ``all outdooragricultural use products which are applied to crops whose culture requireshand labor.'' C. Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking A review of 40 CFR Part 170 was conducted during 1983. The Agency concludedthat the current Part 170 was inadequate to protect workers occupationallyexposed to pesticides, and decided to revise the Part. EPA published anAdvance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (ANPRM) in 1984 (49 FR 32605 <T3>et seq.</T3>; August 15, 1984). The ANPRM noted that while ``the Agencyhas set additional reentry intervals for specific pesticide products throughthe registration and reregistration process,'' nevertheless ``a more comprehensiverevision of Part 170 is necessary'' (49 FR 32606). The ANPRM requested public comment on six specific issues: (1) Expansionof the scope of Part 170 to include other categories of workers, work activities,and pesticide uses; (2) revision of the reentry intervals; (3) revisionof the protective clothing provisions; (4) revisions of the requirementsfor warning workers; (5) imposition of other types of safety requirements;and (6) enforcement mechanisms. Almost all commenters agreed that Part 170 should be revised. As to possibleexpansion of the scope, the largest number of comments concerned expandingthe scope to include mixers, loaders, and applicators. The majority ofthese comments favored this expansion, citing the dangers involved withapplication-related tasks. Other comments discussed expanding coverageto include greenhouses, nurseries, and forests. Many commenters supported having more pesticides covered by reentry intervals,saying that the current intervals were not adequate. There was considerablesupport for the concept of generic reentry intervals as an interim measureuntil each pesticide product could be evaluated on its own. These commentersalso pointed out that (1) some products are already known to require longerintervals, (2) provisions should be made for increasing intervals as newdata warrant, and (3) individual reentry intervals for all specific pesticidesshould be established as soon as possible. A few commenters took the position that the current definition of protectiveclothing was adequate, at least for certain occupational groups. Some commentersstated that increased requirements would prove to be unnecessary and leadto discomfort in some situations, such as working in hot weather or enclosedspaces. Others said that all protective clothing requirements should bedetermined on a chemical-by-chemical basis and included on the label. Others,however, felt that protective clothing under the current definition ofPart 170 does not protect workers. Some proposed minimal additions to therequirements in order to avoid encumbering workers, especially hand harvesters;others suggested stronger requirements. There was support for requiring protective clothing for reentry beforethe expiration of the reentry interval, but the majority of comments statedthat the reentry interval should be made long enough to protect workersand that protective clothing should not be required after that time. Afew comments, however, favored continuing protective clothing requirementsbeyond the reentry interval. There was no consensus among the commenters about whether warning requirementsshould be strengthened and, if so, what stronger requirements should beimposed. A significant number of commenters supported keeping the existingrequirement, i.e., oral or posted warnings at treated areas. Some commenterswanted a requirement for only oral warnings, believing them to be mosteffective, at least in their occupational situation. Some thought bothoral and posted warnings should be required, and pointed out that treatedarea posting should not be considered a substitute for oral warnings. All commenters responding to the issue of bilingual warnings favored requiringthem where necessary. It was also suggested that accepted internationalsigns and symbols be added to posted warnings at treated areas. As to training, medical surveillance, and changing areas, several commentersexpressed opinions about the broad issue of whether Part 170 should includeany occupational safety and health provisions similar to those promulgatedby OSHA for other classifications of workers. There was confusion aboutwhether existing OSHA rules currently apply to agricultural workers. Afew comments stated that without these OSHA-type provisions, Part 170 wouldbe largely ineffective and unenforceable. One comment proposed that theapplicable OSHA regulations be included in Part 170, with the two agenciescooperating to enforce them. Several others, however, either urged cautionto ensure that EPA regulations will not duplicate or conflict with OSHA's,or totally opposed inclusion of any OSHA-type provision in Part 170. Several comments requested EPA to strengthen the enforceability of theworker safety regulations and stressed the need to ensure that all of theregulations are enforceable requirements. Some comments stated either thatthere is no evidence of inadequate enforcement of the existing regulation,or that their State laws are sufficient. Others, however, cited specificexamples of enforcement failures in their States, stemming from such causesas understaffing and the lack of bilingual enforcement officials. Most commenters agreed that the owner or lessee must have the primary legalresponsibility for compliance with worker safety regulations. Some wantedthe responsibility to extend to crew leaders, applicators, and/or fieldsupervisors. Comments were divided on the issue of whether chronic health effects shouldbe dealt with by Part 170. Some were opposed to reentry intervals, warnings,and other measures directed toward chronic effects, and said that chroniceffects should be considered on a case-by-case basis through the registration/reregistrationprocess. Another group of comments, however, stated that chronic effectsare likely to be the most serious threat to worker health and recommendedextending Part 170 to consider such effects in the setting of generic interimstandards. It was noted that the FIFRA requirements for protection of humansand the environment included both acute and chronic effects. Most commentsthat addressed this topic argued that chronic effects should be consideredwhen determining toxicity levels and when setting reentry intervals andprotective clothing requirements. D. Regulatory Negotiation In addition to the use of the ANPRM to encourage the widest possible publicparticipation, EPA initiated a process called ``regulatory negotiation''to develop this proposal. This process allows parties interested in oraffected by the outcome of the proposed rule an opportunity to participatein the rule's development through face-to-face negotiation. Parties withdifferent interests work to resolve issues by meeting, discussing factsand questions, and attempting to reach solutions. The Agency held an organizational meeting on October 9, 1985. After a preliminarydiscussion of issues, committee representation, subcommittees, operationalground rules, and other basic protocols, it was decided that an advisorycommittee should be established. EPA announced in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of October 18, 1985 (50 FR 42223) its intentto establish such a committee under the Federal Advisory Committee Act(Pub. L. 92-463). The Advisory Committee on Worker Protection Standardsfor Agricultural Pesticides held its first official meeting November 4,1985, in Arlington, Virginia. The initial meeting and all subsequent meetingsof the full Committee were announced in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> and were open to the general public.Representatives of the following parties were members of the Committee:1. American Association of Nurserymen.2. American Farm Bureau.3. American Seed Trade Association.4. Arizona Farm Workers Union.5. Association of Pesticide Control Officials.6. Association of State and Territorial Health Officials.7. California Rural Legal Assistance.8. East Coast Farm Worker Support Network.9. Farm Labor Organizing Committee-Florida.10. Farm Labor Organizing Committee-Ohio.11. National Agricultural Aviation Association.12. National Agricultural Chemicals Association.13. National Association of State Departments of Agriculture.14. National Cotton Council; National Association of Wheat Growers.15. National Council of Agricultural Employees.16. National Farm Workers Health Group (UFW).17. National Forest Products Association.18. Society of American Florists.19. State FIFRA Issues Research and Evaluation Group.20. Texas Department of Agriculture.21. United Farm Workers of America (AFL-CIO)_Texas.22. United Fruit and Vegetable Association.23. U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.24. U.S. Department of Agriculture.25. Florida Cooperative Extension Service.At the first full Committee meeting on November 4, 1985, the group adoptedoperating protocols and divided into five working groups (Reentry, Training,Medical Monitoring and Greenhouses, Protective Clothing, Notification),deferring a sixth group on enforcement issues to a later time.Initially, thirty-one major issues were identified and presented to theworking groups for deliberation. Several key issues overlapped workinggroups because of the interrelationship of the concerns. Discussions andrecommendations of the working groups were considered at plenary sessionsof the full Committee meetings, and working drafts of the proposed revisionswere prepared and distributed on January 21 and February 18, 1986.After the meeting on February 3 and 4, 1986, representatives from the ArizonaFarm Workers Union, the Farm Labor Organizing Committee, California RuralLegal Assistance, the East Coast Farm Worker Support Network, and the NationalFarm Workers Health Group (UFW) decided to discontinue participation inthe Regulatory Negotiation process. Meetings on March 6 and 7, 1986, andMay 5 and 6, 1986, were held in order to discuss drafts of the proposedrule and receive comments from the remaining members of the Advisory Committeeconcerning subsequent drafts of the regulatory language prepared by theAgency. However, a regulatory negotiation consensus could not be reachedwithout the full Committee's participation. All work on the regulationwas performed by EPA alone after June 10, 1986.Although a consensus on this rule was not achieved, Committee members representingthe broad interests affected by this proposal discussed issues and regulatorylanguage and helped shape the proposed regulation. EPA appreciates thecommitment made by each member of the Committee and firmly believes thatthe Committee's deliberations sharpened the issues and will enhance futurepublic discussions generated by this proposal.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Reasons for This Proposal</ITAG>Agency concern about the adequacy of the present Part 170 has grown overthe years for a number of reasons. New data on agricultural worker exposurethat have been developed and assessed demonstrate the need for more workerprotection features. The enforcement experiences of EPA and the Statesover the years have led the Agency to conclude that a clearer expositionof liability and responsibility provisions would lead to improved workerprotection. The Agency has determined that since the reregistration programwill not be completed for a number of pesticides within the near future,interim measures are necessary to adequately protect workers. EPA alsobelieves that protection should be provided to certain types of workersby expanding coverage to workers not covered by the present Part 170. Finally,since 1974 there has been greatly increase use of certain chemical classesof pesticides, primarily the organophosphates and carbamates, which containpesticides which are more acutely toxic to humans than previous pesticidesin common use in agriculture. The present Part 170, however, does not accountfor this shift in classes of agricultural pesticides used.A. Pesticide Poisoning DataPesticide illnesses in agricultural workers can result from excessive exposureto pesticides, which in turn can result from inadequate safety precautions.An estimated 2.3 million persons are exposed directly or indirectly toagricultural pesticide products or their residues as a result of occupationalactivities.Accurate estimates of pesticide poisonings among agricultural workers aredifficult to obtain for a variety of reasons: (1) The migratory natureof much of agricultural labor is an obstacle hampering collection of suchdata; (2) the geographic and seasonal heterogeneity of the population underscrutiny makes assessments of the number of workers at risk elusive; (3)many agricultural workers adversely affected by pesticides may not seekmedical attention from United States health care providers; and (4) pesticidepoisoning incidents often are treated symptomatically without being specificallydiagnosed as pesticide-related or reported as such. EPA contracted withResearch Triangle Institute (RTI) to review and analyze the 10 main sourcesof data relating to pesticide poisoning incidents in the United States.These sources are:1. The 1971-73 and 1974-76 National Studies of Hospital-Admitted PesticidePoisonings.2. Pesticide Incident Monitoring System (PIMS) Data.3. The Atlantic Coast Migrant Stream Pesticide Study.4. EPA Report 540/9-80-003 Chronic Neurological Sequelae of Acute OrganophosphatePesticide Poisoning: A Case-Control Study.5. Consumer Product Safety Commission Emergency Room Survey.6. California Reports on the Incidence of Pesticide Poisonings.7. Chemical Exposure Data from Bureau of Labor Statistics and Worker'sCompensation Programs in Oregon and Ohio.8. The Federal Government and the Incidence of Pesticide Poisonings: Surveyof Migrant and Rural Health Clinics.9. Washington: Occupational Mortality in Washington State.10. EPA Report, National Monitoring Study: Citrus.These reports indicate that there continue to be significant numbers ofpesticide poisonings among agricultural workers every year, and in somecases a trend toward increasing numbers of poisonings, (Stuart et al.,86). For example, RTI noted an increase of 35 percent in annual pesticidepoisonings in California between 1976 and 1983. RTI concluded that onlya small fraction of occupational poisonings are reported or even identified.Thus, all studies probably understate the problem, for various reasonswhich are fully discussed in the RTI reports.The Agency has also examined information on health effects in reentry situationsgathered since 1974 from various sources. At that time it appeared thatepisodes of reentry worker poisonings were limited to the harvesting oftree fruit in California soon after the application of organophosphatepesticides. However, subsequent reports of reentry worker poisoning andinjury episodes indicate that: (1) The problem exists throughout the country,although it appears to be greatest in California; (2) pesticides otherthan organophosphates can present significant hazards to workers; (3) residueson crops other than tree fruit can present significant hazards to workers;(4) tasks other than harvesting can present significant hazard to workers;and (5) activities taking place after the ``minimum'' reentry intervalcan present significant hazards to workers.A review of pesticide poisonings and injuries in California, reported byphysicians during the period from 1976-1985, shows 460 reported systemicpoisonings among field workers exposed to residues after application ofpesticides, and 1955 skin and eye injuries (Blondell, 8). The relativeinfrequency of reported reentry incidents does not reflect the degree ofconcern held by many occupational health specialists, who believe thatoccupationally related illnesses and injuries are underreported among theagricultural workforce. Only 7 States have mandatory reporting systems,while 16 other States have limited forms of data collection (McNeil, 57).Some workers are reluctant to seek medical attention, especially thoseof illegal or uncertain residency status and those not covered by workercompensation programs_only 16 States have mandatory worker compensationprograms for agricultural workers. Misdiagnosis also may be a problem:when large groups of workers are involved the pattern of illness oftensuggests food poisoning or water-borne gastroenteritis, and when smallgroups are involved, heatstroke is sometimes suggested (Quinby and Lemmon,79).The pesticide active ingredients involved in the reported California reentryincidents belong to all toxicity categories and many chemical classes (Blondell,8). The poisoning episodes include incidents occurring up to 5 weeks afterpesticide sprays have dried and dusts have settled. They also include incidentsinvolving non-harvesting tasks. For example, workers thinning and detasselingseed corn have experienced severe dermatitis and symptoms of cholinesterasepoisoning after application of carbofuran, and workers have experiencedconjunctivitis while pruning grapes on the same day as application of elementalsulfur.Large doses of acutely toxic pesticides may lead to death, but reentryworkers are extremely unlikely to accumulate such doses as a result ofexposure to residues. Rather, the Agency is concerned with the potentiallydebilitating effects of repeated exposures of reentry workers to lowerlevels of pesticides from field residues and the added burden of medicalexpenses and loss of income during illnesses that may result (Gunther etal., 33).In addition to the effects of acutely toxic pesticides on reentry workers,the Agency is concerned about the chronic, subchronic, and cumulative effectsof repeated low-level exposures to pesticides. A single exposure periodmight not trigger a poisoning incident, whereas repeated exposures on afrequent or regular basis may lead to an acute poisoning (e.g., cumulativecholinesterase inhibition) or to chronic or subchronic effects such ascancer.B. Enforcement A major impetus for revision of Part 170 is the problem of enforceabilityof its provisions. The Agency has identified four major enforcement concerns.1. <T3>Part 170 and pesticide labeling. </T3>When the present Part 170 wasdeveloped and promulgated, little attention was given to the incorporationof its requirements on pesticide labeling, necessary for enforcement ofviolations under FIFRA section 12(a)(2)(G). The Agency believes that closeattention should be given to this matter, to ensure user understandingof and compliance with the regulations as well as enforceability underFIFRA in the event of noncompliance. 2. <T3>Assigning responsibility. </T3>EPA believes that the present Part 170needs to be improved by more clearly stating which persons have duties,and by broadening the group of persons who have duties. Complex arrangementshave developed among owners, operators, lessees, commercial applicators,labor contractors, supervisors, and crew leaders for managing agriculturalestablishments and farm worker activities. The current regulations establishduties only for ``owners'' and ``lessees'' and do not define these terms.Many persons who are not owners or lessees are in positions to improvefarm worker safety by taking care to use pesticides properly and by takingsteps to see that workers under their supervision receive the necessaryprotections. In one enforcement case, a commercial aerial applicator whonegligently sprayed a crew of workers could not be cited for violationof Part 170, since the applicator had no responsibility for farm workerprotection under the present Part 170. Likewise, a labor contractor whoorders a crew into an area under a reentry interval likely could not becharged with violating the current Part 170. 3. <T3>Recordkeeping. </T3>The present Part 170 lacks any requirement forkeeping of records by responsible persons, which increases the difficultyof proving noncompliance. Monitoring of compliance with Part 170 dutieswould in most cases be facilitated by written documentation of requiredmeasures and actions. Records can provide both proof of compliance andevidence of noncompliance. However, recordkeeping may impose a significanteconomic burden on responsible parties. Any recordkeeping requirement mustbe closely assessed for need and expected benefits relative to cost. Inaddition, FIFRA section 11 prohibits the Agency from issuing regulationsrequiring private applicators to keep any records. Any general recordkeepingrequirement would be subject to this exemption and its efficacy would belimited. 4. <T3>Clarity and specificity. </T3>The wording of certain requirements inthe present Part 170 leaves room for broad interpretation due to lack ofspecificity. Under these circumstances, enforcement is difficult for theAgency and potentially unfair to those with Part 170 duties. One exampleis the requirement for ``appropriate and timely'' warnings (andSection;170.5).Such vague language may contribute to noncompliance because the user maynot be able to determine what to do to comply with the requirements. Carefuldrafting can assure clarity of language and achievement of intended regulatorypurpose. C. Registration and Reregistration EPA has found that with present resources, only 20 to 30 Registration Standardsfor active ingredients can be completed each year. Currently there areseveral hundred standards for active ingredients used in agriculture yetto be completed. Even if the Agency is able to accelerate the reregistrationeffort, the individual review and reregistration of agricultural pesticidesmay not be completed until early in the 21st century. Some kinds of requirements, such as reentry intervals and personal protectiveequipment, ideally should be tailored to individual products in a reregistrationprocess. Revising Part 170 and implementing it through label changes will,however, provide workers better interim protection until each active ingredientreceives closer scrutiny during reregistration. Other requirements aregeneric to all agricultural pesticides and, for these, rulemaking is clearlyan efficient approach to regulation. This approach would also be fairerto registrants and users (restrictions on use would be implemented simultaneouslyfor all products). <ITAG tagnum="84">III. Proposed Worker Protection Standards </ITAG>A. Organization of Regulation This proposal is divided between two Parts. Proposed Part 170 containsdetailed provisions designed to protect pesticide handlers and other personswho work on farms, forests, nurseries and greenhouses. This Part is dividedinto six subparts. Subpart A contains the general provisions, definitionsand duties applicable to all types of workers. Subpart B contains provisionsfor pesticide handlers and early reentry workers working on farms, forests,nurseries and greenhouses. Subpart C contains provisions common to allworkers on farms, forests, nurseries and greenhouses. Subpart D containsspecial provisions for workers on farms and forests. Subpart E containsspecial provisions for workers in nurseries. Subpart F contains specialprovisions for workers in greenhouses. Within Subparts B through F, regulatoryprovisions appear in the order of the chronological occurrence of activitiesassociated with the use of pesticides, e.g., training, then notification,then reentry.Proposed Part 156, Subpart K, addresses the labeling requirements withwhich registrants must comply. Persons who use products labeled in accordancewith this Subpart must comply with the labeling statements. Subpart K isstructured first to provide the more general statements required on labeling,followed by specific required statements for reentry, posting and personalprotective equipment. B. Applicability In 1974, EPA limited the scope of Part 170 to farm workers engaged in handlabor in fields during and after pesticide application (andSection;170.1).The current Part 170 explicitly does not apply to (1) soil-incorporationof pesticides, (2) mosquito abatement treatments and related public pestcontrol programs, (3) greenhouse treatments, (4) livestock and other animaltreatments, (5) treatment of golf courses and similar nonagricultural areas,and (6) activities other than hand labor tasks, including pesticide handling(andSection;170.4(c)). The applicability of Part 170 to nurseries and forestsis unclear. After a careful review of these exclusions, EPA believes thatcertain revisions to the applicability of Part 170 are warranted. 1. <T3>Pesticide Use Sites </T3>(andSection;170.3(c)). In addition to farms,the Agency has examined 4 specific application sites for possible inclusionin this Part_greenhouses, nurseries, forests, and small farms. The Agency proposes to discontinue the exclusion for greenhouses. It isestimated that there are between 11,000 and 15,000 commercial greenhouseoperations in the United States, with an average size of 1 acre, employingan estimated 175,000 workers. Use of pesticides in these greenhouses involvesmany of the same hazards as those encountered in outdoor field conditions.In addition, greenhouse applications can present hazards for workers greaterthan those found outdoors. For example, due to lack of wind, pesticidesmay dissipate more slowly in confined areas than in open fields. Also,reentry into enclosed areas following fumigation can result in a much greaterinhalation hazard because the concentration of airborne residues may beextremely high. The Agency also proposes to explicitly include nurseries within the scopeof this Part. Nurseries employ an estimated 125,000 workers. They varyin size and types of agricultural activities they perform. Some nurseriesare very much like farm in that they grow plants outdoors in the ground.Many different trees, flowers, shrubs, and vegetable- and fruit-bearingplants are cultivated. Other nurseries are much like greenhouses sincethey grow plants on benches, although the benches are not in an enclosedstructure. Many nurseries conduct both farm-like and greenhouse-like activities.The Agency proposes to specifically include forest areas used for the commercialproduction of wood fiber and timber products within the scope of this regulation.While pesticide use in the commercial management of forests is similarto pesticide use in traditional agricultural settings, including seasonallabor and high-intensity crop management practices involving pesticides,the use of pesticides in forest areas intended primarily for recreation,such as parks and picnic areas, is essentially dissimilar to use in agriculturalsettings. Moreover, requirements for reentry intervals and worker notificationin such public areas would be impractical. Thus, the Agency proposes toinclude only areas being used commercially. The Agency has received comments that the use of pesticides in forestryis less extensive than in traditional row crop agriculture, and that differentpesticide use practices are employed. The Agency seeks comment on whetherthe proposed standards may be inapplicable or only partially applicableto commercial forestry. The Agency has carefully considered the need for and impact of this proposalon small agricultural establishments which use pesticides. The Agency believesthat the practices described in these standards should be employed on anyfarm, forest, nursery or greenhouse where pesticides are used, becausethe risks of adverse effects are similar among establishments without regardto the size of the establishment, both in terms of the degree of risk toindividual workers and in terms of the total number of workers at risk.As a practical matter, most agricultural establishments are small businesses.While accurate estimates of size and distribution of agricultural laborare difficult to substantiate, the Agency estimates that 89% of establishmentswhich have hired labor have less than 10 workers. On the other hand, thesesmaller establishments (less than 10 workers) employ only an estimated64% of all agricultural workers. These estimates agree with the regulatoryimpact analysis recently performed by OSHA for the Field Sanitation Standard(DOL, 113). Thus, many small businesses would be affected by this proposal. A numberof the proposed requirements are designed to allow flexibility of compliancemethod so long as the intent of the requirement is met (performance-typestandards). This approach would serve to limit costs for all affected entities,including smaller entities which have limited resources for compliance.However, some of the costs associated with the proposed requirements arefixed (per establishment) capital costs, which would be more burdensomeon smaller establishments. The Agency has identified as fixed the costsof posting the basic safety information at a central location, postingwarning signs in fields (in part), decontamination water containers (onlyfor establishments without accessible running water), and responding tomedical emergencies (in part). All other costs are incurred on a per workerbasis, and would not impact small agricultural entities in any disproportionatelyadverse way with respect to agribusiness as a whole. The Agency is aware that OSHA has exempted farms where 10 or fewer workersare employed in hand labor activities on a given day from its Field SanitationStandard (29 CFR 1910.110)(a)). OSHA stated at the time that it did sobecause an annual amendment to the House Appropriations Bill prohibitedOSHA from regulating farms with fewer than 11 employees (DOL, 113). Inaddition, Texas has exempted small farms from its 1987 Agricultural HazardCommunication Act (governing worker right-to-know for agricultural pesticides)using different criteria: the Act does not apply to farms with less thana certain gross annual payroll. EPA has not been subject to this type ofregulatory limitation by Congress, either through its appropriations orthrough FIFRA, nor has the Agency previously implemented an exemption frompesticide use restrictions for small agricultural establishments throughlabeling provisions. The Agency has also considered the relationship between the applicabilityof this proposal to small agricultural establishments and its enforcementpolicy in this sector. The Agency does not believe that routine inspectionsby federal or State enforcement authorities on small agricultural establishmentswould be cost-effective with regard to these proposed standards. As a matterof policy, the Agency does not plan to carry out a program of routine inspectionsfor the purpose of determining compliance with this rule on such smallagricultural establishments, or to require the States to do so as a conditionof cooperative enforcement agreements. Most States, however, have primaryresponsibility for use enforcement and may establish their own compliancepolicies. If on the other hand EPA or a State had reason to believe thatsignificant infractions were occurring on a particulr small establishment,the Agency and/or the State would inspect and, if appropriate, take enforcementaction. The Agency believes this proposal policy is in keeping with thegeneral approach of OSHA in enforcement of all its agricultural workerprotection standards other than the Field Sanitation Standard, with theCongressional guidance to OSHA is the area of which the Agency is aware,and with EPA's current enforcement priorities and resources.The Agency believes that Part 170 should govern work performed under typicalemployment or contractual relationships, and should not intrude into familyrelationships even if the latter may in some cases have business aspects.The Agency therefore proposes to exclude from the Part's coverage thosesmall agricultural establishments where all work related to the productionof agricultural plants is performed by the owner and the owner's immediatefamily, as defined, even if family members receive some form of compensation.Also, immediate family members are not included in the definition of ``worker''or ``handler'' and are therefore excluded from coverage by this Part, evenif covered workers are also employed on the same establishment and mustreceive the required protections. However, all pesticide users, includingfamily members, must comply with instructions on pesticide labeling. Inparticular, family members must comply with personal protective equipmentand reentry interval requirements, which will specifically appear on pesticidelabeling (andSection; 170.3(d)).The Agency has considered whether an OSHA-type exemption for smaller establishments(using either the same or a different number of workers to define establishmentsize); a Texas-type exemption for smaller establishments (using gross annualpayroll to define establishment size); some other type of exemption (e.g.an exemption for smaller establishments, using one of the above size definitions,from some but not all of the proposed requirements, for example those involvingfixed costs); or no exemption for smaller establishments, would be appropriateto this proposal. Comment is solicited on the issues discussed above andany others regarding the need for and impacts of this proposal on smallagricultural establishments, including whether any specific threshold ofestablishment size, in terms of number of workers or size of payroll, isappropriate, and for which requirements this would be appropriate.2. <T3>Worker activities.</T3> The scope of this Part was also reviewed interms of work activities to be addressed. The existing Part 170 is directedexclusively to workers performing hand labor tasks in reentry situations.However, agricultural workers may also be exposed to pesticides and pesticideresidues while mixing, loading, transferring, applying, or disposing ofpesticides, transporting pesticides in open or previously opened containers,acting as flaggers, and cleaning, adjusting, or repairing contaminatedparts of mixing, loading, or application equipment. A large number of existingpesticide labels do not adequately specify personal protective equipmentor other safe work practices for these pesticide handlers, and there islittle consistency among labels that do have requirements. Therefore, theAgency proposes to expand Part 170 to include agricultural pesticide handlingactivities. The Agency believes there are sufficient data on many aspectsof pesticide handler exposure at these sites to support worker protectionstandards for this category of worker; the rationale for the particularhandler standards proposed is discussed later in this preamble.In considering what standards would be appropriate to protect workers duringhandling activities on agricultural sites, the Agency also considered whetherit would be appropriate to apply such standards to workers at nonagriculturalsites where pesticides may be occupationally handled. Nonagricultural sitesinclude some that could be viewed as similar to agricultural sites, suchas pasture and rangeland, rights-of-way, turf management (golf courses,home lawn care), ornamental tree and shrub management (grounds-keeping),and aquatic sites. Nonagricultural sites also include categories of usagesuch as household and institutional indoor treatments (structural, crackand crevice, fumigation), public health, demonstration and research, andfood handling, and miscellaneous other occupational uses of pesticides.The Agency considered four alternatives with respect to inclusion of nonagriculturalpesticide handling within the scope of the proposed Subpart B standards:(1) Limit coverage to handling activities at agricultural sites; (2) includehandling activities on other sites that are similar to agricultural sites;(3) include handling activities on all sites performed by fulltime, commercialhandlers; and (4) include all occupational handling activities on all sites.The handler standards in this proposal_training, personal protective equipment,access to labeling, decontamination water, and cholinesterase monitoring,found in Subpart B_present a generic scheme of protection for persons whomix, load, and apply concentrated or diluted pesticides. In general, handlingactivities at nonagricultural sites resemble one or another of the handlingtechniques used in agriculture; consequently, exposure scenarios and riskswould be expected to be similar. For example, boom applications along highwayrights-of-way resemble such applications in crop fields, and many methodsof home fumigation by pest control operators approximate fumigation methodsused in greenhouses. On the other hand, many differences can be discernedin the nature and degree of reentry-type exposures that may follow suchapplications. For this reason the Agency has only considered includingnonagricultural handlers (as opposed to other workers) within the scopeof this option.The Agency recognizes that the extent of pesticide handling by particularindividuals at any use site may vary. Some persons may handle pesticideson an essentially full-time basis, for instance commercial aerial applicatorsor pest control operators, while others may handle pesticides only occasionally.In general, the more extensive handling activities create greater exposurerisks and more need for the protections afforded by these standards. Theoption of covering only full-time nonagricultural handlers of pesticideswas therefore considered. One difficulty, however, would be defining theextent of handling that would qualify as ``full-time'' in a manner thatdid not appear arbitrary. A similar problem of nonarbitrary definitionarises with respect to identification of use sites that are sufficientlysimilar to agricultural sites to justify application of these rules tothose sites.The economic impact of including nonagricultural pesticide handlers isdifficult to predict, and has not been estimated for purposes of the RegulatoryImpact Analysis. In addition to private costs, some impact on State certificationand training programs can be anticipated from the extension of trainingrequirements to additional pesticide handlers.At this time the Agency proposes to limit coverage to agricultural handling.However, EPA invites comment on the four options enumerated above, andwishes to emphasize that the final rule may provide for extended coverageof nonagricultural sites.3. <T3>Other pesticide uses</T3> (andSection; 170.3(b)). The Agency reviewedthe exclusions for certain uses of pesticides found in the current Part170 and considered the explicit inclusion or exclusion of certain otheruses of pesticides which may result in worker exposure.The Agency proposes to discontinue the exclusion for soil-incorporatedapplications. Soil incorporation involves either injecting pesticides intothe soil or covering them with a layer of soil. These applications mayavoid the foliar exposure hazards for workers, but the Agency is concernedabout workers who are performing tasks which require direct soil contactsuch as weeding, suckering, and cultivating, and about workers who mayencounter inhalation hazards from volatile soil-incorporated chemicals.The Agency proposes to continue to exempt livestock and other animal treatments,public mosquito abatement and similar public pest control programs, anduses on golf courses and similar nonagricultural turf areas. Animal treatmentsinvolve exposure situations that are dissimilar from other forms of agricultureand therefore tend to require case-by-case regulation through product labels.Other uses proposed for exemption are outside the traditional definitionof agriculture.The Agency proposes to exclude pesticide use on agricultural plants thatare noncommercial in nature, such as treatments in malls, atriums and officebuildings and uses in and around homes, e.g., on lawns and in home gardensand greenhouses. Such uses do not lead to exposure of agricultural workersas ordinarily defined.The Agency proposes to exclude uses where pesticides are injected directlyinto agricultural plants. Since these pesticides are not broadcast overan area but are confined to the interior of the plant, there is no anticipatedexposure to workers reentering the area to perform hand labor or othertasks. ``Hack and squirt,'' ``frill and spray'' and other such applicationtechniques that do not result in actual injection into the plant are notcovered by this exclusion because the Agency considers that workers andapplicators can receive significant exposure when these techniques areused (Lavy, 47).The Agency proposes to exclude pesticide uses on agricultural establishmentswhich are not directly related to the production of agricultural plants.Such uses may include structural pest control, control of vegetation alongrights-of-way and in other noncrop areas, control of vertebrate pests,and the use of attractants and repellents in containers. Such uses do notpose hazards to workers during agricultural production-related activities.Pest control after harvest includes fumigation of grain and other commodities,treatments to mitigate disease introduction and spread on vulnerable commoditiessuch as fruits and some vegetables, and postharvest insect and mite controlon crops during storage, packing, and shipping. The risks involved in fumigationof grain and other commodities are substantially different from the risksassociated with the pesticide uses included in the scope of this regulation.These pesticide uses warrant separate attention as to protective requirementsfor pesticide handlers. On the other hand, postharvest uses of pesticideson the portion of the agricultural plant which remains at the productionsite after harvest are included in the scope of the proposed Part 170.These uses include postharvest applications for insect, mite, disease,and weed pests to reduce any carryover to the next crop, soil sterilizationin nurseries and greenhouses, and pesticide applications to trees and otherperennial plants to maintain those plants during the nonproductive portionsof the cycle.The Agency proposes to exclude pesticide uses for the purpose of researchon the properties and effects of the pesticides. The Agency believes thatresearchers will be familiar with pesticide practices and hazards and willtherefore be able to ensure safe pesticide practices, since they will beconducting research on pesticides themselves. However, such research willonly be exempt from the requirements of this Part if all pesticide handlingand other tasks associated with the research involving potential exposureto pesticides are performed by the researchers or by persons under theirdirect supervision. This proposal would not exclude research taking placeon agricultural sites where the emphasis of the research is primarily onthe various aspects of production of the agricultural plants or on theproperties of the plants themselves, and where the use of pesticides duringthe research is incidental to the experiment.C. DefinitionsThe proposed regulation contains a number of definitions (andSection; 170.5).Those discussed here are ones that merit further explanation.<T3>Chemical-resistant.</T3> The terms ``chemical-resistant,'' ``impervious,''``impermeable,'' ``nonporous,'' ``liquidproof,'' ``water-resistant,'' and``waterproof'' all have been used on pesticide product labeling and inapplicator training manuals for describing the type of glove, boot, hat,hood, or apron material that is desirable for pesticide protection. TheChemical Manufacturers Association's ad hoc work group on standard phraseologyhas recommended the term ``chemical-resistant,'' now used by numerous Governmentagencies, chemical companies, industrial groups, and trade associations(CMA, 13). The American Society for Testing Materials also uses the term``resistance'' to describe the necessary level of performance of protectiveclothing materials against penetration by liquids (ASTM, 5). The Agencyagrees that adopting a universal term would be appropriate and useful.<T3>Forest.</T3> This term does not include trees and associated vegetationused solely for parks, recreation, or wilderness preservation. However,any part of a forest that is managed for commercial use as well as forrecreational use would be subject to this regulation to the extent of suchcommercial use. The term includes forests owned and managed by the Federalgovernment and other governmental entities, but does not include forestnurseries, which are treated as nurseries for purposes of this regulation.<T3>Handler.</T3> This term covers those workers who may have direct contactwith concentrated or dilute pesticides during the enumerated work activities.Workers exposed to residues of pesticides while performing tasks in previouslytreated areas are not considered to be handling pesticides.<T3>Nursery.</T3> For purposes of this Part, nurseries are distinguishedfrom farms by the subsequent use of the agricultural plant in its entiretyin another location, and distinguished from greenhouses by the lack ofa nonporous enclosure around production areas, although there may be asemi-enclosed area of a nursery, such as a shadehouse.<T3>Owner.</T3> This term is intended to include any person who has thelegal right to exclude entry to or eject persons from a farm, forest, nursery,or greenhouse. The term includes any fee owner of land on which the productionof agricultural plans takes place, as well as any lessee of such land,but does not include any lessor of such land who retains no possessoryinterest. The term includes both sole and joint owners and lessees.<T3>Personal protective equipment.</T3> This term is being adopted by theAgency in the place of other similar terms used in the past such as ``protectiveclothing'' or ``protective clothing and equipment.'' The phrase encompassesall clothing and equipment which is worn over, in place of, or in additionto normal work attire for the express purpose of protecting the wearerfrom pesticide exposure.<T3>Worker.</T3> The term includes persons employed for any type of compensation,e.g., wage, salary, commission, sharecrop arrangement, piece work rate,or as part of an exchange of services. As discussed in Section IV.B.1 ofthis Preamble, the Agency does not intend the proposed rule to regulateto protect the immediate family of the owner of a farm, forest, nurseryor greenhouse. Therefore, any person having any of the specified familialrelationships with an owner is not considered to be a ``worker'' for purposesof this Part, even though the person might receive some form of compensationfor work performed. The Agency has adopted the definition of immediatefamily found in the Migrant and Seasonal Agricultural Worker ProtectionAct (MSPA) and the Department of Labor regulations promulgated under MSPA(29 CFR Part 500) for this purpose.D. DutiesThe Agency believes that the clear identification and assignment of responsibilityfor implementing these standards will be extremely critical to the successfulimplementation of this proposal. Proposed andSection; 170.7 attempts to meetthe following goals: (1) Ease of understanding by persons who have duties;(2) a clear basis for enforcement action by the Agency and the States ifduties are not performed; (3) fairness with respect to enforcement; and(4) consistency with Federal laws and regulations and applicable case law.EPA considered a broad range of possible approaches to responsibility beforedeciding upon this proposed approach. Initially, EPA examined the relationshipof the owner of the property to the activities which take place upon theproperty, including general State-law concepts of an owner's responsibility.EPA considered the relationship of owners (including absentee owners),lessees, and operators of property to activities occurring on their landin terms of their exercise or position of control over, their economicinterest in, and their proximity to such activities. Furthermore, the Agencyconsidered the relationships of others, including applicators, contractors,supervisors, other employees, and family members, to activities occurringon and off the property.While specificity in assignment of duties is in general desirable, therequirements of this Part will typically be undertaken by a range of persons.Duties of pesticide users are therefore expressed in terms of general responsibilityprovisions applicable to classes of persons. Under the proposal, the Agencyhas assigned responsibilities to the following major classes of pesticideusers involved in the production of agricultural plants on agriculturalestablishments: owners of agricultural establishments, supervisors of workers,workers, persons who contract with owners, and employers of commercialpesticide handlers. If activities of persons in these classes of responsibleparties constitute use of a pesticide as defined in the regulation, thesepersons would be subject to enforcement action for any violation of thisPart. In addition, responsibility for the acts of others may be imputedto such persons, depending on the situation, under FIFRA's vicarious liabilityprovision found in section 14(b)(4). Each pesticide user is responsiblefor meeting certain requirements because of his or her activities, status,or the actions of others involved in the chain of responsibility.1. <T3>Duties of owners. </T3>The owner of a farm, forest, nursery or greenhousecovered by Part 170 is one person who will virtually always be consideredresponsible for seeing that the Part's requirements are followed. Withonly one exception (discussed below), the owner has primary and continuousresponsibility for compliance with the requirements of Part 170 governingactivities that occur on the property.The term ``owner'' is defined in this Part to include not only an ownerin fee simple of agricultural property but also a lessee of such propertywith a current possessory interest. The term excludes a lessor of suchproperty who has no current possessory interest. The broad responsibilityof an owner under this proposal is based on the legal control that theowner possesses over activities that occur on the property. The Agencyconsidered whether the person in charge of the day-to-day management ofthe property (operator) should be ultimately responsible for compliancewith this Part, rather than the owner. The operator often is the owner;however, where the operator is not the owner, the operator is usually theagent or employee of an owner or lessee and receives direction from suchperson as to management of the property, including directions on employeerelations and safety. The Agency believes that operators who are not ownersor lessees are in actuality senior supervisors and should be viewed asagents of the owner or lessee, who retains ultimate responsibility.Section 170.7(a) identifies the general duties of the owner_to assure thatpesticides are used on the property in accordance with their labeling andwith all applicable requirements of this Part, and to assure that all workers,including handlers and supervisors, are protected from pesticide exposurein accordance with this Part. To accomplish this end, the owner, in personor through agents, employees, or contractors, is specifically requiredto give any necessary information and directions to workers and supervisorsconcerning pesticide use and safety. This includes notifying workers andsupervisors that certain actions are required by law and that violationsby workers and supervisors may subject them to enforcement action. It alsoincludes requiring supervisors to assure compliance by workers and to assurethat Part 170 projections have been provided.Workers on the property whose protection must be assured by the owner includenot only employees of the owner but workers under contract_for example,those who have contracted (or whose employer has contracted) to apply pesticidesor perform fieldwork. An owner under this proposal may hire contractorsto take steps required by this regulation; however, he may not escape liabilityfor failure of such contractors to meet the requirements of this Part ifthe violation occurs on his property.2. <T3>Duties of supervisors. </T3>Persons who supervise work on agriculturalestablishments are generally in the best position to be aware of pesticidehazards and to prevent worker exposure. This proposal imposes duties onsuch persons parallel to those imposed on owners, but limited to the scopeof their supervisory responsibility (andSection; 170.7(b)). Supervisors arerequired to comply with all directions they receive from owners and moresenior supervisors (andSection; 170.79b)(1)), assure that workers under theirsupervision receive all protections afforded them by this Part (andSection;170.7(b)(2)), and assure that pesticides used by them or under their supervisionare used in accordance with the product labeling and this Part (andSection;170.7(b)(3)). Persons who employ workers and contract with owners or theiragents to provide the services of these workers on an agricultural establishment(labor contractors) stand in a supervisory position toward the workersand are treated by this Part as supervisors, responsible to the same extentas supervisors directly employed by the owner (foremen).3. <T3>Duties of workers. </T3>In order to protect agricultural workers fromexposure to pesticides, workers themselves must perform or refrain fromcertain activities for their own protection and the protection of others.For example, a handler who misapplies a pesticide may expose field workersto direct spray or drift, and a worker instructed to inspect a respiratoror put up a warning sign who fails to do so may put other workers at riskof poisoning. The Agency therefore proposes that workers be required toassume responsibility for conforming their actions to the requirementsof this Part, and be subject to enforcement action for violation (andSection;170.7(b)).To ensure that workers have knowledge of their duties under this Part,they must be informed by their supervisors of the existence of this Partand the types of actions it requires of them. 4. <T3>Duties of contractors. </T3>This Part imposes responsibility upon anyapplicator contractor, labor contractor, or other type of contractor, aswell as any worker, handler, or supervisor employed by such contractor,who supervises or performs any work related to the production of agriculturalplants on a farm, forest, nursery or greenhouse. Such persons will in generalbe ``acting for'' the owner of the property or his agent within the meaningof FIFRA section 14(b)(4). Their duties are those of supervisors and workersin general (andSection;170.7(b)), with the exception of employers of commercialpesticide handlers, who have additional specific duties under andSection;170.22related to cholinesterase monitoring. There may be instances in which the employment agreements engaging thework of such contractors do not specifically refer to Part 170 responsibilities.The Agency does not consider absence of such a contractual provision tobe grounds for defense by a contractor to an enforcement action based upona violation of Part 170 requirements pertaining to any service which heor his employee was engaged to provide. 5. <T3>Prohibited actions. </T3>Under this proposal, no owner, employer orsupervisor may allow or direct a worker to violate this Part or take anyaction intended to prevent or discourage any worker from complying or attemptingto comply with this Part (andSection;170.7(c)). This section is necessaryto protect workers from direct interference with compliance, tacit encouragementof noncompliance, and reprisals due to worker insistence on compliance.Retaliation against workers in the form of threats of dismissal, actualdismissal, on-the-job discrimination or discipline, or other adverse employmentactions based on compliance or attempted compliance would constitute aviolation of this Part and be subject to enforcement action. With suchprotection, workers will be more likely to insist that these requirementsbe met, increasing both actual compliance and the Agency's ability to identifyand enforce against situations of noncompliance. It should be noted, however,that this section is not intended to create a civil cause of action forany worker or to change any existing common law remedy. Retaliatory dismissals must be distinguished from dismissals and otheradverse employment actions against noncomplying workers. This Part doesnot prohibit an owner, employer or supervisor from discharging or otherwisedisciplining any worker for failure to comply with any requirement of thisPart (andSection;170.7(c)). An owner, employer or supervisor can take stepsto avoid or limit further liability by excluding workers from activitiesin which they fail to or refuse to comply with applicable worker protectionrequirements, including, if necessary dismissal. E. Enforcement 1. <T3>Use of a pesticide. </T3>As relates to requirements such as those includedin this proposal, enforcement under FIFRA is dependent upon language whichappears on the label or labeling of pesticide products. FIFRA section 12(a)(2)(G)makes it unlawful to use a registered pesticide in a manner inconsistentwith its labeling. These proposed revisions would require the placementof specific use instructions and references to Part 170 on the label (Part156, Subpart K). By specific inclusion of certain Part 170 requirementsand incorporation by reference of the remainder of Part 170, the requirementsof this regulation would become an enforceable part of the labeling, andthus failure to comply with such requirements would be a violation of FIFRAsection 12(a)(2)(G) as a use inconsistent with the label. The regulation incorporates a definition of ``use'' which covers numerousactivities in addition to application of pesticides, all of which the Agencyhas determined are necessary steps to assure the safe use of pesticidesand the prevention of unreasonable adverse effects on workers (andSection;170.9(a)).These activities occur prior to application, during application, and afterapplication. This definition of ``use'' includes, but is not limited to,application, allowing or arranging for application, making necessary preparationsfor application, supervising application, and taking any required post-applicationactions. This interpretation of ``use'' is not new in pesticide regulation. In theareas of pre-harvest intervals and rotational cropping restrictions, pesticidelabels routinely require persons to take actions (or abstain from certainactivities) for long periods following pesticide application (<T3>See </T3>40 CFR 162.10(i)(2)(x)). Under FIFRA section 2(q)(1) (F) and(G), pesticide labeling must include ``directions for use'', ``warnings''and ``caution statements'' which are ``adequate to protect health.'' 2. <T3>Joint responsibility. </T3>In considering approaches to liability forviolation of the requirements of this Part the Agency considered to whatextent liability should be assigned when several potentially responsiblepersons are involved in the violation.The Agency proposal is based on the idea that more than one person maybe legally chargeable with the same offense. The liability scheme involveseach person in the chain of management beginning with, for example, theperson who is employed by an owner and who is directed to take an actionto comply with this Part, including any supervisors involved in directingthat employee's actions or allowing such employee to violate this Part,and ending with the owner of the agricultural establishment on which theviolation took place. Under this approach, as an illustration, a failureto comply with a requirement of this Part by a hired applicator contractoroccurring on the property of the owner may result in liability for a numberof persons, including but not limited to, the applicator contractor, theowner, any persons employed to take actions involved in the violation whetheremployed by the applicator contractor or the owner, and any supervisorypersonnel involved in the activities. The Agency believes this liabilityscheme provides incentives for persons to hire employees and engage contractorswho are careful and conscientious and who are likely to comply with therequirements of this Part.This approach to liability (andSection; 170.9(c)) is consistent with thestatutory provision on vicarious liability which appears in FIFRA section14(b)(4). The proposed approach is also consistent with the one case ofwhich the Agency is aware in this area, <T3>United States v. Corbin Farm Service </T3>(444 F.Supp. 510 (1978)).This case involved alleged misuse of a pesticide resulting in the deathof waterfowl. Defendants in the case included a pesticide dealer, an employeeof the pesticide dealer (a pesticide advisor), the owner of the treatedfields, and an aerial applicator. While the case did not involve farm workerprotection issues, it illustrates the broad view of liability which thecourt was willing to take through construction of the term ``acting foror employed by'' in FIFRA section 14.3. <T3>Contractor violations off the property. </T3>The Agency is concernedabout instances in which an owner might hire a contractor to perform certainservices on the property and thereby attempt to avoid, by contract, responsibilitiesassigned to the owner by this regulation. EPA proposes that such transferof responsibilities should not be allowed to occur, except under the followingcircumstances.Under the proposal, an owner who contracts with a commercial pesticidehandler contractor, labor contractor, or other contractor to perform anyactions which give rise to the need to comply with requirements of thisPart would not be subject to an enforcement action for any failure by suchcontractor to meet such requirements solely on account of actions by thecontractors which occur off the property of the owner (andSection; 170.9(d)).Although activities occurring off of the owner's property relate to applicationswhich occur on the owner's property, these ``off-property'' actions areoutside of the control of the owner. The persons in the best position toassure that the requirements of this Part pertaining to such ``off property''activities are met are the contractor and his or her employees and supervisorypersonnel.4. <T3>Worker noncompliance. </T3>The proposal includes a provision whichmay offer potentially liable persons some relief from enforcement actionin the event of worker noncompliance with the requirements of this Part(e.g., worker failure to wear protective equipment, or to stay out of aposted field while a reentry interval is in effect and reentry is not authorized).The proposal provides that responsible persons shall ensure that workerscomply with the provisions of this Part and that worker noncompliance shallnot preclude enforcement action (andSection; 170.9(e)). However, the proposalalso provides that enforcement officials will, as appropriate, considersuch worker noncompliance in deciding whether to initiate enforcement actionsand in determining what penalty should be imposed. In practice, this wouldresult in the gravity of the worker noncompliance being weighed againstthe efforts of the responsible person to comply with the requirements ofthis Part. If a responsible person had taken every reasonable step to complyand workers violated the provisions of the Part despite the responsibleperson's efforts, the enforcement official would be able to consider thisin deciding the nature of the enforcement action, if any, to be taken.5. <T3>Enforcement discretion. </T3>EPA and other enforcement authoritieswill review alleged, reported, or observed violations and determine ona case-by-case basis whether enforcement action and penalties are warrantedand, if so, against which responsible persons. The enforcement authoritywill, as appropriate, take into consideration, in reaching enforcementdecisions, the role of each potentially liable person in the activitieswhich gave rise to the alleged violation, and efforts undertaken by thatindividual to comply.This approach to enforcement may be especially relevant in the case ofowners not actively involved in the management of the property. Under andSection;170.7(a), an absentee owner would be responsible for all violations whichoccur on his property. The enforcement authority would have the discretionto examine the relationship of the absentee owner to the activities occurringon his property and, in an appropriate case, to elect not to proceed againstan absentee owner because of his remote relationship to the activitieson his land, or to propose only a small penalty.Likewise, the enforcement authority may consider, as appropriate, the degreeof worker noncompliance, in a situation where workers have been warned,trained, and equipped as required and the noncompliance giving rise tothe violation is isolated. Before deciding whether to seek an enforcementaction or whether to assess a particular penalty, the enforcement authoritymay, as appropriate, consider the actions taken by the responsible personsto comply in the case under consideration as well as other factors suchas the history of such responsible person's compliance with this Part.F. Training and Information 1.<T3> General pesticide safety information for workers.</T3> The Agencyproposes to require that general pesticide safety information be displayedin a prominent location on or in each farm, forest, nursery and greenhouseduring the growing season (andSection; 170.32). Such information would enableworkers to understand the basic safety measures needed for their protectionwhile working in areas where pesticides are being used, providing workerswith important knowledge to prevent serious acute poisonings and reducelong-term exposure. The 18 items of information required to be displayed include: the locationof emergency medical care facilities; a facsimile of the warning sign usedfor posting treated areas; statements concerning pesticide hazards andrecommended safety practices derived from pesticide safety training programsin current use around the country (USDA and USEPA, 94; USEPA, 99; USEPA,100; NRPC, 65); and statements concerning the rights and duties of employers,supervisors, and workers under this Part. The Agency solicits comment onwhether it would be appropriate and practical to include information aboutthe signs and symptoms of pesticide poisoning with the general pesticidesafety information. EPA has recently developed and printed a poster featuringgeneral pesticide safety information for farmworkers which could be usedto fulfill this proposed requirement. All information would be required to be in English. However, in order tocommunicate with workers who can only read another language, the informationmust either be put into that language, or a note must be added in thatlanguage recommending that the worker have someone explain the information.Employers and supervisors thus would be required to ascertain whether sucha translation should be posted and, if required, to do so. Additional proposedconditions concerning the information display include requirements to informworkers of the location of the information, to allow them reasonable accessto it (that is, the information should not be displayed where workers maybe unable or reluctant to make use of it), and to maintain the informationin a legible state. The Agency considered whether other methods of communicating this information,such as oral instructions or a training program given either by employersor by other providers, would be more appropriate. However, the Agency believesthat oral communication methods would likely prove less reliable and lessconvenient. The Agency solicits comments on the most appropriate methodof conveying basic pesticide safety information to workers. 2.<T3> Training of handlers and early reentry workers</T3>_a.<T3> Proposal</T3>. The Agency proposes to require pesticide safety trainingfor all persons who handle agricultural pesticides or who engage in earlyreentry activities (andSection; 170.12). The Agency believes that becauseof the significant opportunities for exposure, these persons need to knowabout basic safe use practices in order to reduce accidents and unnecessaryexposures, and encourage more careful adherence to specific labeling instructions.The goal of this training would be to provide information which would assistin understanding the requirements for safe pesticide use, the need forthe requirements, and responsibilities of these workers to protect themselvesand others from harm due to failure to handle a pesticide product safely.The Agency proposes that this requirement would be met either by certificationas a private or commercial applicator or by undergoing a training programmeeting certain minimum standards. b.<T3> Content</T3>. In andSection; 170.12(b)(2) the Agency proposes minimumstandards for the content of training programs. The Agency has determinedthat training materials adequate to train noncertified handlers and otherworkers in the basic safety precautions and requirements of pesticide useare already developed and are accessible nationally. In particular, a trainingprogram utilizing the slide-tape presentation and bilingual training manualdeveloped at the University of Florida under a grant from EPA would meetthis proposed requirement. To date over 500 slide/tape sets and over 75,000copies of the manual have been distributed around the country. Trainingprograms utilizing these materials can be accomplished easily and inexpensivelyfor groups of varying sizes. c.<T3> Trainers</T3>. The Agency has determined that the presence of a trainerat each training session is a necessity. Merely showing a slide/tape programand handing out a manual is not sufficient to meet the requirements. Atrainer must be present who is capable of answering questions which mayarise and who is knowledgeable about the techniques and practices beingtaught. The Agency proposes that the minimum qualifications for a trainer be either(1) certification under 40 CFR Part 171 as a private or commercial applicator,or (2) designation by any State or Federal agency as a trainer of certifiedapplicators (andSection; 170.12(b)(1)). The Cooperative Extension Serviceand the other public and private groups now training certified applicatorsare a natural source of trainers. However, the participation of any certifiedapplicator in a training program will be sufficient to meet the Agency'sminimum requirement. The Agency believes that certified applicators arelikely to be the most appropriate trainers available, in the event a Statedeclines to specify trainer requirements and to implement its own programsto meet these requirements.d. <T3>Verification. </T3>FIFRA section 11 prohibits the Agency from issuingregulations requiring recordkeeping by private applicators. This sectionmay prohibit a recordkeeping requirement on trainers who are private applicators.Since much of the proposed training would be conducted by private applicators,EPA is not proposing a recordkeeping requirement for trainers. This doesnot preclude a State from instituting a recordkeeping requirement as partof its oversight of a training program. Without records indicating whohas received training and who performed the training, the Agency believesenforcement of the requirement may be difficult. e. <T3>Emergency handling and early reentry. </T3>Under emergency circumstances,trained workers might not be available when needed to handle pesticidesor work in treated areas under a reentry interval. The Agency consideredallowing untrained workers to substitute for such persons under these circumstancesif they were given instructions specific to the pesticide to which theywould be exposed. However, such emergency training, to be adequately protective,would not be significantly less burdensome than regular handler training.Moreover, the Agency believes that an exception to the training requirementwould not be necessary under ordinary crop management conditions, and mightbe subject to abuse. f. <T3>Development of training programs. </T3>The Agency is committed to aidingin the development of training materials which meet these minimum requirements.EPA, the States, and the State Cooperative Extension Services will supporttraining efforts in varying ways and degrees, by making available modeltraining materials at cost or for free and reviewing or othewise cooperatingin the development by the private sector of training materials. The Agencydoes not propose to limit the training programs designed to meet the requirementsof this Part to those programs pre-approved by EPA. However, individualsor groups who design such programs may submit them to EPA or to the appropriateState agency for review and comment on how well they comply with the requirementsof this Part. g. <T3>State training requirements. </T3>Certain States currently requiretraining of pesticide handlers. The Agency does not wish to disrupt suchprograms if they provide adequate handler training. Therefore, the Agencyproposes to allow a State to create or continue to use different standardsfor trainers and training programs (andSection; 170.12(d)). While additionalrequirements consistent with those of this Part may be freely imposed,if such State standards are inconsistent with the training requirementsof andSection; 170.12, the State must petition the Agency for review andapproval of the modifications. In those States choosing not to involvethemselves in handler training, the Agency's proposed minimum standardswould apply. 3. <T3>Access to labeling information. </T3>The Agency proposes that any personwho handles a pesticide be provided, upon request, any information fromthe labeling of the pesticide being handled (andSection; 170.14). The Agencyconsiders this requirement to be complementary to the training of handlersin general pesticide safety. Handlers may need access to the particularsafety requirements of pesticides being used in order to protect themselvesand others. The labeling itself, if available, may be provided in lieuof requested information from labeling. The Agency proposes that such informationbe available before any scheduled handling or during the handling itself.G. Notification The existing Part 170 requires warnings to be given when workers are expectedto be working in a field that has been treated or that is scheduled tobe treated with a pesticide. The Agency has determined that the existingPart 170 does not adequately specify how these warnings shall be given,when the warnings shall be given, and of what the warnings shall consist.The Agency proposes to revise these notification requirements to ensurethat workers are clearly and adequately notified of all pesticide applicationsand resulting reentry intervals. The methods of notification in this proposalvary according to use site. 1. <T3>Farms and forests. </T3>This proposal would require two different typesof information about any pesticide application on a farm or forest to beprovided to workers_daily oral warnings and further information availableon request (andSection; 170.42). In addition, posting of treated areas wouldbe required for some pesticides (andSection; 170.44). The Agency considersoral warnings to be the most effective means of communication. Oral warningswould be supplemented by specific pesticide application information availableon request. Treated area posting would directly warn workers of the mosttoxic applications. These notification methods together would help avoidgaps in communication leading to workers accidentally entering a recentlytreated area or an area that is about to be treated. a. <T3>When notification is required. </T3>This proposal would in generalrequire notification to workers, through one or more notification methods,of all pesticide applications to agricultural plants on farms and in forests.However, pesticides may be applied at times when workers are not present,or may be applied to distant areas of the establishment where no work activitiesare occurring, in which case the possibility of accidental or intentionalreentry during reentry intervals is remote. The proposal therefore includesan exception to the notification requirements in the case of workers whowill not have access to the pesticide-treated area or any ``neighboringareas'' during application and through the subsequent reentry interval.Any such worker need not be orally warned or be given the additional informationavailable on request. If no worker will have access to the treated areaduring this time, posting of the area would not be required.The Agency has limited the notification exception to cases where the leastpotential for accidental exposure exists and where notification would thusprove least useful. The duty to notify extends to notification of workersin ``neighboring areas'' such as adjacent fields or labor camps, and specificallyincludes workers in nearby fields or labor camps separated only by a roadwayor other narrow right-of-way from the treated area. It also includes workerspassing by the treated area on footpaths or in open vehicles, as when workersare traveling to other work sites. If not notified of the pesticide application,such workers who are present in ``neighboring areas'' may, for example,casually enter the treated area to have lunch, or be exposed to spray drift.b. <T3>Information to be provided orally </T3>(andSection; 170.42(b)). The Agencyis proposing that daily oral warnings be required for all pesticide-treatedareas subject to notification. Oral warnings would consist of the specificlocation and description of the area and the time during which entranceinto such area is restricted. The Agency considered whether to continueto require oral warnings to be given in an ``appropriate language'' asin the existing Part 170 or to allow warnings in English only. Since noinformation available indicates that this requirement has been burdensome,EPA proposes to retain the requirement while clarifying the conditionsunder which warnings in other languages are ``appropriate'', i.e., if theworker does not understand spoken English. The person responsible for notificationneed not be bilingual, but he or she must find someone who can effectivelycommunicate warnings in the language of the worker.c. <T3>Information to be provided upon request </T3>(andSection; 170.42(c)).The following information would be required to be provided upon requestfor all areas subject to notification, beginning on the day the pesticideis to be applied and continuing at least until the expiration of the reentryinterval: The specific location and description of the area treated orto be treated, the brand name, active ingredients and EPA registrationnumber of the pesticide used, and the reentry interval. Making this informationavailable upon request would give workers the right to receive specificinformation about pesticides to which they may be or have been exposedduring work activities. The Agency considered requiring this informationto be displayed at a central location such as a notice board, or to bewritten on warning signs, but concluded that such a requirement would bemore burdensome without providing any additional protection.d. <T3>Treated area posting </T3>(andSection; 170.44). The Agency proposes torequire posting of warning signs for areas treated with pesticides whichhave a reentry interval greater than 48 hours. The Agency believes thatwhen oral warnings about specific pesticide applications are used, thepotential for miscommunication and memory problems, and therefore the riskof accidental early reentry, increases with the length of the reentry interval.Therefore, it is important to reinforce the oral warnings with posted warningswhen a longer reentry interval is used.Another option would be to require posting for pesticides with reentryintervals of 24 hours or greater in place of oral warnings for those productsunder this option a greater number of the more acutely toxic pesticideswould receive posting, which may be a more reliable method than oral warnings.Given the reentry interval provisions of this proposal, this option wouldrequire posting of all products with organophosphate and N-methyl carbamateactive ingredients in Toxicity Categories I and II, and all products withactive ingredients in Toxicity Category I, in addition to any other productswith reentry intervals of greater than 24 hours based on case-by-case registrationdecisions. The economic cost of notification would thus increase underthis option because of the greater number of products requiring posting,although this would be offset somewhat by the reduction in oral warnings.A third option would be to require posting for pesticides with reentryintervals of 24 hours or greater in addition to oral warnings for all pesticidesapplications. Under this option, workers would have more extensive directwarnings of applications through posting, supplementing the daily oralwarnings. However, the economic cost of this notification option wouldbe greater than for the other two options.The Agency concluded that requiring posting only for areas treated withpesticides with reentry intervals of greater than 48 hours would assistin reducing accidental poisoning by reinforcing oral warnings without asignificant increase in economic cost. The Agency solicits comment on thisproposal and on the other options considered.The Agency is proposing that the warning sign contain the words ``DANGER-PESTICIDES-KEEPOUT''. The proposal states that the letters on the signs must be at least20 inches high_a height that would be visible at 25 feet by a person withnormal vision. The Agency is also proposing that the sign contain an upheldhand symbol and a stern-looking face. The upheld hand is an internationalsymbol for ``do not enter'' and is also used as a ``do not cross'' pedestriansign. The stern-looking face reinforces the seriousness of the warningto keep out. A symbol is important in addition to the written words sincemany field workers do not read at all or do not read English.The skull and crossbones sign, used in California, was also consideredbecause it is a universally recognized symbol of poison. However, the Agencybelieves that since the skull and crossbones is the symbol used on thelabel for the most highly toxic pesticides, field workers might confusea skull and crossbones reentry symbol, where the exposure risk would bemuch less, with the symbol on the label of a concentrate, where a verysmall amount could kill a person. In addition, since the Agency is requiringposting in greenhouses and nurseries for all pesticides, not just the mosthighly toxic pesticides, use of the skull and crossbones could lead tothe assumption that all pesticides are highly toxic, which would detractfrom its usefulness to farmworkers who associate that symbol with the mosthighly toxic pesticides. The symbol required by Texas (a slash mark acrossthe figure of two people walking through a field) was also considered,but the Agency felt that it did not adequately convey the message of theproposed sign. The Agency believes that pilot testing under field conditionsof any proposed warning sign symbol would help to establish its relativeeffectiveness, and invites comment on how this could best be accomplished.The Agency considered whether or not to require the name of the pesticideand the dates of the reentry period on the posted sign for use in caseof an emergency. A generic sign would be easier to put up and take down,thus saving labor and material expenses. The Agency proposes to requiregeneric signs for posting on farms and forests. However, the brand name,the active ingredients and the registration number of the pesticides, thedates of the reentry interval, and the field location would be providedto any worker upon request (andSection; 170.42).The Agency is proposing that the signs be placed so as to be visible fromthe usual points of entry to the treated area. Posting at locations wherefarmworkers would most likely enter would achieve maximum visibility andprotection. The proposal does not require labor-intensive posting at specificintervals along boundaries of fields.In order for posting to be effective the signs must not be put up too farin advance of the pesticide treatment and must come down within a reasonabletime after the reentry interval has expired. The proposed language permitsposting no sooner than 24 hours before the scheduled application, and requiressigns to be removed within 3 days of the end of the reentry interval. Inno case may treatment begin before signs are posted, nor may workers enterwithout appropriate personal protective equipment until signs are removed.These time frames and conditions would assure that presence of signs correlateswith pesticide hazards, while allowing some flexibility to farm managers.Posting of a larger area than the treated area would be permitted wherea continuous spraying operation treats alternate rows or areas, ratherthan the whole area, on a sequential basis (andSection; 170.44(b)(5)). Sinceposting of individual rows in this case would be difficult and expensive,the Agency is proposing that the entire area may be designated the treatedarea and be posted. However, no part of this entire area may be enteredwhile signs are posted, except under the conditions specified in the regulationfor early reentry.2. <T3>Greenhouses. </T3>Requirements for notification for greenhouse workers(andSection;andSection; 170.62 and 170.64) are different in many respects fromthose for outdoor agricultural workers. Since greenhouses, even large greenhouses,are well-defined and relatively limited spaces, the Agency did not attemptto limit notification to areas to which workers would have access, as inthe case of farms, forests, and nurseries. Any area in the greenhouse whichis treated with pesticides would be subject to notification if at leastone worker is present during application or during the subsequent reentryinterval.Due to generally smaller space and the aisle/bench format of greenhouses,reliance on posting is easier, less labor-intensive, and less expensivethan for larger agricultural establishments. Therefore, the Agency proposesthat all reentry-restricted areas in greenhouses be posted with warningsigns, not only areas treated with pesticides having a greater than 48-hourreentry interval (andSection; 170.64(a)). The Agency believes that this provisionwill be relatively easy to implement because of the nature of enclosedstructures and greenhouse practices. Since the point of access to the treatedarea is either the door_in case of treatment of the entire structure_orindividual benches, rows, or even plants, signs would be posted at theentrances to the greenhouse, at each corner or end of a treated bench,at each end of a row, or in front of a treated plant. In addition, theAgency believes that greenhouses utilize a high proportion of low-toxicitypesticides which have relatively short reentry intervals, i.e., possiblyjust until sprays have dried, dusts have settled or vapors have dispersed.If treatment occurs at night, these intervals would no longer be in effectby the time workers start the next day, in which case no posting wouldbe required. Mechanical ventilation systems can be used to shorten thereentry time for fumigation by reducing vapor dispersal time.The Agency proposes that signs be posted immediately (instead of 24 hours)before the actual application of the pesticide and removed within 1 dayafter the reentry interval has expired, for the reason that this practicewould not be burdensome and posting would thereby be tailored to the presenceof the reentry hazard. The Agency does not propose a size requirement forwarning signs; signs may be small, as long as the lettering and symbolare clearly visible from all points of access.The Agency proposes that no oral warnings be required for greenhouse workerssince all treated areas would be clearly posted. As in the case of farmsand forests, pesticide-specific information would be available on request(andSection; 170.62).3. <T3>Nurseries. </T3>The Agency believes that the generally smaller growingareas, including presence of benches and even individual ornamental plants,make nurseries on the whole more similar to greenhouses for purposes ofnotification of workers. The Agency therefore proposes to require postingof all reentry-restricted areas under the same conditions as greenhouseposting (andSection; 170.54) and not require oral warnings. Pesticide-specificinformation would be available on request (andSection; 170.52). As in thecase of greenhouses, no size requirement for warning signs is proposed.However, warning signs must be clearly visible from points of access tothe area, which in the case of large nursery growing areas may necessitaterelatively larger signs in an elevated position, which would not be necessaryfor nursery benches.H. Personal Protective Equipment1. <T3>Proposal and rationale. </T3>The Agency proposes minimum personal protectiveequipment (PPE) requirements for the protection of pesticide handlers andearly reentry workers exposed to agricultural pesticides (andSection;andSection;156.215, 156.216, and 156.217), as well as duties related to provision,use, and maintenance of required PPE (andSection; 170.16).Any barrier that can be placed between a worker and a pesticide to reduceexposure can reduce the risk of pesticide poisoning. With the exceptionof enclosed cabs of vehicles with positive-pressure ventilation systemsand enclosed cockpits of aircraft, the only significant barrier availableto applicators is personal protective equipment (Lunchick et al., 50).For mixers and loaders, closed mixing/loading systems and new types ofcontainers and packaging (such as water soluble bags) have potential, butmore work needs to be done to perfect these approaches (Jacobs, 41). Mechanicalharvesters and other mechanical techniques are sometimes substituted forhand labor operations in early reentry situations, but their availabilityand utility are limited. PPE remains the most viable method of reducingoccupational exposure to agricultural pesticides.Under current regulations (andSection; 170.2(d)), the term ``protective clothing''is defined as ``at least a hat or other suitable head covering, a long-sleevedshirt and long-legged trousers or a coverall-type garment (all of closelywoven fabric covering the body, including arms and legs), shoes and socks.''The Agency deems this definition inadequate to protect either handlersor workers reentering treated areas before the expiration of the reentryinterval. The Agency has determined that such clothing offers adequateprotection for workers only for the lowest toxicity pesticides. In addition,the Agency believes that this definition of protective clothing has beenwidely misperceived as the Agency's official definition of protective clothingfor all persons occupationally exposed to pesticides and their residues,including not only fieldworkers but also mixers, loaders, and applicators.The Agency has determined that different types of PPE will be needed toprovide adequate protection for workers in different exposure situations.The toxicity of the pesticide, the type of formulation, and the route anddegree of anticipated exposure all affect the appropriate level of PPEwhich should be used to maximize worker protection. In the future, eachindividual pesticide product label may list specific PPE requirements reflectingthe formulation, anticipated exposure route and level, and all forms oftoxicity of that product. In the interim, the Agency proposes minimum PPErequirements for all agricultural pesticides based on the acute toxicityeither of the formulated product (for handlers) or the active ingredient(for early reenty workers); type of worker activity; time since application;route of worker exposure; and handling technique.The Agency considered whether to take chronic toxicity into account inestablishing PPE requirements. For many of the same reasons cited in thediscussion of reentry intervals (see unit III.I.2. below), EPA proposesto continue to assess chronic toxicity in registering and reregisteringindividual agricultural pesticides and make decisions on appropriate PPEon a case-by-case basis. Consequently, the proposed minimum PPE requirementsare based on acute toxicity considerations, although the requirement fornormal work attire for handlers exposed to Toxicity III and IV pesticidesis in part a reflection of the Agency's concern over routine worker exposureto pesticides with unknown chronic effects. 2.<T3> Minimum PPE requirements</T3>_a.<T3> PPE for pesticide handlers</T3>. Persons mixing, loading, transferring,transporting, applying and disposing of pesticides, as well as individualsinvolved in repairing, adjusting, or cleaning of mixing, loading, and applicationequipment, face exposures to potentially dangerous levels of pesticidesunless adequate protection is used. This exposure potential is especiallyhigh for handlers who perform these tasks on a regular basis. Research into the dermal and respiratory pesticide exposure of applicators,mixers, and loaders has demonstrated the degree and nature of this exposure(Durham and Wolfe, 23; Wolfe et al., 108; Wolfe., 107; Durham et al., 25;Wolfe et al., 109; Davis, 17). For example, over 97 percent of pesticideexposure during most handling situations, especially spray application,is dermal exposure (Wolfe, 106). While exposure of the various body areascan vary significantly depending on the type of application or mixing andloading task, there is general consensus that hands and forearms usuallyreceive the highest exposure in terms of percentage of total dermal exposure.In one study 87 percent of total dermal exposure to applicators was tothe hands and forearms (Leavitt et al., 48). In another study, an averageof 76 percent of the total dermal exposure for mixers/loaders handlingwettable powders and liquid formulations was to the hands (Maitlen et al.,56). For both outdoor ground applicators and mixers/loaders, respiratory exposureoutdoors is usually less than 3 percent, and sometimes less than 0.1 percent,of an individual's total exposure. However, respiratory hazards cannotbe ignored, since almost 100 percent of the material to which the lungsand gastro-intestinal tract are exposed is absorbed into the body (Durhamand Wolfe, 23). When fumigants or highly volatile pesticides are handled,respiratory exposure may be significant (Wolfe et al., 109). In greenhousesand in similar enclosed structures, respiratory exposure to pesticidescan be even more severe than outdoors (Waldron, 102). The limited volumeof air available for dilution of vapors and the lack of air movement duringmost applications make protection of the respiratory system essential insome greenhouse exposure situations. Exposure of persons who clean and repair contaminated mixing, loading andapplication equipment can be similar to exposure of mixer/loaders handlingliquid formulations. Dermal exposure to concentrated or dilute pesticidesmay occur from spills, splashes, and leaning on contaminated equipment.Cleaning of equipment often involves hosing down the equipment, resultingin potential contamination from splashing and runoff water (Russell, 80).Respiratory exposure is generally not significant during these activitiesdue to the absence of airborne mists or dusts.The Agency therefore proposes that pesticide handlers be required to wearminimum PPE based on the acute dermal toxicity or skin irritation potential(whichever is higher), the inhalation toxicity, and the eye irritationpotential of the formulated product being handled. These proposed minimumrequirements are set forth in the table found at andSection; 156.216(b).The Agency proposes that these PPE requirements be based on the toxicityof the formulated product. The toxicological characteristics of the formulatedproduct are clearly relevant to handler exposure when the product is soldas ``ready to use.'' The relationship is less firm when the product issold as a concentrate and diluted by the user, because the resulting dilutedproduct will often have a different toxicity than the concentrate. Becausetoxicity data on such diluted products are generally not available, theAgency proposes to base handler PPE requirements on formulated producttoxicity, while allowing registrants and others to submit data on diluteproduct toxicity which would enable the Agency to establish product-specificPPE requirements.b. <T3>PPE for early reentry workers</T3>. Agricultural workers can be exposedto pesticide residues during routine work activities upon reentry intosites previously treated with pesticides. These airborne and surface residuescan be gases or particulates suspended in air. The surface residues canbe on plants, plant parts, duff, or planting media or in or on water orsoil. Some studies indicate that agricultural laborers exposed to dislodgeablefoliar residues during a normal work day can receive exposure similar tothat of a ground applicator of the pesticide (Zweig et al., 112).The greatest exposure of agricultural laborers during early reentry activitiesis before sprays have dried, dusts have settled, or vapors have dispersed.Levels of airborne residues in the form of dusts and vapors are highestimmediately following application. Because lung surfaces are highly permeable,the potential for adverse effects from inhalation exposure is significant,especially if the pesticide is highly volatile (Durham and Wolfe, 23).Dermal and ocular exposure to wet sprays can also be significant (Guntheret al., 33). The Agency therefore proposes that workers reentering treatedareas during this time be required to wear the same minimum PPE as handlersof the pesticide. These proposed minimum requirements are set forth inthe table at andSection; 156.216(b).For early reentry after sprays have dried, dusts have settled, or vaporshave dispersed, the major routes of worker exposure are dermal and ocular(Gunther et al., 33). The greatest exposure hazard is generally to thehands and lower arms. Most of the dermal exposure during reentry activitiesresults from transfer of foliar residues to the workers (Popendorf, 74).Ocular exposure may result from transfer of foliar residues to the eyevia the hands and lower arms. Dermal exposure of hands to residues in soilmay be significant during those tasks that require frequent contact withthe soil, such as harvesting potatoes, weeding, and thinning. Dermal exposureof feet to residues in soil is likely when workers are on foot rather thanin vehicles. Airborne residues at this time will generally be less than0.2 percent of the total exposure (Popendorf et al., 77). The Agency thereforeproposes that workers reentering treated areas after sprays have dried,dusts have settled, or vapors have dispersed be required to wear minimumPPE based on the acute dermal toxicity or skin irritation potential (whicheveris higher) and on the eye irritation potential, but not on the inhalationtoxicity, of the active ingredient(s) of the pesticide product which wasapplied. These proposed minimum requirements are set forth in the tableat andSection;156.217(b).  The Agency proposes that the PPE requirements for early reentry workersentering before sprays have dried, dust have settled or vapors have dispersed,as for handlers, be based on the toxicity of the formulated product, andfor workers entering after this time on the toxicity of the active ingredientsin the product. Workers entering soon after spraying occurs are exposedto pesticide residues most resembling the product applied. However, afterspays have dried the remaining residue is toxicologically most similarto the active ingredients.  c. <T3>Types of protective requirements_</T3>(i) <T3>Hands. </T3>Dermal exposure of the hands and forearms represents themost significant route of exposure of hand laborers, applicators, mixers/loaders,and other persons who are occupationally exposed to agricultural pesticidesand their residues (see, e.g., Franklin, 29). This is true except for fumigationand use of airborne pesticides in enclosed areas, where inhalation exposurepredominates. Studies have shown that wearing gloves may reduce hand andforearm exposure by 97 percent for mixers/loaders (Maitlen et al., 56)and by 98 percent for applicators (Gold et al., 31). Since gloves madeof chemical-resistant material can be the single most important barrierto pesticide exposure for agricultural workers, the Agency proposes torequire chemical-resistant gloves for all early reentry and pesticide handlingsituations, with the exception of early reentry workers exposed to ToxIII or IV pesticides and handlers exposed to Tox IV pesticides.  Technological advances in recent years have led to the development of awider variety of chemical-resistant materials suitable for protective gloves.Many of these materials allow great dexterity and comfort; the Agency citesthe dexterity that surgical gloves allow. In addition, many gloves arebeing made of cotton or other fibrous materials which are coated with achemical resistant outer layer. These coated gloves are sturdy, flexible,and can be washed and reused. While the cloth lining inside coated clothgloves may be difficult to clean, the Agency believes that if gloves areused, maintained, and decontaminated properly, they are effective in significantlyreducing hand exposure.  Leather gloves, uncoated cloth gloves and fingerless gloves are consideredunacceptable by the Agency for use as protective gloves. Liquid and particulatepesticides can rapidly penetrate materials that are not chemical-resistantand increase dermal exposure by trapping the residues close to the skin.In addition, once contaminated with pesticide residues, such gloves cannotbe adequately cleaned and are too costly to be considered disposable. TheAgency considered an exception in the case of early reentry workers pruningroses, because sturdy, yet flexible, glove materials such as leather andcotton are frequently used by such workers to withstand the wear and tearfrom the thorns while providing sufficient dexterity. However, upon reviewof the many chemical-resistant glove materials now available, the Agencyhas determined that chemical-resistant gloves appropriate for use in thepruning of roses, including coated cloth gloves, are available, and thatleather and uncoated cloth gloves would be unacceptable.  (ii) <T3>Body. </T3>The Agency has determined that long-sleeved shirts and long-leggedpants are insufficient protective barriers to moderately and highly toxicpesticides and their residues, and that protective suits offer substantiallymore protection. Therefore, the Agency proposes to require that all handlersand early reentry workers exposed to pesticides in Toxicity Category Ior II for either dermal toxicity or skin irritation potential wear protectivesuits, such as fabric coveralls, that at a minimum cover the entire bodyexcept for the head, hands, and feet.  Appropriate protective suits can reduce the exposure to workers' trunkarea, arms, and legs by 99 percent (Davies et al., 19; Hickey, 38). Inone study, 100 percent cotton coveralls reduced the penetration of ethionby 72 percent for mixers and 97 percent for applicators as compared toworkers wearing only normal work attire (pants and short-sleeved shirts)(Davies et al., 19). More importantly, no heat stress complaints were mentionedby the workers while wearing full-length cotton coveralls, although theweather was very hot and humid during the study.  A protective suit is more effective as a barrier if worn over another setof clothing (Davies et al., 19). Both the additional set of clothing andthe additional air layer are important in resisting the movement of a pesticidethrough the layers to the skin. However, there are drawbacks to this methodof protection. The resulting outfit is somewhat warmer and less comfortablethan a single layer of clothing. In addition, if a spill or saturationof the protective suit caused the pesticide to reach the inside clothing,the worker would be left with only contaminated clothing to wear or takehome or to work in for the remainder of the shift. Despite these objections,the Agency proposes to require that the protective suit be worn over normalwork attire, and seeks comment concerning this proposal.    Protection without comfort is of little value to workers; if workers gettoo hot, PPE will not be used (Davies et al., 19). The term ``protectivesuit'' is therefore not intended to refer to impervious, chemical-resistant,or waterproof suits. A protective suit will most often be a set of coverallsor a lightweight disposable suit. If the toxicity or formulation characteristicsof a particular pesticide require the use of a chemical-resistant suit,it will be required on a product-specific basis.A chemical-resistant apron can significantly reduce exposure due to pesticidespills and splashes and leaning against contaminated equipment during mixingand loading (Russell, 80). If worn over a protective suit, these apronscan also prevent extreme contamination of the suit and prevent the pesticidefrom penetrating to the skin, where it would be trapped by the shirt orpants, increasing dermal absorption (Wester and Maibach, 104). A suitableapron is most effective when liquid formulations are being handled, butis also useful when handling dry formulations such as wettable powders.The Agency therefore proposes that mixers and loaders of Tox I and II (bydermal exposure) formulations be required to wear a chemical resistantapron, unless a chemical-resistant suit is otherwise required by the labeling(andSection; 156.216(c)(1)).While protective suits offer significant protection for mixer/loaders handlingdry formulations and applicators exposed to spray mist, they do not offermuch protection against spills and splashes, the most common exposure riskfor persons who clean and repair contaminated equipment. The Agency thereforeproposes to require a chemical-resistant apron for body protection in thesehandling situations, but not to require a protective suit (andSection; 156.216(c)(7)).The Agency proposes to require that handlers and early reentry workersentering before sprays have dried who are exposed to Tox III and IV pesticideswear normal work attire (defined as long-legged pants and long-sleevedshirt, shoes, and socks) for bodily protection, in effect continuing thepresent PPE requirements for these pesticides. Such a requirement wouldafford some protection for workers from pesticide splashes and spills andexposure to wet foliage, while representing little cost to pesticide users.(iii) <T3>Head.</T3> Pesticide absorption through the skin is not uniform forall areas of the body. Two of the areas which absorb pesticides more readilythan other areas are the back of the neck and the temple areas. The Agencyproposes to require headgear for handlers in situations where exposurefrom overhead dusts or sprays is possible, such as in airblast sprayingoperations and flagging. Plastic hard hats with nonabsorbing liners, hoods,wide-brimmed hats and sou'wester-style hats are considered to afford adequateprotection to the head and neck area.(iv) <T3>Respiratory tract.</T3> The Agency proposes to require handlers andworkers entering treated areas before sprays have dried to wear respiratoryprotection devices approved by the National Institute of Occupational Safetyand Health (NIOSH) and the Mine Safety and Health Administration (MSHA)for the intended circumstances of use, if the pesticide is in ToxicityCategory I or II for inhalation toxicity. The Agency does not propose torequire a respiratory protection device to be used by early reentry workersentering after pesticide vapors have dispersed, or where the pesticideto which any worker is exposed is in Tox III or IV for inhalation toxicity,due to the low inhalation hazard in these situations.(v) <T3>Face and eyes.</T3> The eyes and face may be exposed to pesticideswhenever there is danger of chemical splash or high levels of fumes, vapors,or dusts during mixing, loading and application (Russell, 80). Workersmay wipe their eyes and face with hands and forearms during harvestingand other agricultural activities, thus transferring residues to theseparts of the body. The face and eyes may also receive pesticide residueswhen they are dislodged from foliar surfaces above the head of the worker,such as during harvesting of tree fruits.The Agency therefore proposes to require the use of goggles or a face shieldby all handlers and early reentry workers exposed to pesticides with ToxicityCategory I and II eye irritation potential. Use of goggles or a face shieldwould be required during mixing and loading using closed systems only ifsuch systems are pressurized, due to the risk of system failure and subsequentexposure hazard.(vi) <T3>Feet.</T3> Exposure of feet to pesticides may occur from spills andsplashes, from downward spraying of mists, and when walking through groundcover of weeds, grasses and agricultural plants after spray applicationwhile sprays are still wet (Russell, 80). The Agency has determined thatchemical-resistant footgear (shoes, boots or shoe coverings) provides sufficientprotection for feet from pesticide exposure under these circumstances,while leather and canvas footgear (boots or shoes) provides inadequateprotection.The Agency proposes to require chemical-resistant footgear for handlersand early reentry workers exposed to pesticides in Toxicity Category Ior II for dermal toxicity or skin irritation potential. The Agency recognizes,however, that some workers, particularly forestry workers, have traditionallyused leather boots for durability and breathability in rough terrain, andseeks comment on the impact of such a requirement on these workers.d. <T3>Modification of minimum requirements</T3>_(i) <T3>Data submission. </T3>Any registrant or other person will be permittedto seek modification of these minimum PPE requirements by submission ofappropriate data (andSection;andSection; 156.216(f) and 156.217(d)). Rebuttalsfavoring different minimum PPE requirements may be by submission of datasuch as that required by Subdivision U of the Pesticide Assessment Guidelines,or other medical, epidemiological, or other health effects data, whichdemonstrate to the Agency's satisfaction that different PPE requirementswill sufficiently protect pesticide handlers or early reentry workers frompesticide exposure.The Agency would specifically allow registrants and other persons to submitacute toxicity data on an end-use product as diluted for use for one ormore routes of exposure (andSection; 156.216(d)). Such data may enable theAgency to modify the PPE requirements for handlers other than mixers andloaders and for early reentry workers entering before sprays have dried,if the data indicate that the toxicity of the end-product as diluted foruse is significantly different from that of the formulated product soldto the user.(ii) <T3>Exposure pattern. </T3>The Agency proposes to modify the minimum PPErequirements for handlers of pesticides in Toxicity Category I or II bydermal toxicity or skin irritation potential, under certain exposure-relatedcircumstances (andSection; 156.216(c)). Three of these modifications_thechemical-resistant apron requirement, the head protection requirement,and the PPE requirements for cleaning of mixing, loading, and applicationequipment_have been discussed under types of protection. The other modificationsrelate to enclosed pesticide handling methods.The Agency welcomes technological advances which would eliminate or substantiallyreduce exposure of pesticide handlers, and desires to encourage such advancesby reducing the minimum PPE requirements in these situations. The Agencyhas identified three technologies which can substantially reduce handlerexposure: (1) Closed system mixing and loading; (2) application from withinan enclosed aircraft cockpit; and (3) application from within an enclosedcab with a positive-pressure ventilation system.The Agency proposes to allow pesticide handlers using closed mixing/loadingsystems to wear normal work attire, plus chemical-resistant gloves andan apron. The gloves and apron requirement protects against spills andleaks that may occur in the system. If a closed system is used for handlinghighly toxic pesticides or large quantities of pesticides, an accidentalexposure result in a serious poisoning or injury. In addition, as discussedabove, a face shield or goggles would be required if the product is beingtransferred out of its container through the use of pressure. Without sucheye protection, a leak could result in highly toxic concentrated pesticidebeing squirted into the face and eyes under pressure.The Agency proposes to allow pesticide applicators in enclosed cockpitsof aircraft to wear their normal work attire. However, the Agency is concernedabout dermal contamination of the hands and forearms while the pilot isentering or leaving the cockpit where the outside surface of the aircraftcontains pesticide residues. Contaminated hands and forearms in the cockpitcould contaminate the air and surfaces in the cockpit and negate the benefitof the enclosed cockpit. Therefore, chemical-resistant gloves would berequired for use during such entrances or exits.The Agency proposes to allow pesticide handlers in enclosed cabs of groundvehicles with positive-pressure ventilation systems to wear their normalwork attire. Positive-pressure, charcoal-filtered ventilation systems onenclosed cabs can remove over 99 percent of pesticide vapors and spraysduring air intake (Taschenberg et al., 90). While fully enclosed cabs withoutair filtration have been shown to substantially reduce dermal (but notrespiratory) exposure to airblast applicators (Carmen et al., 12), theAgency believes the heat buildup in unventilated enclosed cabs may in practicelead applicators to open windows to maintain comfort, resulting in increasedexposure. The Agency seeks comment on this issue. The Agency is also concernedabout the possibility of handlers leaving the enclosed cab while stillin the area being treated, becoming contaminated and returning to the enclosedcab. In addition to direct exposure of the handler, upon reentry to thevehicle the resultant surface and air contamination could negate the benefitsof the enclosed cab and filtration system. Therefore, all PPE requiredfor a ground applicator of the pesticide must be available for use anytime the handler leaves the cab while in the treated area.(iii) <T3>Existing PPE requirements. </T3>In those cases where current pesticidelabeling already contains PPE requirements, the Agency proposes to requirethe interim PPE requirements of Part 156 to supersede the existing requirementsfor an area of the body if the interim PPE is more protective of that areaof the body (andSection; 156.215(a)). These PPE requirements would be minimumrequirements. The one exception proposed is where the label currently prohibitsan item of PPE which would be required under this proposal, in which casethe existing prohibition will continue in effect.The following are examples of comparisons of degree of protection betweenPE items in this proposal and PPE items now on pesticide product labeling:1. A protective suit is more protective than a long-sleeved shirt and long-leggedpants.2. A chemical-resistant (or liquidproof, waterproof, rubber, etc.) protectivesuit, rain gear or rain suit is more protective than a protective suit.3. Chemical-resistant gloves are more protective than cotton, fabric, cloth,paper, or leather gloves.4. Chemical-resistant gloves are equal in protective capability to liquidproof,waterproof, impermeable, impervious, neoprene, natural rubber, syntheticrubber, rubber, vinyl, plastic, water-resistant, or non-porous gloves.The term ``chemical-resistant gloves'' would nevertheless be substitutedto standardize terminology, unless a particular material or materials has(have) been identified as being chemical-resistant to a particular pesticideproduct or to a particular pesticide family, in which case that specificmaterial would be listed. 5. Chemical-resistant shoes, shoe coverings, or boots are more protectivethan shoes and socks. 6. A NIOSH- and MSHA-approved respiratory protection device is more protectivethan a non-approved, MESA-approved, or U.S. Bureau of Mines-approved respiratoryprotection device. 7. An air-supplied or self-contained respiratory protection device is moreprotective than a NIOSH- or MSHA-approved respiratory protection device.However, NIOSH and MSHA approval would be added to the labeling statement.3. <T3>Duties relating to PPE</T3>_a. <T3>Provision. </T3>Under the proposal all PPE required by the pesticideproduct labeling for a particular use situation would be provided and maintainedfor workers (andSection; 170.16(a)). Surveys of pesticide users, especiallyagricultural workers, indicate that a significant percentage do not followany precautionary procedures for the cleanup and maintenance of their contaminatedclothing and equipment. If PPE is not cleaned and maintained properly,exposure may be increased by its use over time. Normal work attire (long-sleevedshirt, long-legged pants, shoes, and socks) is not considered to be PPEand would not have to be provided or maintained for the handler or earlyreentry worker. b. <T3>Use. </T3>The Agency is requiring that the appropriate PPE be usedcorrectly for its intended purpose and in accordance with any manufacturer'sinstructions (andSection; 170.16(b)(1)). Handlers and early reentry workerswho choose or are allowed to remove PPE which should be worn would be subjectto enforcement action. Studies have shown that not wearing PPE during evena brief portion of the exposure period can result in significantly higherdermal exposure (Maddy et al., 55). Respirator effectiveness can be reduceda full 10 percent when the respirator is removed for only 1 minute duringan hour of exposure (U.S. Congress, 93). c. <T3>Change areas. </T3>Workers who are provided PPE need a place outsideof treated areas where they can put on PPE before being exposed to pesticidesor their residues, store personal clothing, and change into personal clothingafter being exposed. Such a place must be clean enough that personal clothing,PPE, and the worker are not unnecessarily contaminated by pesticides ortheir residues in the environment. The Agency proposes to require thatsuch a clean place for changing into and out of PPE be provided beforeand after any exposure period (andSection; 170.16(b)(3)). The Agency proposes to require soap, water, and towels to be availableat the end of any exposure period so handlers and early-reentry workerscan wash themselves. Failure to wash adequately may lead to delayed acutepoisoning or to chronic or subchronic poisoning, or may result in exposingothers through secondary contact with contaminated skin, especially thehands (Hayes, 35). The water available for washing must be of sufficientquantity to allow thorough washing of the entire body if necessary. d. <T3>Heat prostration. </T3>While chemical-resistant protective suits arenot proposed by this regulation as minimum PPE, they are currently requiredby the labeling of a few highly toxic pesticides, generally in those usesituations where a high level of exposure to a drenching spray or liquidformulation is possible. The Agency believes that under hot and humid environmentalconditions, the wearing of such nonbreathable clothing can lead to a rapidbuildup of body heat and sudden heat-induced illness, such as heat strokeor heat prostration, which can be fatal. In addition, when workers wearingprotective suits get too hot during tasks, the protective suits may notbe used, leading to greater exposure (Davies et al., 19).The Agency proposes to prohibit handling and early reentry activities whena chemical-resistant suit is required by the product labeling and the environmentalconditions are such that the activity might lead to heat-induced illness(andSection; 170.16(b)(2)). Although the onset of these illnesses dependson a variety of factors such as temperature, humidity, length of exposure,individual heat tolerance, and type of work, EPA believes that users canreasonably be expected to anticipate conditions under which work activitiesmight prove dangerous in this way. e. <T3>Cleaning and maintenance. </T3>Significant levels of some pesticidescan remain in clothing or on equipment if they are not correctly launderedor if prescribed maintenance procedures are not followed (Orlando et al.,67; DeJong, 20). Studies have shown the hazards of secondary poisoningthrough exposure to contaminated clothing and equipment, including a pesticidefatality in a worker who died after putting on a pair of coveralls laterfound to be contaminated with parathion (Southwick et al., 81). Pesticides and their residues can ordinarily be removed from both fabricand nonfabric items of PPE by washing thoroughly_either manually or bymachine_with a heavy-duty detergent and hot water, unless some other methodof cleaning is specified by the manufacturer's instructions. The proposalwould require that all PPE be thoroughly washed with detergent and hotwater, or cleaned according to the manufacturer's instructions, after anyday when the handler or early-reentry worker wears such equipment and contactspesticides or their residues (andSection; 170.16(c)(1)).After washing, PPE should be dried and stored appropriately to minimizedeterioration and mechanical damage. Excessive moisture, heat, cold, orchemical exposure can damage personal protective equipment during storage.Some items may stiffen, crack, or deteriorate during extended storage periodssuch as over winter or from one season to the next (CMA, 13). The Agencyis proposing that PPE be thoroughly dried before being stored or be placedin a well-ventilated place to dry (andSection; 170.16(c)(1)). Furthermore,the Agency proposes that PPE be stored away from pesticide-contaminatedplaces and separately from personal clothing to avoid contamination ofeither clean PPE or clean personal clothing (andSection; 170.16(c)(6)).f. <T3>Hazards during cleaning of PPE. </T3>Unprotected persons cleaning PPEcan be exposed to high levels of pesticide residues remaining on the clothingand equipment (Laughlin et al., 46; Finley, 28). Laundering studies demonstratethat significant cross-contamination may occur when residues removed fromthe contaminated garment adhere to other garments being laundered in thesame batch (Laughlin et al., 46). Pesticide residues may also remain behindin the automatic washer and dryer and cross-contaminate future batchesof laundry.The Agency proposes that workers be required to remove at the work placeall PPE that was provided and that they not be allowed to take or wearthe clothing or equipment home (andSection; 170.16(c)(7)). The Agency alsoproposes that persons responsible for cleaning and decontaminating of PPEbe instructed in the appropriate procedures and hazards involved, bothto ensure appropriate cleaning and decontamination of the items and tominimize risk to the person performing the job (andSection; 170.16(c)(2)).g. <T3>PPE that cannot be cleaned. </T3>Fabric saturated with certain concentratedpesticides cannot be adequately cleaned. Even after being laundered threetimes, fabrics contaminated with concentrated highly toxic pesticides maystill contain significant residues (Laughlin et al., 46). The Agency proposesthat any PPE that becomes drenched or heavily contaminated with Tox I orII concentrated pesticides be discarded using procedures approved by Federal,State and local governments (andSection; 170.16(c)(3)). h. <T3>Respirator maintenance. </T3>Respirators rely on various types of filtrationsystems_pads, cartridges, canisters_to remove the contaminants from theair being breathed. These filters must be replaced on a regular basis orthe usefulness of the respirator is reduced and finally negated. The Agencyproposes that respirator filters be replaced at least as often as recommendedby the manufacturer (andSection; 170.16(c)(4)).i. <T3>Inspection. </T3>PPE may deteriorate with age, use, or exposure toother factors such as heat, cold, moisture, and chemical contaminants.Any breach in the physical barrier of PPE reduces its effectiveness greatly(CMA, 13). The Agency proposes to require inspection of all PPE beforeeach day's use and repair or replacement of damaged PPE (andSection; 170.16(c)(5)).I. Application and Reentry Restrictions1. <T3>Application restrictions. </T3>Present andSection; 170.3 prohibits theapplication of any pesticide in such a manner as to directly or throughdrift expose workers or other persons, except those persons who are knowinglyinvolved in the pesticide application, and requires unprotected personsto vacate the area. The Agency proposes to continue this provision, withsome changes (andSection; 170.36).The Agency proposes to clarify the requirement of workers to vacate thetreated area during application by stating ``no worker shall be allowedor directed to enter or remain in a pesticide treated area.'' The exceptionfor ``persons knowingly involved in application'' has been changed to ``handlers''.The reference to ``unprotected persons'' has been deleted to make clearthat only handlers appropriately trained and equipped as required by thisPart are permitted during application; other workers, even if protected,are not permitted. Since these regulations apply only to workers, all referencesto ``other persons'' have been deleted. The term ``contact'' has been substitutedfor the less precise term ``expose.''This proposal continues the general prohibition on exposure of workersthrough drift of pesticides from the site of application. Application maynot take place if weather or other conditions are such that pesticidesmay drift beyond the treated area and contact nearby workers. The Agencyis aware of the problems that may result from drift exposure of workers,especially during aerial and airblast applications. Since drift potentialis affected by many situational factors_wind speed and direction; nozzlesize, type, angle and pressure; release pattern; aircraft type, heightand speed; topography; particle size_the Agency considers development ofspecific regulatory requirements pertaining to drift to be infeasible atthis time. One exception is the case of nurseries and greenhouses, where``reentry restricted areas'' based in part on drift and overspray potentialare proposed. For farms and forests, the Agency will continue to rely onapplicator training programs, the encouragement of State regulation oflocalized drift problems, and pesticide-specific labeling statements whereappropriate.2. <T3>Interim reentry intervals</T3>_a. <T3>Proposal and rationale.</T3> The Agency proposes to establish interimreentry intervals for all pesticide products that are used on agriculturalsites (andSection; 156.210). Such interim intervals would be based on theacute toxicity and chemical class of the active ingredient(s), and wouldbe reevaluated by the Agency upon submission of appropriate data or uponcommencement of any Special Review.The Agency has established approximately sixty reentry intervals to datefor pesticide active ingredients. Twelve of these were established by thepresent Part 170 (andSection; 170.3(b)(2)), while others have been establishedupon registration, by Registration Standards, during Special Review, inresponse to medical or epidemiological data indicating a special problem,or upon review of Part 158 reentry data submitted by registrants. In additionto these intervals, the present Part 170 established a generic ``minimum''reentry interval (``until sprays have dried or dusts have settled,'' andSection;170.3(b)(1)) for pesticides used on agricultural sites covered by thatPart.Each of the existing intervals is considered interim by the Agency, exceptfor those established for specific products after submission and evaluationof adequate Part 158 data. The most appropriate method for setting reentryintervals is by calculation from test data. The Agency considers these``product-specific'' intervals to represent an accurate assessment of reentryhazards to farmworkers of the particular pesticide. The Agency does notpropose to alter product-specific intervals or the process used to determinethem.However, the length of time necessary to generate appropriate reentry dataand review that data may be considerable. The vast majority of the approximately400 active ingredients covered by this Part have neither product-specificnor interim reentry intervals. Until the reregistration process can becompleted, the Agency proposal would provide interim protection for workersfrom hazardous residue levels of all pesticides used on agricultural sites.For this reason, the Agency has determined that it is necessary to establishinterim reentry intervals for all pesticides used on agricultural sites.b. <T3>Minimum reentry interval.</T3> The Agency proposes to retain the genericminimum reentry interval in the present Part 170, while modifying it inone respect (andSection; 156.210(c)(1)). The Agency proposes to add the phrase``or vapors have dispersed'' to cover two major situations of concern.Fumigant applications involve neither sprays nor dusts; the pesticide isapplied as a gas or vapor. The minimum reentry interval thus would applyto fumigants under this proposal. Also, during and immediately followingcertain applications there is an inhalation hazard to workers in the treatedarea due to the presence of pesticides with a high vapor pressure, whichare particularly hazardous by the inhalation route of exposure. After vaporshave dispersed, the hazard via the inhalation route is very low.c. <T3>Specific reentry intervals</T3>. The Agency proposes to establish specificinterim reentry intervals for certain pesticide products (andSection; 156.210(e)).A 48-hour interval would be established for those products containing anyorganosphosphate or N-methyl carbamate active ingredient in Toxicity CategoryI for acute dermal toxicity or skin or eye irritation potential, whilea 24-hour interval would be established for products containing any otherTox I active ingredient. A 24-hour interval would be established for productscontaining any Tox II active ingredient that is an organophosphate or N-methylcarbamate. Products containing more than one active ingredient would usethe longest of the applicable intervals. Existing reentry intervals wouldbe retained to the extent they are based on adequate Part 158 reentry data,currently subject to an Agency requirement to submit such data which isflagged for expedited review, or are longer than the proposed interim intervals.The interim intervals would be modified if necessary upon submission ofreentry data, and would be reevaluated at the beginning of any SpecialReview. (i) <T3>Toxicity basis</T3>. In the absence of adequate reentry data on pesticideproducts, the Agency proposes to establish interim intervals based on availabletoxicity data. In defining such a toxicity basis for reentry intervalsthe Agency has examined several aspects of toxicity, including acute versuschronic toxicity, active ingredient versus formulated product, and routeof entry.The Agency currently establishes interim reentry intervals based on chronictoxicity when such data are available and indicate a known or potentialchronic toxicity hazard to workers. However, a full set of chronic toxicitydata is currently available on only a minority of the many pesticides usedin agriculture, whereas acute toxicity data are available on most of thesepesticides. The Agency will continue to use available chronic data to setchemical-specific intervals during Registration Standards development andSpecial Review, and will specifically evaluate chronic toxicity reentryrisk at the beginning of Special Review (andSection; 156.210(f)), but proposesto base generic intervals in Part 170 on acute data only.If data indicating chronic toxicity concerns are not present, the Agencyestablishes interim reentry intervals based on the acute toxicity of thetechnical grade of the active ingredient. Components of the formulatedproduct other than the active ingredient are not usually present in theresidue after the sprays have dried (Gunther et al., 33). Some formulatedproducts are designated Toxicity Category I due to the skin and eye irritationpotential of a solvent or other inert which would vaporize after applicationand thus would not be hazardous to reentering workers. In addition, someproducts are sold in a more diluted form than others. This could renderthe formulated product less hazardous to the handler of the product, butwould not alter the hazard to reentry workers because the total amountof active ingredient applied per acre treated tends to be constant forthe same crop and conditions.Although the dose or amount of active ingredient actually applied per acre(or to another defined surface area) for a given crop or situation is currentlyconsidered in determining product-specific reentry intervals, the Agencyhas determined that such dosages cannot practicably be considered whenestablishing generic reentry intervals through Part 170. The dosage ofactive ingredient varies widely depending on the crop, the pest to be controlled,and on other factors such as the timing of the application, the severityof the pest problem, weather conditions, soil types, crop varieties, etc.Therefore, the Agency proposes to base interim reentry intervals solelyon the toxicity of the active ingredient rather than on the toxicity ofthe formulated product or the use rate per acre.Acute toxicity is usually measured in terms of a particular route of exposure.Dermal, oral, and inhalation toxicity and skin and eye irritation potentialdata are all currently considered in determining the toxicity categoryof an active ingredient (andSection; 162.10(h)(1)). The principal routesof exposure of workers in reentry situations are dermal, inhalation andeye, with dermal the predominant route (Wolfe, 106). The Agency consideredusing dermal toxicity alone to establish reentry intervals; however, inhalationand ocular exposure may also be significant in reentry situations. Inhalationexposure is generally only significant before vapors have dispersed; sincethe proposed minimum reentry interval includes this period, the Agencywould not consider inhalation toxicity in setting specific reentry intervals.Eye exposure to dislodgeable residues in reentry situations may be significant;in California between 1976 and 1985, there were more than four times asmany skin and eye injuries as systemic poisonings among reentry workers(Blondell, 8). Oral exposure in agricultural work is usually related tothe worker's personal habits such as not washing hands and face beforeeating, drinking or smoking (Bohmont, 9), and the Agency has no evidenceof the extent of such habits among field workers. However, oral toxicitydata are the most widely available data on pesticides, and the Agency wouldconsider oral toxicity data an adequate surrogate for data on other routesof exposure. The Agency proposes to set interim intervals based on the highest toxicitycategory indicated by available data on acute dermal toxicity and skinand eye irritation potential, as determined by the criteria of andSection;162.10(h)(1). If no dermal toxicity data are available, any available oraltoxicity data would be used along with other nondermal data in making thisdetermination. (ii) <T3>Chemical classes of concern. </T3>Of the many chemical classes of pesticides,the organophosphate (OP) insecticides are the most frequent cause of systemicpoisonings. During the period 1976-85, 80 percent of all reported systemicpoisonings in California that were caused by Toxicity Category I activeingredients involved OP's (Blondell, 8). N-methyl carbamate pesticides,whose primary mechanism of action_inhibition of enzyme cholinesterase_isthe same as that of the OP's, were involved in another 10 percent of ToxI poisonings. In addition, these classes accounted for 70 percent of theTox II poisonings in that State. Based on such poisoning reports, as wellas the typically high acute toxicity of OP's and some N-methyl carbamates,the Agency has already established interim reentry intervals for certainpesticides in these two classes. California, Texas, and New Jersey havealso established specific intervals for certain pesticides in these classes.EPA estimates that these classes include about half of the Toxicity CategoryI active ingredients used on agricultural sites and about one-third ofthe Toxicity Category II active ingredients used on those sites.While the Agency is aware of poisoning incidents involving pesticides inother chemical classes, it has insufficient evidence on which to extrapolateto all members of those classes. The Agency therefore proposes to establishhigher interim reentry intervals for active ingredients belonging to theOP and N-methyl carbamate classes than for other pesticides of similaracute toxicity.(iii) <T3>Interval options.</T3> The Agency considered a number of time intervalsfor interim reenty requirements, generally in relation to the various toxicitycategories.An option to establish an interim reentry interval of 24 hours for allTox I pesticides was not adopted because EPA is convinced that a 24-hourreentry time is not sufficient protection for many Tox I pesticides. Studiesindicate that a 48-hour or longer interval is almost always necessary toprotect workers from hazardous levels of Tox I organophosphate pesticides(Popendorf, 76).Other more protective options were considered by the Agency as well. Theseincluded a 24-hour interim reentry interval floor for all toxicity categories.At least 40 percent and possibly 50 percent of reported skin and eye injuriesto California reentry workers between 1976 and 1985 were caused by pesticideswith Tox III or IV active ingredients (Blondell, 8). A minimum reentryinterval of 24 hours would reduce the incidence of injuries from theselower acute toxicity pesticides, as well as providing a margin of safetyfor field workers from unknown chronic effects. It would also be a relativelysimple policy for users to understand and EPA to apply. However, the optionwould result in unwarranted reentry intervals for some pesticides, requiringdata generation for rebuttal. Also, the Agency believes that chronic effectsare best regulated through the existing pesticide-specific procedures ofRegistration Standards and Special Review.The Agency also considered establishing longer reentry intervals for allproducts in the more toxic toxicity categories, e.g., 72-hour/48-hour/24-hourreentry intervals for, respectively, Tox I, II, and III pesticides, or48 hours for Tox 1 and 24 hours for Tox II. These options would reflectthe varying acute toxicities of each category and promote the use of lesstoxic chemicals by establishing a shorter time period before unprotectedworkers could reenter areas treated with those chemicals. However, a preliminaryeconomic impact assessment indicated that the 72/48/24 option would resultin a significant disruption of agricultural production. While less disruptiveof production, the 48/24 approach would not reflect the actual poisoningincident data that implicates two classes of chemicals with most seriouspoisonings, the organophosphates and the N-methyl carbamates.The Agency has some information indicating that 48-hour reentry intervalswould have a significant economic impact on greenhouse sites, whereas 24-hourreentry intervals would have very minor economic impact. The first-year,nonincremental cost (including costs already incurred) of the reentry provisionsin the Agency's proposal for greenhouse sites is estimated to be $27.5million ($157 per worker, $2,115 per establishment). While significantimpact from generic reentry intervals is more likely in greenhouses thanon farms, due to the indoor, closely spaced nature of growing areas andfrequent pesticide use, the Agency seeks more particular information ongreenhouse pesticide use which would bear on the question of the impactof the proposed reentry intervals. Specifically, such information wouldconcern which pesticides with specific reentry intervals either existingor established by this proposal) are needed for management of which pestson which crops at the same time that hand labor activities (weeding, harvesting,etc.) are required on that crop or in nearby areas of the greenhouse; thetype and frequency of the necessary reentry to the treated areas; whetheralternative pesticides without reenty intervals are available; and in whatways production practices would have to be altered. Comment is specificallyrequested on the cost of the proposed reentry intervals for greenhouseestablishment, including the cost of any alternative production practicesthat may be necessary.The Agency invites comments on the proposed approach and the options describedabove.(iv) <T3>Whether reentry intervals should apply only to crops requiring handlabor tasks. </T3>Under present Agency reentry policy, the establishmentof interim reentry intervals has generally been limited to those cropswhich require workers to perform ``hand labor operations,'' defined inPR Notice 83-2 as tasks involving ``substantial contact with treated surfaces.''However, contact with treated surfaces may result from tasks which arenot traditionally considered hand labor practices and yet which are commonto virtually all forms of agricultural production. The Agency has consideredwhether such tasks merit reentry protection. Agricultural workers may contact treated surfaces through such common practicesas IPM scouting, walking through a crop production area to reach work sites,and using areas near work sites for meals, rest breaks, and using the toilet.Children accompanying the workers may contact treated surfaces when usingtreated areas as play areas. Depending on the pesticide applied, time ofentry, nature of the activity and other conditions, adverse effects onworkers or their children may result from such activities. Contact withsmall amounts of highly toxic pesticides can result in worker poisoning.Environmental conditions may significantly increase exposure and rate ofabsorption into the body. Residues wet from their diluent or from dew orrain may penetrate nonchemical resistant clothing and be deposited on theskin. Wet, clinging clothing may increase dermal penetration by increasingsurface area contact with residues.The Agency has determined that contact with treated surfaces from earlyreentry activities, other than hand labor tasks, may result in adverseeffects on workers, and proposes that interim reentry intervals apply toall reentry activities on all agricultural plants, regardless of the natureof traditional worker activities associated with particular agriculturalplants.(v) <T3>Existing reentry intervals. </T3>Reentry intervals currently existfor 51 active ingredients, including twelve intervals established by thepresent Part 170. Some of these intervals are ``permanent'' (based on adequatePart 158 reentry data or a waiver of data submission), while others areinterim (not based on adequate data; data submission generally required).While the Agency does not propose any change to the Part 158 process forestablishing ``permanent'' reentry intervals, this proposal representsa change in current Agency policy for setting interim intervals. Hence,certain of the existing interim intervals would no longer provide adequateinterim protection for agricultural workers.The Agency proposes that the interim reentry intervals in this proposalsupersede existing reentry intervals established by the Agency, exceptin the following cases: (1) Where the existing interval was establishedon the basis of adequate Part 158 data (andSection; 156.210(d)); (2) wherethe existing interval is longer than the interval calculated accordingto the criteria of this Part (andSection; 156.210(e)(1)); or (3) where Part158 reentry data have been required by the Agency and flagged for expeditedreview (andSection; 156.210(e)(1)). This proposal would retain all ``permanent''intervals, as well as those longer interim intervals generally establishedon the basis of chronic toxicity or other unique exposure hazards. It wouldalso allow those registrants currently generating reentry data for whichthe Agency intends to expedite its review to continue to rely on the existinginterval.(vi) <T3>Toxicity data. </T3>The acute toxicity data necessary to ascertainthe toxicity category of the technical grade of the active ingredient(s),which would in turn be used to determine as interim reentry interval foran individual product, are readily available for many agricultural pesticidescovered by this Part. The Agency has many of these data on file, and registrantsor registered technicals should also possess such data.The Agency considered merely providing acute toxicity criteria in Part156 and allowing registrants to determine the interval applicable to theirproducts. However, data on active ingredient toxicity may be accessibleonly with difficulty to those end-use product formulators who are not registrantsof the technical products they use. The Agency also considered basing reentryintervals on formulated product toxicity in order to facilitate determinationof intervals by registrants, but rejected this approach as inconsistentwith its own toxicological assessment of reentry hazards.The Agency proposes instead to attempt to develop a list of active ingredientsused on agricultural sites and their corresponding interim reentry intervals,determined according to the criteria enumerated in this proposal. Sucha list would be made available to registrants to serve as a guide in determiningapplicable reentry intervals. Availability of a list would greatly facilitateconsistent reentry interval determination by registrants and the Agency.The list would also include those active ingredients with existing intervalsand any revision to the existing interval.(vii) <T3>Modification. </T3>The Agency proposes to consider modification ofthe interim reentry intervals in this proposal on a case-by-case basisunder certain circumstances.The Agency recognizes that certain products which are highly toxic in concentratedform, but which are used with very low application rates, may not presenta reentry hazard because their exposure potential for workers is very low.Certain formulations are designed to be applied at rates of a few ouncesper acre. Other aspects of the pesticide product and its use may also affectthe appropriate interval length or even the need for a specific interval.These aspects may include use patterns which make penetration into thehuman system unlikely, and properties which bind the residue to the treatedsurface or otherwise prevent the residue from transferring to humans.The Agency also recognizes that particular reentry intervals may not besufficiently protective of workers for specific pesticide products, pesticideuses, or worker exposure scenarios. Established reentry intervals may notbe long enough, for example, when skin sensitivity and other nonquantifiableeffects are observed.Under proposed andSection; 156.210(g), registrants and other persons couldsubmit data demonstrating that exposure levels resulting from the applicationof a pesticide product warrant a shorter or longer reentry interval. Datamay be in accordance with Part 158 requirements and Subpart K of the PesticideAssessment Guidelines, or may be other data enabling the Agency to makea determination of potential risk to workers from use of the product. Suchdata would be used to evaluate a proposal to modify a specific reentryinterval, but it is unlikely that the Agency would eliminate the ``minimum''reentry interval for a product.The Agency would also consider modification of interim reentry intervalsunder proposed andSection; 156.210(f), whereby the Agency would reevaluatethe reentry interval established for any pesticide entering Special Reviewfor human health effects. The Agency will evaluate the reentry intervalat the beginning of any Special Review in light of all available data,which will enable a more pesticide-specific reentry interval to be set.3. <T3>Other reentry restrictions</T3>_a. <T3>Basic requirement.</T3> EPA proposes to clarify the language of thepresent Part 170 concerning reentry restrictions, but does not intend toalter the basic requirements it sets forth. No worker may reenter a treatedarea during a reentry interval, unless the worker is wearing appropriatePPE and has received other appropriate protections, or unless the workeris performing tasks that do not involve contact with pesticide-treatedsurfaces. EPA proposes similar language for farm, forest, nursery and greenhousereentry in this regard (andSection;andSection; 170.46, 170.56, 170.66).b. <T3>Early reentry without contact with treated surfaces.</T3> The presentPart 170 allows workers to reenter a treated area without protective clothingbefore the expiration of the reentry interval if they are performing taskswhich are not hand labor tasks. PR Notice 83-2, implementing the presentPart 170, listed those food and feed crops which were determined by theAgency to use hand labor tasks, including: Recognized crop production activitiesas harvesting, detasseling, thinning, weeding, topping, planting, suckerremoval, pruning, disbudding, and roguing. California, Texas and NorthCarolina regulations permit reentry without protective clothing if thereis no ``substantial and prolonged contact'' with treated surfaces.The Agency believes that tasks such as scouting and working with irrigationequipment, which are not ordinarily considered to be ``hand labor tasks''but which are common to virtually all types of agricultural production,may result in substantial contact with treated surfaces and adverse effectson workers. Therefore, the Agency proposes to allow early reentry intopesticide-treated areas without appropriate protective measures only whenthere will be no contact with pesticide-treated surfaces (andSection; 170.46(a)(1)).Immediately after application and until pesticide sprays and dusts havesettled, pesticide residues would be in the air and would contact enteringworkers under most circumstances. An example of permissible reentry atthis time without protective measures would be activities performed whilein enclosed vehicles. After sprays and dusts have settled, early reentryactivities would be permitted without the use of PPE depending on wherethe pesticide residues were located. If soil incorporation were the applicationtechnique, any activity which did not involve worker contact with the soilsubsurface would be allowed, whereas hand hoeing, planting, transplanting,weeding, thinning, and harvesting of root crops would not be permissible.When the application is to the soil or planting media surface, or if theagricultural plant is very short (less than a few inches tall), workerswalking through the area or performing activities which do not involvehand contact with the soil, planting media, or plant can avoid contactwith the residue by wearing chemical-resistant boots, shoe coverings, orshoes.Workers in vehicles such as tractors, which place them away from the pesticideresidues, would be allowed unprotected reentry after sprays and dusts havesettled. However, if the crop is tall and dense and could brush againstthe vehicle operator, or if trees or other tall plants might drop pesticideresidues on the operator from overhead, then protective measures wouldbe required.In greenhouses and nurseries, unprotected reentry to walk between benchesand to perform tasks at adjoining benches or even on adjoining plants wouldbe permissible as soon as pesticide sprays and dusts have settled or pesticidevapors have dispersed. At that time the specific reentry interval (prohibitingunprotected contact for a period of hours or days) would apply to the plant(s)or planting media to which the pesticide application was directed.c. <T3>Early reentry with contact with treated surfaces.</T3> California considersthat wearing PPE for long periods of time in conditions which are commonlyhot and humid is impractical and often results in the workers removingthe PPE. California therefore prohibits reentry to perform tasks involvingsubstantial and prolonged contact with treated surfaces until the reentryinterval has expired. EPA has concluded that many situations arise duringthe production of agricultural plants which require worker reentry intopesticide-treated areas before the expiration of the reentry interval,particularly when the reentry interval extends longer than 24 hours, andtherefore proposes to permit such early reentry (andSection; 170.46(a)(2)).However, the Agency proposes to impose certain conditions on early reentryto ensure that early reentry workers are adequately protected.Before sprays have dried, dusts have settled, or vapors have dispersed,conditions are essentially similar to application conditions. Even whenwearing PPE, hand laborers reentering during this time for a typical 8to 10 hour work day will encounter prolonged and substantial contact withpesticides that may constitute an unacceptable level of exposure. Therefore,the Agency is proposing to prohibit entirely reentry to perform hand labortasks such as weeding or harvesting before sprays have dried, dusts havesettled, or vapors have dispersed (andSection; 170.46(b)). Short-term application,irrigation, or emergency crop management practices are allowable becausethese activities involve less contact with treated surfaces. These mayinclude: Traversing the area; IPM scouting; minor adjustments to, repairingof, or turning on and off irrigation or application equipment; actionsto prevent crop loss from frost, wind, or other weather damage; and checkingfor appropriate pesticide dispersal and distribution patterns. These short-termtasks are permitted only if certain protective measures are taken (andSection;170.46(a)(2) (i) through (v), discussed below).After sprays have dried, dusts have settled, or vapors have dispersed,worker reentry to perform any tasks (hand labor or other) in an area thatis still under a specific interval would be permissible if the same protectivemeasures are taken (andSection; 170.46(a)(2) (i) through (v)).The Agency considers the risk of exposure for early reentry workers, whetherentering before or after expiration of the minimum reentry interval, tobe comparable to the risk for pesticide handlers. In some instances, earlyreentry workers may receive greater exposure than that encountered by anapplicator of the pesticide, e.g., where foliage is drenched or where adiluent has evaporated. The Agency proposes to require that early reentryworkers receive protections similar to those required for handlers (andSection;170.46(a)(2) (i) through (v)). They must be provided with the same PPE,training, and decontamination facilities, with the exception of workersentering after the minimum reentry interval, for whom different PPE requirementsapply (see unit III.H.2.b. above for further discussion).The Agency anticipates that agricultural producers will seldom requireworkers to reenter treated areas before the reentry interval has expired,because of the increased risk to the workers; the cost of providing personalprotective equipment, decontamination water, and training; and the problemsrelated to heat-induced illnesses. Since most agricultural management practicescan be carried out after the reentry interval expires, few workers willneed these protective measures.d. <T3>Reentry after the expiration of the reentry interval.</T3> When product-specificreentry intervals are established by the Agency after review of Part 158reentry data, those reentry intervals are usually based on a no-observable-effectlevel (NOEL), such that PPE and other protective measures are not necessaryafter the reentry interval has lapsed. Similarly, EPA believes the proposedinterim reentry intervals are of sufficient length to allow workers toreenter the pesticide-treated area without protective clothing after theinterval has expired. No PPE requirements or other protective measuresare proposed for workers reentering after expiration of the reentry interval,other than the availability of water for routine decontamination (andSection;170.38).e. <T3>Multiple reentry intervals.</T3> If two or more pesticide productsare applied in combination the Agency proposes to require that the longestof the applicable reentry intervals be observed (andSection; 170.46(c)).The Agency considered a requirement such as is found in California, wherebyin case of multiple applications the reentry interval is increased by 50percent of the longest of the applicable intervals. This requirement isapparently based on the possibility of increased toxicity due to synergisticeffects. The Agency is not aware of synergistic effects of pesticide combinationsthat would justify such a requirement and does not propose a similar requirement.Under normal circumstances, sprays will have dried, dusts will have settled,or vapors will have dispersed long before any additional specific reentryinterval has expired. However, in special circumstances of high humidity,extremely dense crop stands, or oil formulations, the pesticide spraysmay not have dried before the specific reentry interval expires. The Agencyintends that the reentry-restricted period extend until both the specific(period listed in the product label) and the minimum (until sprays havedried, dusts have settled, and vapors have dispersed) reentry intervalshave expired, and has made this explicit in this proposal (andSection; 170.46(c)).f. <T3>Greenhouses.</T3> Greenhouses present an exposure scenario where activitiesof many workers may occur in quite close proximity. At the same time, thevolume and direction of air movement can usually be controlled by meansof ventilation during and after application of pesticides, unlike in outdoorexposure situations. The Agency has attempted to provide for access tonontreated areas in greenhouses as soon as can be safely accomplished followingapplication. EPA proposes to accomplish this by defining ``reentry-restrictedareas'' on the basis of particular application techniques and pesticideformulations used in greenhouses (andSection; 170.66(b)). The Agency is proposingthree types of ``reentry restricted areas'': (1) Where fumigants are used;(2) when applications are ``bench-directed''; or (3) when applicationsare ``plant-directed''.The use of fumigants (pesticides in a gaseous state) in greenhouses iswidespread because they offer a method of controlling virtually all ofthe insect and mite pests in one application. Fumigants are applied soas to totally fill the enclosed space. The Agency proposes to restrictreentry to the entire greenhouse, regardless of where the fumigant is releasedwithin the structure, until all fumigant vapors have dispersed (andSection;170.66(b)(1)), and has defined ventilation criteria for determining safedispersal times based on the few data that exist in this area (Waldron,102). While the Agency is aware that such structures vary widely in ventilationcapacity and techniques, the Agency has defined dispersal times in termsof two principal methods of ventilation, mechanical (fans) and passive(windows and doors). The Agency has also taken into account the commongreenhouse practice of fumigation at the end of the work day followed byslow vapor dispersal overnight; in this case less ventilation is requiredthe following day, whether mechanical or passive. If no mechanical or passiveventilation is used, as would be the case, for example, when cold outsideair would injure plants inside the greenhouse, then a mimimum vapor dispersalperiod of 24 hours following fumigation must be observed before unprotectedreentry is allowed. Finally, if the fumigant product label indicates aPermissible Exposure Level (PEL), compliance with the PEL by measuringpesticide vapor levels would meet the vapor dispersal requirement.Airborne pesticides other than fumigants, such as aerosols, fogs, smokebombs, and thermal fogs are used in greenhouses. These products move throughthe air and disperse evenly throughout an enclosed area. However, unlikefumigants, which dissipate entirely in the air, these applications leaveresidues on plant and soil surfaces which may be a reentry hazard to workers.Therefore, as with fumigants, the Agency proposes that the reentry-restrictedarea be the entire enclosed area (andSection; 170.66(b)(2)). Unlike fumigants,if these pesticides have a reentry interval listed on the pesticide labelrequiring a longer reentry restriction than ``until vapors have dispersed'',it must be observed.Other applications in greenhouses may involve soil-incorporation or applicationto the soil or base of plants, using low pressure and coarse spray droplets.These applications tend to remain in the area to which they are directedand usually present a low hazard to workers at nearby benches or walkways.The Agency proposes a reentry-restricted area for such ``soil-directed''application limited to the bench or area to which the pesticide is directed(andSection; 170.66(b)(3)). However, if the pesticide labeling requires theuse of a respirator for ground applicators of the pesticide, then the pesticideis toxic by the inhalation route of entry and often highly volatile. Workersnearby may be at risk if the vapors move off the target area. Therefore,these pesticides, even if they meet the other criteria for ``soil-directed''applications, must meet reentry requirements for the ``plant-directed''category.All other applications in greenhouses are categorized as ``plant-directed''applications. These are usually spray or dust applications. These pesticideapplications tend to move off-target during application and may pose ahazard to workers at nearby benches or walkways; however, they do not necessitatevacating unprotected workers from an entire greenhouse, which may coveran area of an acre of more. The Agency proposes two options by which unprotectedworkers can be protected without vacating the entire greenhouse: (1) Anonporous subenclosure, such as a curtain system, can be formed aroundthe area to be treated and left in place until the sprays or dusts havesettled; or (2) the ventilation can be turned off during application anduntil the pesticide sprays or dusts have settled (andSection; 170.66(b)(4)).In the first case the reentry-restricted area is the pesticide-treatedarea; in the second case it is an area 25 feet in all directions from theborder of the treated area. With little air movement, airborne spray andparticulate matter will not drift far from the application site.When ``plant-directed'' application techniques are used, the reentry-restrictedarea would be larger than the treated area due to concern over airborneparticulates and spray drift posing an inhalation hazard to nearby workers.After sprays or dusts have settled, the inhalation hazard from drift isremoved. Between the time when the pesticide sprays or dusts have settledand the end of the specific reentry interval (if any exists for that pesticide),the reentry-restricted area would consist of the treated area only. Unprotectedworkers can resume work at nearby benches or use walkways between benches.g. <T3>Nurseries.</T3> The Agency proposes that reentry in nurseries be governedin a manner similar to reentry in greenhouses, with certain exceptions(andSection; 170.56(b)). Nurseries generally are not able to control drifthazards through control of ventilation and partitioning. While adequatedata on pesticide drift during application in nurseries are lacking, theAgency believes that pesticide drift during application represents a significanthazard to nearby nursery workers. This is due to production areas whichare closely spaced, and often of small, even single-plant, size.The Agency therefore proposes to establish reentry-restricted areas innurseries as in greenhouses, determined by the method of application. Forsoil-directed applications the reentry-restricted area would be the pesticide-treatedarea, except for inhalation hazard pesticides. For ``downward-directed''(as defined) applications the restricted area would extend 10 feet on allsides and 25 feet downwind. For all other applications, including aerial,high-pressure, and ``upward-directed'' application, the restricted areawould include any areas outside the treated area that are moistened ordusted under the particular conditions of application. The Agency believessuch reentry-restricted areas are a reasonable approach to reducing drifthazards in nurseries.J. Decontamination 1. <T3>Proposal and rationale</T3>. The Agency proposes that workers be providedwith water, soap, and single-use towels for purposes of decontaminationafter exposure to pesticides or pesticide residues (andSection;andSection;170.18 and 170.38). The Agency believes that the proposed decontaminationprovisions would reduce the incidence of eye injuries and skin irritationin workers, as well as reducing the risk of chronic effects from routineexposure to pesticides. Workers entering pesticide-treated areas after reentry intervals have expiredmay be routinely exposed to pesticide residues. Exposure is primarily dermal,but may be oral or ocular through hand-to-mouth and hand-to-eye transfer.Acute pesticide poisioning risk under these circumstances is generallyexpected to be low; however, routine occupational exposure to low levelsof dislodgeable residues may present significant chronic risks to workers.Handling and early reentry activities present a much higher risk of accidentalexposure and acute injury than does entry into treated areas only afterthe reentry interval has expired. The Agency has identified two types ofemergency exposure scenarios which are applicable during handling and earlyreentry tasks: Eye contamination and whole-body contamination. Accidentaleye contact with a pesticide with high eye irritation potential may resultin eye damage. Large spills of the pesticide being mixed or loaded maycontaminate much of the body, and flaggers may be directly sprayed duringapplication. There is also potential for ``hot spots'' in fields followingapplication which would expose early reentry workers to higher concentrationsof residues than would otherwise be expected. Washing is a generally accepted practice for reducing dermal exposure topesticides and pesticide residues. Washing before eating, drinking, orusing tobacco can reduce oral exposure as well, which can occur if pesticideresidues are transferred from hands to mouth. Washing before using thetoilet is also important, since the scrotal skin absorbs pesticides approximately12 times more efficiently than the skin of the forearm. Immediate flushing with water is the commonly accepted emergency responsefor direct eye and dermal exposure to pesticides. If significant delayoccurs, permanent eye damage, severe skin irritation, or significant dermalabsorption can result. The Agency is aware of at least one instance inwhich washing appeared to be lifesaving (Hayes, 35). Two workers were splashedwith parathion. One worker, who bathed and changed clothes, showed no symptoms.The other worker, who did not bathe or change clothes, died in less than24 hours. 2. <T3>When required. </T3>Water, soap, and single-use towels would be madeavailable during any work activity where there is potential worker contactwith concentrated or diluted pesticides or with surfaces that have beentreated with pesticides, including duff, soil, other planting media, standingwater, or agricultural plants themselves. For pesticide handlers and earlyreentry workers, decontamination provisions would be required at all timessince these activities harbor the greatest potential for adverse effects.For persons working in treated areas after the reentry interval has expired,the Agency proposes to limit the requirement to activities in areas thathave been treated during the current growing season. While reentry intervalsare established by the Agency in an attempt to limit entry when adverseeffects are most likely, residues of concern have been known to persistlong after such intervals under certain climatic conditions. For example,a recently reported poisoning incident in California occurred followingworker reentry at least 90 days after application. These provisions willensure that field workers may routinely wash when pesticides are beingused where they work, yet not impose a decontamination requirement wherepesticides are never used or have only been used in previous years or growingseasons. This proposal appears to strike a reasonable balance between theconcern for dissipation of residues and avoiding needless costs. 3. <T3>Water quality. </T3>The Agency proposes to require potable water fordecontamination. The Occupational Safety and Health Administration's FieldSanitation Standard (29 CFR 1928.110) requires potable water in the fieldsfor hand laborers, intended not only for washing but also for drinkingpurposes. Even though EPA's proposed requirement is intended to providewater only for washing, in practice the water may be used by workers fordrinking as well. In addition, only ``potable'' water can be defined insuch a way that noncompliance can be clearly ascertained. Potability canbe determined when necessary by testing of concentrations of specific contaminants.Either State or local drinking water standards or the Federal interim standards(40 CFR Part 141) would be acceptable measures of potability. 4. <T3>Water temperature. </T3>The Agency proposes that water be providedat a temperature that will not injure the eyes. Extreme temperatures mayinjure the eyes, and would in any case discourage worker use, renderingthe provision ineffective. The Agency also considered two other options:First, no temperature requirement, which would be consistent with the OSHAField Sanitation Standard; second, requiring the water to be within a specifictemperature range, such as not greater than 100 or less than 40 degreesF. Comment is solicited on this water temperature proposal. 5. <T3>Exception for short-term exposure. </T3>The Agency considered the optionof an exception from the decontamination requirements for workers who areexposed to pesticides for less than three hours, or some other time interval.Contamination levels may increase with time of exposure; in addition, theuse of a three hour exception would be consistent with the OSHA Field SanitationStandard. Comment is solicited on this option.6. <T3>Water quantity.</T3> Water must be made available in sufficient quantitiesfor normal hand and face washing by all workers using the water, and foremergency whole-body decontamination when such accidental exposure is possible,as in the case of handlers and early reentry workers. The Agency consideredrequiring minimum starting volumes of water based on the type of work activityalong with a replenishment requirement. While such specification standardsmay be easier to enforce, actual water needs are expected to vary widelywith circumstances such as weather and number of workers. The Agency proposesto require ``an adequate supply'' of water, allowing flexibility accordingto the particular circumstances. Any available supply of potable runningwater will meet the quantity requirement. It is anticipated that most greenhouses,many nurseries, and some farms and forests will have running water available.The Agency solicits comment on this water quantity proposal.7. <T3>Water storage.</T3> Water tanks can be contaminated due to backflowfrom mix containers and application equipment during mixing/loading. Therefore,this proposal requires separate water sources for mixing of pesticidesand for decontamination, unless the water source is equipped with valvesto prevent backflow during mixing operations, or unless a source of runningwater is used.8. <T3>Water location.</T3> The Agency proposes that the water be reasonablyaccessible from each worker's place of work. The Agency considered requiringa specific maximum distance from each worker within which the water mustbe located. Such an approach is taken by the OSHA Field Sanitation Standard.However, the Agency believes that ``accessibility'' will vary widely withthe particular establishment, depending on the location of access roadsby which water supplies must be transported and the movement of workersthrough the fields. The Agency intends that water be located as near toworkers as is practicable under the circumstances, so that workers wouldnot be discouraged from routine washing by the distance they must travelto the facilities. The water may not be located within a pesticide-treatedarea before expiration of its reentry interval. The Agency solicits commenton this water location proposal.9. <T3>Eye flushing. </T3>The Agency proposes that an eye flush dispenserbe provided during handling and early reentry situations involving a productwhich is a potentially significant eye irritant, i.e., Toxicity CategoryI or II for eye irritation, signified to the user by a goggles or faceshield requirement on the labeling (andSection; 170.18(c)). The dispenserwould be immediately available for emergency use, e.g., it would be carriedby the handler on his person or vehicle. Since such dispensers delivera slow, constant stream of water, the quantity of water need not be largeto achieve adequate flushing; a minimum of 1 pint is proposed. The UnitedStates Forest Service has a similar dispenser requirement for pesticideapplicators in the Southeastern U.S. The Agency solicits comment on whetherthe dispenser needs to be available during all activities or only certainones, whether each worker should carry a dispenser, and whether carryinga one pint dispenser on one's person represents a health hazard from possibleheat stress due to the extra weight.10. <T3>Other requirements.</T3> For efficient pesticide removal, the surfactantqualities of soap are necessary during washing. The agency therefore proposesto require that soap be made available. The Agency also proposes to requiresingle-use drying materials, such as paper towels, which would lessen thelikelihood of washed hands being recontaminated by workers wiping themon their clothing. However, the Agency has received comments that workersmay tend to incompletely wipe off residues with the towels rather thanwashing, and that vigorous rubbing could cause an abrasion of the skinand actually increase absorption of pesticide residues.In addition, a change of clean clothing, such as a ``one size fits all''coverall, would be available at each decontamination location for handlersand early reentry workers for use if clothing becomes saturated by a largespill or direct spraying. This would encourage workers whose clothing hasbeen penetrated by a pesticide to remove it immediately to avoid or limitdermal absorption.11. <T3>Other Federal and state regulation related to the proposed decontaminationrequirements. </T3>The OSHA Field Sanitation Standard includes requirementsfor water for handwashing, and some States have created requirements ofthis type which differ slightly from the OSHA standard. While such generalsanitation requirements would provide for adequate pesticide decontaminationunder many circumstances, they do not cover many workers the Agency proposesto protect nor provide for adequate protection from certain hazards.For example, coverage of the Field Sanitation Standard is limited to agriculturalestablishments where eleven or more employees are engaged on any givenday in hand-labor operations in the field. However, the Agency believesthat persons who handle pesticides, as well as workers in greenhouses,nurseries, and forests, and on small farms, may face an unreasonable riskof pesticide exposure which a decontamination water requirement would helpto reduce. EPA also proposes a backflow valve requirement to address theproblem of backsiphoning, a water temperature requirement to preclude eyeinjuries, and a prohibition on locating the water within a pesticide treatedarea. These requirements are not found in OSHA's standard, yet the Agencybelieves they are necessary to reduce the risk of specific pesticide hazards.OSHA exempts workers who are in the field less than three hours from itsrequirements, whereas the Agency believes that significant pesticide exposuresrequiring decontamination could occur during this time. Finally, OSHA specifiesa maximum distance of the facilities from the worker's place of work. EPAbelieves that accessibility will vary by geography and layout of establishmentand cannot be universally defined; however, a location within the one quartermile OSHA standard would be considered reasonably accessible by EPA.Beyond these difference, EPA has employed the regulatory wording in OSHA'sstandard whenever possible to avoid any inference on the part of responsibleparties of the need for duplicative facilities. While interpretation ofthe Field Sanitation Standard clearly rests with OSHA and the courts, theAgency believes that an employer in compliance with EPA's decontaminationrequirements would to a great extent be assured of compliance with OSHA'shandwashing requirements, such that more than one facility would not benecessary.For the foregoing reasons, the Agency believes it is necessary to includedecontamination requirements in this proposal despite some overlap withOSHA and state regulations. However, the Agency does not intend to preemptthese other general sanitation requirements for agricultural workers whosepurpose and provisions may be similar to those in this proposal. Toiletand drinking water facilities for agricultural workers, such as are containedin the OSHA standard, are entirely outside of the purview of this proposal.EPA solicits comment on any of the issues raised here.K. Emergency Duties1. <T3>General. </T3>Although the Agency believes that precautions such asreentry restrictions, PPE, decontamination procedures, and training willdecrease the frequency of acute pesticide poisoning or injury incidents,medical emergencies involving agricultural workers and handlers may stillarise. In such cases prompt medical treatment is a necessity to mitigatethe extent and intensity of the injury or poisoning. Many agriculturallaborers migrate throughout the year and may not be familiar with a physicianor treatment center in each place they work. EPA proposes that all workersbe informed of the name, address, and telephone number of the nearest physician,clinic, or hospital equipped to provide medical care in a pesticide poisoningor injury emergency. This information would be required to be displayedin a prominent location on the agricultural establishment at all times(andSection; 170.32(f)(1)).2. <T3>Emergency transportation. </T3>In a pesticide poisoning or injury emergency,the victims may be unable to transport themselves to the nearest medicalfacility with private or public transportation. EPA proposes that prompttransportation to an appropriate medical facility be made available toworkers and handlers who have grounds to suspect pesticide poisoning orinjury, or when a pesticide exposure has occurred which might reasonablybe expected to result in pesticide poisoning or injury (andSection; 170.34(a)).3. <T3>Emergency information. </T3>In a suspected pesticide poisoning or injury,effective medical care can be provided only through a correct diagnosisand prompt administration of the appropriate antidote or treatment. A doctormust know the name of the product or active ingredient to which the workeror handler has been exposed. Information can then be located about thecommon signs and symptoms of pesticide poisoning or injury specific tothat pesticide, diagnostic procedures, and appropriate treatment programs,including the antidote if one exists. EPA proposes that in an emergency,workers and handlers be provided, if available, the product name, registrationnumber, active ingredient(s), and first aid or antidote information forany agricultural pesticide product which has been used on the property(andSection; 170.34(b)). Pesticide users must likewise provide any otheravailable information relating to pesticide use which may be useful fortreatment. This information would be required to be provided to workerswho have grounds for suspecting pesticide poisoning or injury to themselvesor to another worker, and to medical treatment personnel, upon the requestof those persons. EPA believes that this information normally is availableto pesticide users from the label of the product, although the requirementto provide information would not specifically require that the user maintainrecords or keep pesticide labels or containers.L. Cholinesterase Monitoring1. <T3>Proposal and rationale. </T3>EPA proposes testing of cholinesteraselevels in commercial pesticide handlers who are exposed to Toxicity CategoryI or II organophosphate pesticides for 3 consecutive days or for any 6days in a 21-year period (andSection; 170.20).Significant or prolonged exposure of workers to organophosphate pesticidescan result in significant cholinesterase inhibition, leading to systemicillness and other adverse health effects (Maddy and Edmiston, 54; Coye,14; Morgan, 61; Hayes, 36). A worker's cholinesterase level may drop belowa safe level because of excessive exposure due to poor work practices orthe occurrence of an accident (Coye et al., 15). A variety of biologicaltests, including blood and urinary metabolite testing, can be used to detectan individual's pesticide exposure. However, many of these tests are relativelydifficult and expensive to perform. Measurement of the level of the enzymecholinesterase in the blood has been demonstrated to be a satisfactorybiological index of excessive organophosphate exposure (Coye, 14) and iswidely and inexpensively used for this purpose. Cholinesterase monitoringwould accomplish a twofold purpose: (1) It would detect significant organophosphatepesticide exposure that would warrant worker removal from exposure, and(2) it would serve as a surveillance mechanism to identify workplace situationswhich require modification to minimize exposure to organophosphate pesticides.California, at least one national lawn-care company, and at least two majorFlorida agricultural producers have had cholinesterase monitoring programsin operation for 8 to 12 years. Experts associated with these programsbelieve that cholinesterase monitoring has been successful in reducingworker exposure to pesticides and identifying workplace situations whichrequire modification (Yeary, 110; Maddy, 52; Ames, 114). Some commercialapplicator firms find cholinesterase monitoring an effective means forimproved supervision and education of employees who handle pesticides andas a result employees are less likely to experience adverse effects fromexposure (Yeary, 110; Mengle, 58).Major agricultural producers with cholinesterase monitoring programs havereported that monitoring of their field workers and handlers has been significantfrom a profit and loss standpoint. They claim that the cost of their liabilityinsurance premiums (purchasing high deductible policies), plus the costof their payouts for accidents not covered by insurance (deductible notreached), plus the cost of cholinesterase monitoring, is less than thecost of the liability insurance with low deductible policies.The deficiencies of cholinesterase monitoring as a regulatory tool include:(1) Cholinesterase depression and the symptoms associated with it can alsobe caused by illness other than organophosphate poisoning, and by excessiveconsumption of alcohol (Morgan, 61); (2) there is variability in the plasmacholinesterase tests results; (3) normal cholinesterase levels vary markedlyamong individuals; and (4) there is variability in quality control amonglaboratories. The Agency believes that these drawbacks can be overcomeif appropriate guidelines are followed.2. <T3>Workers to be monitored. </T3>The Agency considered whether to includein the cholinesterase monitoring provisions: (1) All workers, includingfield workers, (2) pesticide handlers only, or (3) commercial pesticidehandlers only. The Agency proposes to require monitoring of commercialpesticide handlers. Pesticide handlers are at greatest risk from acuteeffects of organophosphate pesticides because they are exposed to cholinesterase-inhibitingpesticides themselves rather than their residues. Commercial handlers tendto be at greater risk than private handlers due to greater frequency ofhandling activities; in addition, cholinesterase monitoring would imposesignificant costs on private handlers. EPA anticipates that reentry intervalswill significantly reduce the exposure of field workers to organophosphatepesticides. The Agency solicits comment on the proposed types of workersto be monitored, including whether the requirement should be extended toprivate handlers.3. <T3>Pesticides to be monitored. </T3>The Agency proposes to require cholinesterasemonitoring based on a handler's frequency of exposure to Toxicity CategoryI or II organophosphate pesticides. While it is recognized that N-methylcarbamate pesticides can also depress cholinesterase levels, the cholinesterasetest is not a useful indicator in this case because it generally showsnormal levels within a few minutes or hours after carbamate exposure (Morgan,61). This is due to the relatively rapid regeneration of cholinesteraseafter N-methyl carbamate exposure. However, the Agency proposes that bothclasses of cholinesterase inhibiting pesticides be labeled so that userswould be aware of possible cholinesterase inhibition from their use. Suchlabeling could be especially important if the worker's cholinesterase levelsare already depressed from earlier exposure.The Agency is aware that California has undertaken an evaluation of itscholinesterase monitoring program (Ames et al., 114). It indicated amongother things that certain pesticides, primarily organophosphates in ToxicityCategory I, may cause more poisoning incidents in that State than otherpesticides. The Agency considered whether the proposed monitoring requirementshould therefore be limited to a smaller subset of pesticides. It wouldbe possible based on this data to identify a ``top 5'' or ``top 10'' incident-causingpesticides. Alternatively, the Agency could limit the exposure triggerfor monitoring to organophosphates in Toxicity Category I. The Agency solicitscomment on these monitoring options, and any available data on incidentsof cholinesterase inhibition among pesticide handlers.4.<T3> Exposure trigger.</T3> States and companies have set different exposuretriggers for when a worker must receive cholinesterase monitoring. Californiarequires any worker exposed for 30 hours in a 30-day period to receivesuch monitoring. The concern with this hour-based trigger is the complexityof determining which workers need to receive cholinesterase monitoring.The Agency selected a day-based exposure trigger (3 consecutive days orany 6 days in a 21-day period) because it would be relatively easy to identifyworkers who meet the trigger. Exposure on a given day is intended to meanexposure for any part of the work day. This trigger excludes handlers receivingless frequent organophosphate exposure because cholinesterase levels regenerateat a rate of approximately 1 percent per day and are less likely to reachdangerously low levels with less frequent exposure (Coye, 14). The Agencyseeks comment on whether a more sensitive trigger (with fewer days of exposure)would be more appropriate in identifying persons for whom monitoring wouldbe useful.The Agency considered the option that early symptoms of exposure shouldtrigger the monitoring requirements instead of a day-based trigger. Asanother option, a symptom-based trigger may be useful to bring individualsinto a monitoring program who are not covered by the day-based trigger,yet who may be more sensitive to cholinesterase inhibition than the averageperson. The Agency believes that the usefulness of monitoring is as a preventativerequirement. A symptom-based trigger would necessarily allow the firstcholinesterase inhibition effects to occur in the hope of preventing future,more severe effects. Initial cholinesterase inhibition symptoms are oftendifficult to distinguish from some other common illnesses. The Agency solicitscomment on the difficulty, costs, and advantages of both day-based andsymptom-based approaches.5.<T3> Employer responsibilities and benefits.</T3> Responsibility for cholinesterasemonitoring of pesticide handlers rests specifically with the employer ofthe handler. The Agency proposes to require the employer to contract witha licensed physician to provide cholinesterase monitoring services. Thisagreement must provide that the physician use Agency guidelines or otherequivalent standardized procedures. The agreement must also require thephysician to notify the employer under three circumstances: When the handler'scholinesterase has decreased to a level of concern, so that improvementsin work practices are needed to reduce organophosphate exposure and raisecholinesterase levels; when dangerous levels have been reached that warrantimmediate removal from exposure; and when cholinesterase has regeneratedenough to allow the handler to return to work involving cholinesteraseinhibitor exposure. This proposal would require the employer to followall recommendations of the physician concerning handler monitoring, includingfrequency of testing and recommendations for removal from and return towork involving cholinesterase inhibitor exposure.In order for the persons being monitored to understand that they may havebeen over-exposed to cholinesterase inhibitors and that they should reduceor eliminate exposure in order to protect themselves, the Agency proposesthat the employer assure that handlers being monitored be informed whena physician has recommended either modifications to work practices or removalfrom exposure due to excessive cholinesterase inhibition. This informationwould permit such handlers to protect themselves form further exposure,both on the job at which they are monitored and at other times.The Agency proposes that employers of commercial pesticide handlers maintaina record of any monitoring agreement, as well as exposure records for allemployees who handle organophosphate pesticides with the signal word DANGERor WARNING on the label, including the date of handling and name of thepesticide handled (andSection; 170.20(c)). These records would be used forenforcement purposes to determine if the employer has a mechanism for cholinesterasemonitoring of employees in place, and if employees handle organophosphatepesticides frequently enough to require monitoring.Based on information provided by state enforcement officials, EPA expectsthat most commercial handler employers can readily identify their workerswho frequently handle pesticides and who would be covered by this provision,so that extensive recordkeeping rquirements should not be necessary toenforce this provision. Employers generally maintain similar records forthe day-to-day operation of their businesses. Basing the trigger on thenumber of days exposed rather than the number of hours exposed would furtherminimize the recordkeeping requirements.The employer of the pesticide handler most likely would bear the cost ofcholinesterase monitoring as part of the cost of doing business. Cholinesterasemonitoring indicates to workers there is a concern about their health andsafety, improves employer supervision of work practices, and educates theworker and the supervisor about the toxic effects of pesticides. Thesefactors may reduce the extent and severity of accidents at the workplacewhich can lead to reduced insurance costs and reduced medical expenses.6. <T3>Monitoring personnel.</T3> California requires the employer to contractwith a physician for monitoring services. Some companies use computerizedlaboratory equipment under the supervision of a technician for the samepurpose. The Agency proposes that employers be required to employ or contractwith a licensed physician to supervise monitoring. A physician is necessaryto interpret cholinesterase test results and recommend appropriate actionin accordance with guidelines for cholinesterase monitoring. 7. <T3>State activities.</T3> Some States and companies currently have adequatecholinesterase monitoring programs in place. In order to minimize disruptionsto these programs, the Agency proposes that States have discretionary authorityto approve cholinesterase monitoring programs that are substantially equivalentto this proposal. Employers in States not exercising this oversight ofmonitoring must meet the minimum requirements in this proposal. States may assist in implementing these provisions in other ways. Theymay reproduce and make the guidelines for cholinesterase monitoring producedby EPA available upon request to pesticide handlers, employers of pesticidehandlers, and physicians. They may also require physicians to report removals,such as California does, and recommend modifications of agricultural pesticidehandling practices to avoid excessive exposure. 8. <T3>Guidelines from EPA.</T3> The Agency considered including requirementsfor specific cholinesterase monitoring procedures, such as frequency oftesting and removal levels, in this proposal. While some data are availableon which to base such requirements, the Agency believes this would intrudeinto the area of professional medical judgment, as well as be difficultto enforce against persons who are so indirectly connected with actualpesticide use. The Agency proposes instead to furnish States with guidelinesfor the cholinesterase monitoring program. These guidelines will coverareas such as: (1) Appropriate test methods for performing cholinesterasedeterminations, (2) establishing baseline levels, (3) considerations indetermining the frequency of testing, (4) recommendations that the samelaboratory and method be used for repeated testing, (5) laboratory qualitycontrol procedures, and (6) recommendations for when a worker should beremoved from organophosphate pesticides based on the cholinesterase measurements.9. <T3>Availability and certification of laboratories.</T3> Presently, veryfew laboratories are performing cholinesterase testing. However, the Agencybelieves that an adequate number of laboratories have the technical capacityto perform the tests, and that the clinical laboratory market is very competitiveand would respond to the need. The California State Department of Healthapproves the laboratories performing cholinesterase testing in that State.While the Agency does not propose to require certification at the Federallevel or through the States, States may undertake to certify the laboratories.10. <T3>Reevaluation of cholinesterase monitoring.</T3> The Agency proposesto reevaluate the proposed cholinesterase monitoring requirements afterthree years to determine the effectiveness of the program. Over this timeperiod sufficient experience would be gained to enable a well-designedstudy to determine whether cholinesterase monitoring on a nationwide basisshould be continued, perhaps with modifications, or eliminated. M. Juvenile Workers The present Part 170 contains no requirements uniquely applicable to juvenileworkers or handlers. The Agency has considered the risk of pesticide exposureto such workers and has concluded that the information available at thistime does not provide an adequate basis for proposing special requirementsbased on age. Therefore, juvenile and adult workers are treated alike underthis proposal. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Proposed Labeling Requirements</ITAG>A. BackgroundIt is a violation of FIFRA section 12(a)(2)(G) to use a pesticide in amanner inconsistent with its labeling. This provision of FIFRA requiringusers to abide by the pesticide label is the primary (but not the sole)means of conveying and enforcing use restrictions designed to protect humanhealth and the environment. Although EPA has authority under FIFRA section3(d)(1)(C)(ii) to promulgate regulations governing pesticide use, it hasnot chosen to do so here because of the practical difficulties of disseminatingthe regulatory requirements without reliance on the pesticide label. Thepesticide labeling system, popularly recognized as the definitive sourceof regulatory requirements, has been used almost exclusively for this purpose.The Agency thus believes that the requirements of Part 170 should be incorporatedinto the labeling of pesticide products.Moreover, FIFRA section 2(q)(1) provides that pesticide labeling must containboth necessary directions for use and warnings or caution statements which,if complied with, are adequate to protect health and the environment. TheAgency proposes to find that worker protection standards are necessaryto protect health of agricultural workers and pesticide handlers, and thereforeshould be required to be placed on pesticide labeling.In 1984 the Agency issued a proposal (49 FR 37967) to revise and consolidatepesticide labeling requirements, now found in 40 CFR Part 162, in a separatePart 156 for each reference. The Agency proposed to require essentiallythe same labeling statements as had been imposed by PR Notice 83-2. Inthe preamble to the proposal, EPA stated that the Agency was in the processof reevaluating Part 170, and that it intended to propose new worker protectionstandards in the future. EPA stated that if this reevaluation resultedin new or different labeling requirements than proposed, the regulationwould be revised. In May, 1988, the Agency issued the final rule creatingPart 156 (53 FR 15952).B. Proposed ApproachPart 170 will be implemented and enforced through the inclusion of itsprovisions as part of product labeling. Therefore, the Agency proposesto create a new Subpart K of Part 156 to contain required worker protectionlabeling statements (andSection;andSection;156.200 through 156.217). The distinctionbetween label and labeling in FIFRA section 2(p) allows the Agency someflexibility in implementation. EPA could elect to make the provisions partof the ``label,'' which would require that they appear on the materialactually attached to the container. Alternatively, EPA could impose therequirements as part of ``labeling,'' in one of two ways: by requiringthat material actually accompany the product during distribution and sale,or by requiring that it be referenced on the label but not accompany theproduct. Each of these alternatives is legally sufficient to bring therequirements under the FIFRA misuse provisions for enforcement purposes.In deciding among three principal options for implementing the requirements,EPA therefore considered the type and extent of information being requiredby Part 170, and the need for such information to actually accompany theproduct in commerce.The Agency considered and rejected the option of requiring that the entiretext of Part 170 accompany each product in sale and distribution, on thelabel or in supplemental labeling. Although this would convey the requirementslegally, and in the most direct manner inform users of their obligations,the Agency believes it to be a cumbersome, expensive, and unnecessary implementationapproach. Not only is the regulatory language long and relatively complex,the regulation includes a number of pesticide-specific provisions thatare not applicable to all products.EPA also considered and rejected an approach at the opposite end of thespectrum, that of simply referencing Part 170 on the label and not requiringthat it accompany the product in sale and distribution. This would accomplishthe necessary legal connection between the pesticide label and the workerprotection standards, while not burdening registrants with the expenseof preparing and distributing large volumes of supplemental labeling. Onthe other hand, this approach would place the burden on the pesticide userto obtain a copy of Part 170 himself, and translate its provisions to eachspecific pesticide product used.Obtaining Part 170 would not generally be difficult. The Agency would makecopies widely available through a variety of user sources, such as theUSDA Cooperative Extension Service, State pesticide and agricultural agencies,user associations and farmworker groups. However, application of its provisionsto individual pesticides could be complicated for a user, particularlyone who uses pesticides infrequently.The proposed approach is a compromise between these two extremes. The Agencyproposes to incorporate by reference on the label the majority of Part170 requirements. However, some requirements that are product-specific,such as reentry intervals and PPE, will be required to be on the labelingof each individual product. In this way, EPA hopes to gain the best tradeoffamong the needs of registrants, the cost of extensive new labeling materials,the problems of label clutter, complexity and readability, and the needsof users to have essential information available.C. ApplicabilityBecause the proposed Subpart K labeling requirements are intended to implementthe worker protection standards of proposed Part 170, their applicability(andSection; 156.200) is defined by the applicability requirements of thatPart (andSection; 170.3). The registrant must determine whether the labelingrequirements of Subpart K apply to a particular product. The difficultyfacing registrants is that product labels often do not make the fine distinctionsas to intended use or user so that the Agency can clearly determine thatthe labeling requirements do not apply. The result is that all productswhich are intended generally for agricultural use on plants would be requiredto be labeled with worker protection statements. Similarly, the requirementswill apply to products bearing multiple uses, some of which may be exemptfrom worker protection statements.Some products will clearly fall within the exceptions given in andSection;170.3. Products applied solely by injection methods, attractants, repellents,disinfectants, and vertebrate control products are by their very natureproduct types that can be determined to be exempt. Registrants of productslabeled only for such uses should not be required to modify their labelingin any way to comply with the requirements of Subpart K.On the other hand, the Agency's experience is that registrants do not alwaysregister separate products in order to distinguish, for example, publicmosquito control and private mosquito control uses; commercial and noncommercialuses in greenhouses and forests; weed control in agricultural fields andthe same weed control on rights-of-way; or golf course turf use and otherturf use. More likely is the registration of a single product for the entirespectrum of turf use or weed control.In order to determine that a product is clearly exempt from the requirementsof Subpart K, a registrant may be required to obtain a new registrationby ``splitting'' his registration administratively to segregate the exempteduses. Under andSection; 152.130(b), the Agency permits a registrant to marketa single product bearing differing subsets of registered uses without requiringseparate registration, provided that in splitting the uses, the precautionarylabeling and use directions would not vary. Because splitting the usesfor Subpart K purposes would result in labeling variations between theproducts, the split cannot be accomplished under single registration. TheAgency would accept applications for amended registration for this purpose.D. Reference StatementSection 156.205 proposes that a statement referring to Part 170 appearon the label of each product to which Part 170 applies. The statement inandSection; 156.205, the wording of which would be used exactly, brieflyidentifies the subject matter and scope of Part 170, draws the reader'sattention to the fact that the regulations are considered to be labeling,and notes that State requirements may be more restrictive than Part 170.The reference statement would be required to appear on the label of thepesticide, that is, attached to or printed on the immediate container ofthe pesticide. It could not be placed solely in supplemental labeling thataccompanies the product, although it may also appear there at the registrant'sdiscretion.E. General StatementsSection 156.206 proposes a number of general labeling requirements, whichare identical or similar to those contained in PR Notice 83-2, includingthe following: (1) The general statement that a pesticide not be appliedso as to contact unprotected workers (minor wording changes in the statementrequired by the PR Notice are proposed); (2) the requirement that the signalword appear in Spanish as well as English for products in Toxicity CategoriesI and II; and (3) the Spanish language statement warning non-English-speakingworkers to obtain assistance in understanding the pesticide label beforehandling the product.The Agency is further proposing in andSection; 156.206(c) that the labelof a product specifically identify products that are organophosphates,N-methyl carbamates, or fumigants.Organophosphates and N-methyl carbamates can cause cholinesterase inhibition.Identification on the label of these chemical classes is necessary so thatusers who are employers of pesticide handlers will be aware that (1) useof the product if it is an organophosphate may trigger a requirement forcholinesterase monitoring, and (2) a monitored worker who has been removedfrom exposure to cholinesterase inhibitors, including N-methyl carbamates,should not be exposed to the product.Similarly, greenhouse users must be aware that a product is a fumigantin order to comply with the reentry restrictions applicable to fumigants(andSection; 170.66(b)(1)). Also, because of the intensive hand labor workin greenhouse cultivation, the fact that reentry is restricted for a certainperiod of time may be critical to a decision about whether or when to usea fumigant. Under this proposal, a product would be identified clearlyas a fumigant, providing the user with the means to make an informed decision.Statements identifying a product as an organophosphate, N-methyl carbamateor fumigant would be permitted to appear in any of several ways, but wouldbe required to be placed on the label itself, not just in supplementallabeling. The statement is directed to pesticide handlers and supervisorsof workers, who are responsible for the reentry or monitoring requirementsarising from use of the pesticide. For this reason it is important thatthe statement be placed where such persons will readily observe it. Currently,pesticides that inhibit cholinesterase are identified on the label in a``Note to Physician,'' generally located on a side or back panel, and maybe overlooked by users. Because the statement relates to requirements forwhich the user can be held responsible, greater prominence than the ``Noteto Physician'' is needed.The Agency also proposes that the labeling of highly toxic pesticides bearstatements requiring frequent contact with handlers of those products (andSection;156.206(d) and (e)). Most pesticide poisonings and injuries result fromhandling the most highly toxic pesticides, which under certain circumstancescan cause loss of consciousness in a short period of time. Thus, a personworking alone might not be able to summon help in a poisoning emergency.Frequent contact with other persons would increase the chances that a workerwould receive prompt medical treatment in case of an accident and wouldthereby lessen the chance of a fatality.The Agency proposes to require contact only for those pesticides with thesignal word DANGER and the word POISON printed in red and the skull andcrossbones symbol on the front panel of the pesticide label (those in ToxicityCategory I for oral, dermal, or inhalation toxicity). Pesticides in ToxicityCategory I for skin and eye irritation, while causing severe effects, areseldom life-threatening. However, fumigant pesticides are of such hightoxicity when used in greenhouses, that all fumigant formulations for usein such enclosed structures would have these requirements for contact.The Agency proposes that the handler of a fumigant in an enclosed structureremain in the direct line of vision of an observer at all times duringthe handling operation. In addition, the observer must have available allof the PPE required on the fumigant product labeling for handling the fumigantin an enclosed area. The observer must be able to immediately rescue ahandler who has been overcome by the fumigant because the emergency responsetime is very short for these hazardous pesticides. There have been casesreported where rescue workers who were not adequately protected have alsobeen poisoned.Highly toxic pesticides being handled outdoors require fast, but not necessarilyimmediate, emergency response time. The Agency has determined that maintainingverbal or visual contact at intervals not exceeding 2 hours is sufficientcontact for such uses.F. Reentry StatementsThe Agency is proposing generic interim reentry intervals that would offersubstantial protection to workers until the Agency is able to prescribeproduct-specific intervals based on actual data. The Agency proposes toincorporate a phased approach to reentry, with decreasing requirementsfor personal protective equipment (PPE) at longer intervals after application,coupled with increasing types of permitted work in treated fields. At theshortest time after application, hand labor tasks would be prohibited altogether,and other tasks permitted only when wearing the most protective PPE. Later,all types of tasks could be performed by workers wearing certain PPE. Finally,after a further period, no PPE would be required.In translating these requirements into pesticide labeling statements, theAgency proposes in andSection; 156.210 to include statements of three typescovering the three time periods after application: before a minimum reentryinterval (sprays have dried, etc.); between the minimum reentry intervaland the numerical reentry interval for the product; and after the reentryinterval, after which task restrictions and PPE are no longer necessary.This proposal does not attempt to address the ``no contact'' situation(see, e.g., andSection; 170.46(a)(1)) through a labeling statement, becausea decision about whether a worker will have ``no contact'' is not product-dependentbut relates to particular circumstances of use.In order to determine which reentry labeling statements are required, theregistrant of a typical product would first determine whether the productis subject to a numerical reentry interval under andSection; 156.210(d) (product-specific)or andSection; 156.210(e) (interim). If the product is not subject to a numericalinterval, only the statement pertaining to the minimum reentry interval(andSection; 156.210(c)(1)) would be required, which would appear in theuse directions. If on the other hand a numerical interval is applicableto the product, the statement pertaining to the time between the minimumand the numerical intervals (andSection; 156.210(c)(2)) would be requiredas well on labeling. This is needed to determine the PPE for early reentryworkers, since the PPE may differ for these two reentry periods (andSection;156.217).In order to determine whether or not a product has a numerical reentryinterval, the registrant would consult a list of active ingredients andcorresponding reentry intervals which the Agency proposes to prepare tofacilitate this process. The list would be based on an assessment of availabletoxicity data on these active ingredients as applied to the interim andproduct-specific reentry interval criteria proposed in andSection; 156.210(d) and (e). The list would be maintained by the Agency as a referencefor registrants and others.Section 156.210(f) proposes to allow registrants and others to proposeto modify numerical reentry intervals established by this regulation bysubmission of appropriate data, including Part 158 data or other medical,epidemiological or health effects studies. Based on such submitted data,the Agency would review the reentry interval of the product in questionand would establish a shorter or longer interval if appropriate. The Agencywould also reevaluate the reentry interval of a pesticide product uponentry into Special Review (andSection; 156.210(e)), taking account any availabledata, including indication of chronic effects, relevant to assessing reentryhazards.G. Posting StatementThe Agency is proposing in Part 170 that some treated areas be posted.For farms and forests, posting would be required only if the pesticidehas a reentry interval greater than 48 hours. On the other hand, all applicationsin nurseries and greenhouses would require posting, regardless of the lengthof the reentry interval. The Agency proposes in andSection; 156.212 to requirethat affected product bear a statement instructing the user to post thetreated area. Since product labeling does not generally distinguish between nursery,greenhouse, and non-greenhouse/nursery uses, and the Agency does not expectregistrants to amend their registrations to do so, the wording of the alternateposting statements in proposed andSection; 156.212 has been crafted to makethe necessary distinctions between farm/forest use and nursery/greenhouseuse and between reentry intervals.H. Personal Protective Equipment StatementsSection 156.215 proposes that all products to which Subpart K applies bearappropriate minimum personal protective equipment (PPE) statements. Thesestatements would apply to all handling (mixing, loading, application etc.)activities (andSection; 156.216) and early reentry activities (andSection;156.217) by workers involving the product.In order to determine minimum PPE requirements to be placed on labeling,registrants would consult the tables found at andSection;156.216(b) for requiredPPE for handlers and andSection; 156.217(b) for required PPE for early reentryworkers. Registrants would use toxicity data on the formulated product(in the case of handler PPE) or active ingredients (in the case of earlyreentry worker PPE) by route of exposure. If toxicity data by a route ofexposure were lacking, the overall toxicity of the formulated product oractive ingredients, as appropriate, would be used. Where a product hasexisting PPE requirements on labeling, the most protective of the requirementsfor each area of the body would be used (see unit III.H.2.d for furtherdiscussion).Section 156.216(c) proposes certain modifications to the minimum handlerPPE based on exposure pattern; registrants would also consult this sectionfor applicable modifications to PPE wording. Section 156.216(d) proposesto allow registrants of products which will be diluted by the user to submitdata on the product as diluted for use in order to have the handler PPErequirements modified for handlers other than mixer/loaders, since suchhandlers will be exposed only to the diluted product. Section 156.216(f) and 156.217(d) would allow registrants and others topropose to modify the minimum PPE requirements established by this regulationby submission of appropriate data, including Part 158 data or other medical,epidemiological or health effects studies. Based on such submitted data,the Agency would review PPE requirements for the product in question andcould establish different PPE if appropriate. The Agency would also reevaluatePPE for a product upon entry into Special Review (andSection;andSection; 156.216(e)and 156.217(c)), taking account any available data, including indicationof chronic effects, relevant to assessing reentry hazards. I. Implementation of Labeling Changes Implementation and enforcement of this Part depend upon the misuse provisionof FIFRA section 12(a)(2)(G), which in turn depends upon the labeling ofthe pesticide. The Agency believes it essential to make the standards effectiveas soon as possible after promulgation of a final rule and will implementthe labeling requirements of Subpart K rapidly, recognizing that a largenumber of products will be affected by the new requirements. To balancethe needs of the Agency to rapidly implement the protective measures containedin Part 170, and the needs of registrants for an orderly labeling process,the Agency proposes the following labeling compliance policy. 1. <T3>New products. </T3>As of the effective date of the final rule, labelssubmitted with applications for new registration must be in compliancewith Subpart K at the time of registration. The Agency will review andapprove labeling for new products under normal Agency procedures. 2. <T3>Existing products. </T3>Registrants of products that are currentlyregistered as of the effective date of Subpart K will be required to amendproduct labeling to bring it into compliance with the new requirements.Because of the large number of products affected, and the Agency's limitedresources for review, EPA proposes to require a certification statementfor existing products rather than applications for amended registration.This will save resources in the Agency review time, and will permit fasterintroduction of properly labeled products into commerce since registrantswill not have to await Agency approval of the amended language. Mindfulof the scheduling of registrants' labeling operations, of the variablenumber of products for individual registrants and the large number of totalproducts affected, the Agency proposes to develop a schedule for submissionof certification statements. To assist in determining the most equitableand efficient implementation schedule, EPA requests comments and relevantinformation on the number of products potentially affected, details oflabeling operations and critical path elements for accomplishing relabeling,both for products released for shipment and products in channels of trade,and any other factors that EPA should consider in developing a suitableand expeditious compliance schedule. 3. <T3>Certification statement. </T3>For each affected product, the registrantmust submit to the Agency, by a date to be announced in the preamble tothe final rule, a certification statement that all products being releasedfor shipment after the date of the certification statement are in compliancewith the labeling requirements of Subpart K. The certification statementwould be similar to that used for other regulatory purposes, such as thePR Notice, would acknowledge the registrant's knowledge of the requirements,and would require certification by an authorized representative of thecompany that all products being released for shipment meet those requirements.The wording of an acceptable or required certification statement will beset out in the preamble to the final rule. 4. <T3>Submission of labeling. </T3>The Agency proposes to require the registrantto attach to his certification a copy of the product's final printed labelingbearing the revised labeling statements. The Agency may choose to reviewthis labeling as a check on the correctness of the registrant's compliancewith Subpart K, but such reviews would be selective, and the Agency doesnot expect to routinely approve or disapprove the submitted labeling ornotify the registrant. 5. <T3>Time frames. </T3>The Agency will announce in the final rule the timeframes by which certification statements must be submitted to the Agency.EPA will also set time frames, after the certification submission datefor compliance by products in channels of trade. EPA will consider permittingthe use of interim measures such as stickering to meet the channels oftrade compliance date. 6. <T3>Failure to comply. </T3>If a certification statement is not submittedby the date specified in the final rule, the Agency may issue a ``Noticeof Intent to Cancel'' under FIFRA section 6(b). If, after certificationto the Agency of compliance with Subpart K, the Agency determinates thatthe product is not in compliance, or that the registrant has incorrectlylabeled the product, the product may be deemed to be misbranded in violationof FIFRA section 12(a)(1)(E) or the Agency may issue a ``Notice of Intentto Cancel'' under FIFRA section 6(b).7. <T3>Amended registration. </T3>Applications for amended registration forthe purpose of modifying the required statements would be permitted. However,the Agency notes that it is specifying precise wording or exact requirementsso that registrants will be able to comply more easily within the timeframes to be established. EPA cannot assure that amendments for minor wordingchanges would be approved with sufficient time to incorporate the revisedlanguage. As stated previously, the Agency intends that the standards andimplementing label statements be put in place as quickly as possible, andtherefore EPA is unlikely to grant an extension of time merely becausea label amendment has been proposed. This policy would not preclude registrantsfrom submitting amendments to registration; registrants would, however,be required to meet applicable deadlines for label changes regardless ofthe status of any amendment to registration.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Relationship to States</ITAG>Existing Part 170 includes a provision which authorizes the States to setand enforce ``more restrictive standards for workers in fields treatedwith pesticides'' (andSection; 170.4(a)). This approach is consistent withFIFRA section 24(a), which authorizes the States to regulate the sale oruse of pesticides, but only to the extent their regulations do not permitany sale or use prohibited by FIFRA.The Agency considered relying upon the States to establish their own regulationson farmworkers pesticide protection. Despite recent initiatives in certainStates, including California, Texas, New Jersey, Ohio, Arizona, Oregonand Washington, farmworker protection has been uneven among States andnonexistent in many States. The Agency acknowledges that there are advantagesto relying upon State governments to regulate certain farmworker protectionmatters stemming from particular local conditions. However, under the existingnational minimum standard approach, States are able to address such localneeds as long as State requirements are not less stringent than the Federalstandards.The Agency proposes to retain the national minimum standards approach.Under this approach, EPA would set national minimum standards in Part 170which could be made more stringent by EPA or the States on a State, regionalor product-specific basis. The Agency is aware that such minimum standardsmight not provide the full measure of needed protection for some workers.However, it views as important the establishment of minimum protectionfor all workers and considers the proposed approach to be capable of accomplishingthat goal effectively and efficiently.The Agency believes that the reference to more restrictive state standardsfound in the current Part is unnecessary, in view of the specific authorizationin FIFRA section 24(a) of more stringent State regulation of pesticideuse. The proposed rule therefore omits any general statement concerningmore stringent State regulation, although the agency intends the revisedPart 170 to be a national minimum standard, as indicated above.<ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Implementation of Regulation</ITAG>In order for the workers protection standards proposed in this Part tobe maximally effective, the Agency believes they must be communicated tothe regulated community in a clear and concise manner. The rule proposesa number of requirements that have not been required of pesticide usersbefore. Also, the rule requires training to be provided to handlers, whichis less common among protection measures required by the Agency than, forexample, protective clothing. The Agency therefore requests comment onvarious methods of communicating the rule to the regulated community.At this time the Agency believes that the preparation of a user guide explainingthe rule in an easy-to-follow manner will be the most effective approach.There may be more than one version of the user guide prepared in orderto tailor the guide to each of the major user groups served. The user guidescould be distributed through the Cooperative Extension Service to pesticideusers.<ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Statutory Review</ITAG>A. U.S. Department of AgricultureAs required by FIFRA section 25(a), a copy of this proposal was providedto the Secretary of Agriculture. On March 7, 1988, the Secretary providedwritten comments on this proposal. Following is a summary of each commentby the Secretary, together with the Agency's response.<T3>Comment andplusmin;1:</T3> Appropriate reentry intervals for pesticideswill vary by crop and by geographic region. National reentry intervals,based on a worst case exposure level, would be inappropriate and burdensometo growers in many situations.<T3>Response:</T3> The Agency acknowledges that the interval followingapplication of a pesticide during which unprotected worker reentry is ``unsafe''will vary by geographic region and crop, and also by climate, presenceor absence of rainfall, stage of crop development, application rate, andworker activity. Information on all or even some of these variables israrely available. When full Subpart K reentry and exposure data are notavailable, the Agency has traditionally established interim reentry intervalsusing an analysis that may involve acute toxicity data, surrogate reentrydata on pesticides similar in chemical structure or use pattern, or poisoningincident reports, usually resulting in a single national reentry intervalfor a pesticide active ingredient. As a stopgap measure until reregistrationis completed, this proposal continues the general national minimum approachbased on the rough surrogate criterion of acute toxicity data. At the sametime, this proposal allows registrants and user groups to submit data thatwould enable the Agency to modify interim reentry intervals as appropriate,for example on a geographic or crop basis.<T3>Comment andplusmin;2:</T3> The use of pesticides in the commercial productionof wood fiber and timber products should be exempt from worker protectionstandards. Commercial forests are unlike traditional agricultural settingsin that pesticide use is less frequent.<T3>Response:</T3> The Agency has been unable to identify any fundamentaldifferences between forestry and other agricultural settings meriting exemptionfrom these proposed standards. While frequency of pesticide use in a particularforest area may be low compared to the average farm, nursery, or greenhouseoperation, this may not be true of frequency of use by particular crewmembers. Forestry mixing, loading, and application techniques appear tobe substantially similar to other agricultural handling techniques, withsimilar risks of exposure to forestry handlers and corresponding risk reductionmeasures. While worker reentry to treated areas appears to be very rarein forestry, when it occurs the worker protection measures in this proposal_notification,decontamination water, emergency provisions, etc._appears appropriate.The Agency is seeking comment on the applicability of this proposal toforestry.<T3>Comment andplusmin;3:</T3> Wide-area spray programs sponsored by theUSDA, such as the Mediterranean Fruit Fly eradication program, create difficultiesin that both agricultural and non-agricultural areas may be covered bysuch programs.<T3>Response:</T3> The Agency agrees with this comment. In addition, thegovernmental entity usually has no employment or contractual relationshipwith owners of treated areas, making observation of reentry and notificationrequirements impractical. The Agency proposes to exempt public pest controlprograms sponsored by governmental entities, such as the MediterraneanFruit Fly eradication program, from the worker protection standards. However,this would not include pest control programs sponsored by governmentalentities which take place on property owned or leased by such entities,such as routine use of pesticides in National Forests by the U.S. ForestService.<T3>Comment andplusmin;4:</T3> Applicators certified under Federal certificationprograms should be qualified to be trainers of handlers.<T3>Response:</T3> The Agency agrees that applicators who become certifiedunder a federally sponsored certification program in accordance with 40CFR Part 171 would be qualified to be trainers of handlers, and has amendedthe proposed trainer qualifications to include such persons.<T3>Comment andplusmin;5:</T3> The decontamination water quantity and locationrequirements are satisfactory.<T3>Response:</T3> None.<T3>Comment andplusmin;6:</T3> Eye wash dispensers need not be immediatelyavailable to each applicator and could be dispersed throughout the crew,one for every two or three workers, because carrying excessive weight cancause heat and health problems.<T3>Response:</T3> The Agency believes that in the case of applicationequipment failure where the applicator is sprayed or splashed in the face,the eye wash dispenser would need to be immediately available to be ofany value. The Agency does not believe that carrying a cone pint dispenser(the proposed minimum volume) would present a heat or health problem. TheAgency is soliciting further comment on this issue in the preamble to thisNotice.<T3>Comment andplusmin;7:</T3> Chemical resistant footwear should not berequired for forestry workers, because workers will not walk through treatedvegetation under typical forestry application conditions, and because chemicalresistant boots do not breathe, creating foot problems.<T3>Response:</T3> In the case of higher toxicity pesticides, forestryworkers would require foot protection from spills during mixing and loadingof liquid formulations. While walking through treated vegetation may beuncommon, foot protection during application would be necessary, for example,in the case of spills due to equipment failure. The Agency believes thatbreathability should not be a problem since use of chemical resistant shoecovers, which may be worn over breathable boots, is permitted under thisproposal. The Agency is soliciting further comment on this issue in thepreamble to this Notice.B. Congressional CommitteesAs required by FIFRA section 25(a), a copy of this proposal was providedto the Committee on Agriculture, Nutrition, and Forestry of the U.S. Senateand the Committee on Agriculture of the U.S. House of Representatives.Comments were provided by Representative George E. Brown, Jr. and SenatorPatrick J. Leahy. Following is a summary of each comment by RepresentativeBrown and Senator Leahy, together with the Agency's response.<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Comments of Representative Brown</ITAG><T3>Comment andplusmin;1:</T3> Supports expanding coverage of the standardsto greenhouse, nursery, and forestry workers.<T3>Response:</T3> None.<T3>Comment andplusmin;2:</T3> Supports the increased availability of emergencyhealth services.<T3>Response: </T3>None.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Comment andplusmin;3:</T3> Supports the availability of washing facilities.</ITAG><T3>Response: </T3>None.<T3>Comment andplusmin;4:</T3> Personal protective equipment (PPE) requirementsshould be subject to monitoring of actual field use for effectiveness,with formal reevaluation after one or two seasons.<T3>Response: </T3>As discussed in unit III.H. of this Notice, considerableexposure monitoring data is available on the effectiveness of PPE duringvarious types of outdoor mixing, loading, and application activities forvarious pesticides, whereas somewhat less data is available for PPE effectivenessunder indoor (e.g. greenhouse) exposure and outdoor early reentry exposureconditions. This data is being compiled from various sources, includingregistrant responses to data call-ins and studies funded by research anddevelopment efforts, through the Agency's exposure assessment data base.The Agency proposes to continue compilation of exposure monitoring datawith special emphasis on PPE effectiveness under indoor and early reentryconditions. This data base will be reexamined after sufficient new dataare available from the point of view of the adequacy of PPE in protectingworkers under these conditions.<T3>Comment andplusmin;5:</T3> Supports the increased stringency of reentrystandards.<T3>Response: </T3>None.<T3>Comment andplusmin;6:</T3> The toxicity basis for interim reentry intervalsshould not be limited to acute toxicity, but should include chronic andsubchronic effects and the effects of metabolites.<T3>Response: </T3>The Agency agrees that reentry intervals should considerchronic and subchronic effects of pesticides and the effects of metaboliteswhen sufficient toxicity, exposure, and benefits data are available tomake such determinations. The Agency believes that intervals to controlrisks due to chronic or subchronic toxicity should be determined on a case-by-caserather than a generic basis, due to the difficulty of assessing the natureand level of chronic risks. The Agency proposes to continue its policyof case-by-case evaluation of reentry exposure, and in particular proposesto formally reevaluate reentry exposure, and set intervals as needed, ifa pesticide enters Special Review (see andSection; 156.210(f)). The interimreentry intervals in this proposal, based on acute toxicity, are intendedto serve as a stop-gap measure until the Agency's reregistration programcan cause the generation of more complete toxicity data and evaluate theneed for reentry intervals for each agricultural pesticide.<T3>Comment andplusmin;7:</T3> The proposed notification requirements shouldbe reexamined in light of ``real world conditions in the fields,'' suchas proximity of labor camps to treated areas.<T3>Response: </T3>The Agency agrees that if a labor camp is located inproximity to a treated area of an agricultural establishment, notificationof workers who live at the camp would be effective in preventing accidentalreentry. The Agency has clarified its intent in this Notice to proposethat treated areas adjacent to any labor camps be posted with warning signsat the boundary of such camps when posting is required, and that workerswho live in adjacent labor camps be orally warned of applications, whetheror not they will actually work in or near the treated area. Public commentis being solicited on this issue.<T3>Comment andplusmin;8:</T3> The cholinesterase monitoring requirementsare a ``good first step,'' but the comments of the Scientific AdvisoryPanel on this topic should be addressed.<T3>Response: </T3>The Agency refers to its response to SAP comments andplusmin;11-13.<T3>Comment andplusmin;9:</T3> A comprehensive survey and health monitoringeffort for the agricultural sector is needed, in cooperation with otherstate and Federal agencies.<T3>Response: </T3>The Agency believes that such a comprehensive effortis beyond the scope of this proposal. The Agency notes that one such farmworkerhealth monitoring project is being undertaken based on a recent Congressionalappropriation to EPA.<T3>Comment andplusmin;10:</T3> EPA should take steps to deal with possibleconflict between EPA and OSHA in enforcement actions.<T3>Response: </T3>The Agency acknowledges that concurrent jurisdictionexists over the agricultural sector with regard to responsibility for healthand safety. The Agency has consulted with OSHA in an attempt to ensurethat no duplication or conflict among regulations will occur, especiallywith regard to EPA's proposed decontamination requirements and the OSHAField Sanitation Standard. The Agency agrees that coordination of the agencies'enforcement efforts in the agricultural sector would be desirable. EPAplans to continue its consultations with OSHA to clarify these matters.<T3>Comment andplusmin;11:</T3> The Subcommittee on Departmental Operations,Research, and Foreign Agriculture should be provided with information onthe costs of implementation and enforcement of the proposal, to be usedfor Congressional funding deliberations.<T3>Response: </T3>The Agency notes that while the proposed regulationswould elaborate on previous definitions of pesticide misuse, it does notincrease the number of establishments subject to misuse enforcement. Anyfarm, forest, nursery or greenhouse using registered pesticides is alreadywithin the scope of state and Federal enforcement activities. In that sense,implementation of the proposal may not require additional resources forenforcement. On the other hand, the Agency recognizes that it will be necessaryto mount an effort to disseminate information on the new requirements tothe agricultural community, and has already begun the preparations forthis effort, in cooperation with several other organizations. As the proposalmoves toward a final rule, the Agency will examine resource issues associatedwith implementation and consider those in preparation of the President'sbudget.<T3>Comment andplusmin;12: </T3>The Agency should address the concern ofthe SAP regarding EPA's philosophy of establishing only minimum standards,since health and safety requirements of workers do not vary geographicallyor by economic sector.<T3>Response: </T3>The Agency referes to its response to SAP commentandplusmin;1.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. </ITAG><T3>Comments of Senator Leahy</T3><T3>Comment andplusmin;1: </T3>Supports extending protections to pesticideapplicators as well as to nersery, greenhouse, and forestry workers.<T3>Response: </T3>None.<T3>Comment andplusmin;2: </T3>Supports emergency transportation requirementin the case of suspected pesticide poisoning or injury.<T3>Response: </T3>None.<T3>Comment andplusmin;3: </T3>Interim reentry intervals should take intoaccount potential chronic and subchronic effects and effects of inert ingredients.<T3>Response: </T3>Currently, available chronic and subchronic data arein fact used in setting reentry intervals on a case by case basis. TheAgency proposes to continue this policy and refers to its respone to RepresentativeBrown's comment andplusmin;6 for further discussion. Concerning inerts, theAgency believes that it will be rare for significant residues of toxicinerts to remain in fields after sprays have dried. Reentry concerns areprincipally due to residues of active ingredients or their metabolitesor degradation products.<T3>Comment andplusmin;4: </T3>No data is provided to support the Agency'scontention that the 72/48/24 hour interim reentry interval option is noteconomically feasible.<T3>Response: </T3>More detailed economic impact projections are foundin the Regulatory Impact Assessment (RIA) for this proposal. The RIA concludedthat the total first-year non-incremental cost of the 72/48/24 hour reentryoption would be $222.2 million, attributable largely to fruit, vegetable,and greenhouse sector impacts, compared to an estimated $33.7 million underthis proposal.<T3>Comment andplusmin;5: </T3>Displaying a pesticide safety informationposter is inadequate training for non-handler workers, who should be giventhe same training as handlers.<T3>Response: </T3>The Agency considered whether handler-type training,or some other form of training, would be appropriate and practicable forall fieldworkers. The Agency believes that adequate delivery mechanismswould not be available if handler training (similar to certification) wererequired for all fieldworkers. In addition, this level of training is notnecessary for workers whose primary need is to protect themselves frompesticide exposure and who are generally not in a position to cause exposureto others. The Agency seeks comment on these issues.<T3>Comment andplusmin;6: </T3>Workers should be given the name and the commonsigns and symptoms of pesticides to which they are exposed, without theneed for a request.<T3>Response: </T3>The Agency carefully considered which pesticide-specificinformation would be most useful to workers and what methods of communicationof that information would be most effective. While the Agency proposesthat the worker be provided with the brand name, the registration number,and the name of all active ingredients of any product to which the workeris exposed, the common signs and symptoms of poisoning for the productwould not be available to the employer because this information is onlyrarely required on pesticide labeling. The Agency is soliciting commenton whether information about the general (rather than product-specific)signs and symptoms of pesticide poisoning should be required as part ofthe pesticide safety information display. As to communication method, theAgency believes that information such as chemical names would be ignoredor not recalled by workers if given during an oral warning, and it wouldbe burdensome on employers for it to be routinely marked on warning signsor displayed at a central location such as a notice board. In addition,not all workers would want this more detailed information. While theremay be some inhibition among some workers in making a request, this appearsto be the most reasonable and effective method of making the informationavailable to those workers who want it. The Agency notes that it is concernedmore generally with how toxicity and safety information about pesticidesshould best be communicated to the public, and is pursuing this as a separatematter.<T3>Comment andplusmin;7: </T3>Treated areas should be posted for pesticideswith reentry intervals of 24 hours or longer, because too many highly toxicpesticides would otherwise not be included and oral warnings are not adequate.<T3>Response:</T3> The Agency refers to its response to SAP comment andplusmin;5.<T3>Comment andplusmin;8:</T3> Warning signs should be posted at labor campswhen they are located in or near treated areas.<T3>Response:</T3> The Agency refers to its response to RepresentativeBrown's comment andplusmin;7.<T3>Comment andplusmin;9:</T3> Any symbol for use on warning signs otherthan the skull and crossbones should be pilot tested for worker understandability.<T3>Response:</T3> The Agency agrees that pilot testing under field conditionsof any proposed warning sign symbol would help to establish its relativeeffectiveness, and has invited comment on how this could best be accomplished.<T3>Comment andplusmin;10:</T3> More emphasis should be given to mechanicalcontrols (closed systems) as opposed to personal protective equipment (PPE)in view of uncertainties about the effectiveness of PPE.<T3>Response:</T3> While some uncertainties about the efficacy of PPE remain,considerable data is in fact available. The Agency refers to its responseto Representative Brown's comment andplusmin;4 for its proposal to addressweaknesses in this data base. The Agency proposes to prohibit work activitiesaltogether when weather conditions are such that the required PPE mightcause heat stress. The proposal also includes incentives for the use ofclosed mixing/loading and application systems in terms of reduced PPE requirements.C. FIFRA Scientific Advisory PanelPursuant to FIFRA section 25(d), a copy of this proposal was provided tothe FIFRA Scientific Advisory Panel (SAP). On March 2, 1988, the SAP heldan open meeting to review this proposal and submitted written commentsto the Agency. Following is a summary of each written comment by the SAP,together with the Agency's response.<T3>Comment andplusmin;1:</T3> Establishing only minimum standards seemsinappropriate when more stringent standards have already been proven andaccepted in California and Texas without detriment to the agriculturaleconomy.<T3>Response:</T3> The Agency believes that this proposal represents themost stringent worker protection standards that are applicable nationwide;the standards are ``minimum'' only in the sense that no state may haveless stringent requirements. This proposal follows FIFRA in allowing anystate to develop more stringent regulations if they are warranted by conditionsin that state. Moreover, the Agency routinely sets product-specific protectivemeasures on a case-by-case basis, such as personal protective equipmentand reentry intervals, that can be more stringent than those required bythe proposal. Such measures would be unaffected by the proposal.<T3>Comment andplusmin;2:</T3> The proposal contains ambiguous wording.<T3>Response:</T3> One of the primary reasons for revising the existingworker protection regulations was ambiguous wording. The Agency welcomesspecific comments as to such wording in this proposal.<T3>Comment andplusmin;3:</T3> All workers applying pesticides should berequired to take a training program.<T3>Response:</T3> The Agency agrees. The Agency is proposing to requirethat all pesticide handlers, including applicators, be trained as describedin that section or be certified under Part 171.<T3>Comment andplusmin;4:</T3> Names of pesticides used and the common symptomsof toxic exposure to these pesticides should be provided to workers ona routine basis.<T3>Response:</T3> The Agency agrees that workers exposed to pesticidesshould receive information about pesticides to which they are exposed andsigns of exposure. The Agency is proposing that handlers be provided labelinginformation on request, while other workers be given oral or posted warningsbefore pesticide applications and provided certain other information aboutthe pesticide on request. In addition, the proposed handler training mustinclude common signs and symptoms of pesticide poisoning. The Agency issoliciting comment on whether similar information about poisoning symptomsshould be included in the pesticide safety information that must be displayedin a prominent location.<T3>Comment andplusmin;5:</T3> Posting of treated areas on farms should berequired following application of pesticides having reentry intervals of24 hours or greater (instead of greater than 48 hours).<T3>Response:</T3> While the option of additional posting would probablydecrease the risk of accidental early reentry poisonings, it would alsoincrease the economic cost to growers. The Agency believes that the increasedbenefits under this option would probably not outweigh the increased costs,especially considering that under this proposal daily oral warnings wouldbe required for all pesticide applications. The Agency is soliciting commenton this issue.<T3>Comment andplusmin;6: </T3>All communications should be in the languagethe workers understand.<T3>Response: </T3> The Agency agrees that providing information is oflittle value if the information cannot be understood. The Agency is proposingthat oral warnings be given in a language the worker can understand; thattreated area warning signs display a standard symbol clearly indicatingthat entry is forbidden; and that the pesticide safety information thatmust be displayed contain a statement in the language of each non-Englishspeaking worker that the information on the poster is important and shouldbe explained to him.<T3>Comment andplusmin;7: </T3>Acute toxicity data should be used for establishinginterim reentry intervals, in addition to other indications of toxicitywhere appropriate, especially dermal and respiratory toxicity.<T3>Response: </T3>The Agency proposes to use acute dermal, skin irration,and eye irration toxicity in establishing interim reentry intervals. TheAgency proposes not to consider either acute oral toxicity, since the oralroute is not a major route of reentry exposure, or inhalation toxicity,since the inhalation route is not a major route of exposure after sprayshave dried. Before sprays have dried inhalation toxicity would be consideredin determining personal protective equipment for early reentry workers.<T3>Comment andplusmin;8: </T3>Longer interim reentry intervals should beestablished which take account of potential chronic and subchronic effectsin addition to acute effects.<T3>Response: </T3>The Agency considered the option of requiring longerintervals (i.e. 72/48/24 hours by Toxicity Category) but believes thatsuch intervals are not supported on a generic basis by the limited reentrydata available on certain pesticides. The Agency agrees that reentry intervalsshould reflect chronic and subchronic effects of pesticides when data isavailable, but that appropriate intervals should be determined on a case-by-casebasis. The Agency is soliciting comment on these issues.<T3>Comment andplusmin;9: </T3>Meaningful reentry intervals should be establishedfor Toxicity Category III and IV pesticides.<T3>Response: </T3>The Agency considered the option of establishing a minimum24-hour reentry interval for all pesticides. In the case of Toxicity CategoryIII and IV pesticides, this would provide some interim protection for pesticideswhich are later discovered to have chronic effects, and would probablyreduce the incidence of skin and eye poisonings now occurring from pesticidesin these categories. However, the Agency rejected this option because itwould result in unwarranted reentry intervals for some pesticides, andbecause chronic effects are best addressed on a pesticide-specific, ratherthan generic, basis. The Agency is soliciting comment on this issue.<T3>Comment andplusmin;10: </T3>The Agency should provide a list of all agriculturalpesticides identifying their toxicity categorization and reentry interval.<T3>Response: </T3>Such a list is currently being developed by the Agencyand will be made available to registrants and other interested parties.<T3>Comment andplusmin;11: </T3>The Agency should consider a broader rangeof cholinesterase monitoring, including: A shorter exposure trigger; monitoringof private applicators; and triggering based on early symptoms of exposure.<T3>Response: </T3>The Agency believes that a more sensitive exposure trigger(fewer days of exposure) would not extend monitoring to an appreciablenumber of handlers with routine exposure to organophosphates, but wouldinstead include persons with very short-term or spread-out exposure forwhich monitoring would not be necessary. Extending monitoring to privatehandlers would probably not significantly reduce overall risk, becausethe number of non-commercial handlers meeting the exposure trigger is anticipatedto be small. While monitoring handlers with early symptoms of exposurecould prevent future poisonings, monitoring could not begin before a considerableperiod of removal from exposure, in order to establish a baseline. TheAgency is soliciting comment on these issues.<T3>Comment andplusmin;12: </T3>A pre-exposure baseline should be requiredof workers meeting the cholinesterase monitoring trigger.<T3>Response: </T3>The Agency believes baseline testing will ordinarilybe a necessary part of a cholinesterase monitoring program, and that thetiming and methodology of baseline testing would best be addressed in theguidelines for supervising physicians which the Agency plans to develop.<T3>Comment andplusmin;3: </T3>Recognition of cholinesterase inhibitor exposuresymptoms should be made a part of a training program. <T3>Response: </T3>The Agency agrees that handlers routinely exposed tocholinesterase inhibiting pesticides should be made aware of the symptomsof over-exposure and when it is necessary to reduce or avoid exposure inorder to protect themselves. The Agency has modified the proposal to requirethat the general training of pesticide handlers include information aboutthe signs and symptoms of cholinesterase inhibition. In addition, the employermust notify the commercial handler, at the time the employer is notifiedby the supervising physician, that changes to work practices may be necessaryor that removal from exposure is necessary, in order for the handler totake steps to reduce or avoid exposure. Comment is solicited on this proposal.<ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Abou-Donia, M.B. and S.H. Preissig. 1976. ``Delayed NeurotoxicityFrom Continuous Low Dose Administration of Leptofos to Hens.'' <T3>Toxicology and Applied Pharmacology </T3>38: 595-608. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Adams, J.D. 1987. <T3>Pesticide Assessment Guidelines, Subdivision K, Exposure: Reentry Protection.</T3>Washington, DC: U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, Office of Pesticidesand Toxic Substances. (In press) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Aldridge, W.N., J.M. Barnes, and M.K. Johnson. 1969. ``Studieson Delayed Neurotoxicity Produced by Some Organophosphorus Compounds.''<T3>Annals of the New York Academy of Sciences 160: 314-322. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) American Association of Vocational Instructional Materials. 1980.<T3>Applying Pesticides. </T3>Athens, Georgia: AAVIM. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM). 1986. ``StandardTest Method for Resistance of Protective Clothing Materials to Permeationby Liquids or Gases_Designation F739-85.'' <T3>Annual Book of ASTM Standards </T3>15.07: 426-35. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Bailey, B. 1972. ``The Effects of Pesticide Residues on Farm Laborers.''<T3>Agricultural Age </T3>28:6. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Berck, B., Y. Iwata, and F. Gunther. 1981. ``Worker EnvironmentResearch: Rapid Field Method for Estimation of Organophosphorus InsecticideResidues on Citrus Foliage and in Grove Soil.'' <T3>Journal of Agricultural and Food Chemistry 29: 209-216. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Blondell, J. 1986. ``Injuries and Illnesses in California Reportedby Physicians. Field Workers Exposed to Pesticide Residue by Toxicity Category.1976-1985. ``Unpublished.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) Bohmont, B.L. 1983. <T3>The New Pesticide User's Guide. </T3>Reston, Virginia: Reston PublishingCompany. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) California Department of Food and Agriculture. 1986. ``Summaryof Reports From Physicians of Illnesses That Were Possibly Related to PesticideExposure During the Period January 1-December 31, 1985, in California.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(11) California Department of Health. 1974. ``Medical Supervisionof Pesticide Workers: Guidelines for Physicians.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(12) Carmen, G.E., Y. Iwata, L. Pappas, J.R. O'Neal, and F. Gunther.1982. ``Pesticides Applicator Exposure to Insecticides During Treatmentof Citrus Trees with Oscillating Boom and Airblast Units.'' <T3>Architectural and Environmental Contamination Toxicology </T3>11: 651-659.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(13) Chemical Manufacturers Association Ad Hoc Working Group on StandardPhraseology. 1985. ``Recommended Terms for Personal Protective Equipment.''<T3>Hazardous Materials Technical Bulletin. </T3>Washington, DC: ChemicalManufactuers Association and Association of American Railroads. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(14) Coye, M.J. 1986. ``Biological Monitoring of Agricultural WorkersExposed to Pesticides: 1. Cholinisterase Activity Determinations.'' <T3>Journal of Occupational Medicine </T3>28: 619-627. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(15) Coye, M.J., P.G. Barnett, J.E. Midtling, A.R. Velasco, P. Romero,C.L. Clements, M.A. O'Malley, M. Tobin, and L. Lowry. 1986. ``ClinicalConfirmation of Organophosphate Poisoning of Agricultural Workers.'' <T3>American Journal of Industrial Medicine </T3>10: 399-409. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(16) Crowder, J., W. Liao, and J. Bergsten. 1984. ``Summary of EPAReport, National Monitoring Study: Citrus.'' Research Triangle Park, NorthCarolina: Research Triangle Institute. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(17) Davis, J.E. 1980. ``Minimizing Occupational Exposure to Pesticides:Personnel Monitoring.'' <T3>Residue Reviews </T3>75: 33-50. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(18) Davies, J.E. 1986. University of Miami, Personal communication.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(19) Davies, J.E., V.H. Freed, H.F. Enos, R.C. Duncan, A. Barquet,C. Morgade, L.J. Peters, and J.X. Danauskas. 1982. ``Reduction of PesticideExposure With Protective Clothing for Applicators and Mixers.'' <T3>Journal of Occupational Medicine </T3>24(6): 464-468. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(20) DeJonge, J.O. 1983. ``Clothing As a Barrier to Pesticide Exposure.''Presented at American Chemical Society meeting, Seattle, Washington. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(21) Development Planning and Research Associates. 1985. ``Analysisof Proposed Reentry Interval Regulations under FIFRA.'' Prepared for U.S.EPA, Office of Pesticide Programs, under EPA Contract No. 68-02-4064. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(22) DuBois, K.P., J. Doull, P.R. Salerno, and J.M. Coon. 1949. ``Studieson the Toxicity and Mechanisms of Action of p-nitrophenyl diethyl thionophosphate(Parathion).'' <T3>Journal of Pharmocology and Experimental Therapeutics </T3>95: 79-91.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(23) Durham, W.F. and H.R. Wolfe. 1962. ``Measurement of the Exposureof Workers to Pesticides.'' <T3>Bulletin of the World Health Organization (WHO) </T3>26: 75. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(24) Durham, W.F. and C.H. Williams. 1972. ``Mutagenic, Teratogenic,and Carcinogenic Properties of Pesticides.'' <T3>Annual Review of Entomology </T3>17: 123-148. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(25) Durham, W.F., H.R. Wolfe, and J.W. Elliot. 1972. ``Absorptionand Excretion of Parathion by Spraymen.'' <T3>Archives of Environmental Health </T3>24: 381-387. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(26) Dynamac Corporation. 1984. ``The Effects of Production Practicesin Eleven Selected Crops on the Potential Exposure of Field Workers toPesticides.'' Prepared for U.S. EPA, Office of Pesticide Programs, underContract No. 68-01-6072. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(27) Fenske, R.A., J.T. Leffingwell, and R.C. Spear. 1985. ``Evaluationof Fluorescent Tracer Methodology for Dermal Exposure Assessment.'' In<T3>Dermal Exposure Related to Pesticide Use, </T3>pp. 377-394. SymposiumSeries 273. Washington, DC: American Chemical Society.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(28) Finley, F.L. 1974. ``Efficacy of Home Laundering in Removal ofDDT, Methyl Parathion, and Toxaphene Residues From Contaminated Fabrics.''<T3>Bulletin of Environmental Contamination and Toxicology </T3>12: 226-274.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(29) Franklin, C.A. 1985. ``Occupational Exposure to Pesticides andIts Role in Risk Assessment Procedures Used in Canada.'' In <T3>Dermal Exposure Related to Pesticide Use, </T3>pp. 429-444. SymposiumSeries 273. Washington, DC: American Chemical Society.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(30) Gage, J.C. 1967. ``The Significance of Blood Cholinesterase ActivityMeasurements.'' <T3>Residue Reviews </T3>18: 159-173.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(31) Gold, R.E., J.R.C. Leavitt, T. Holcslaw, and D. Tupy. 1982. ``Exposureof Urban Applicators to Carbaryl.'' <T3>Archives of Environmental Contamination and Toxicology </T3>11(1):63-67.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(32) Gunther, F.A., W.E. Westlake, J.H. Barkley, W. Winterlin, andL. Langbehn. 1973. ``Establishing Dislodgeable Pesticide Residues on LeafSurfaces.'' <T3>Bulletin of Environmental Contamination and Toxicology </T3>9: 243-249.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(33) Gunther, F.A., Y. Iwata, G.E. Carman, and C.A. Smith. 1977. ``TheCitrus Reentry Problem: Research on Its Causes and Effects and Approachesto Its Minimization.'' <T3>Residue Reviews </T3>67: 1-139.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(34) Guthrie, F.E., J.J. Domanski, A.R. Main, D.G. Sanders, and R.R.Monroe. 1974. ``Use of Mice for Initial Approximation of Reentry IntervalsInto Pesticide-Treated Fields.'' <T3>Archives of Environmental Contamination and Toxicology </T3>2: 233-241.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(35) Hayes, W.J., Jr. 1975. <T3>Toxicology of Pesticides. </T3>Baltimore: Maryland: Williams and Wilkens.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(36) Hayes, W.J., Jr. 1982. <T3>Pesticides Studies in Man. </T3>Baltimore: Williams and Wilkens.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(37) Hayes, W.J., Jr. 1986. Vanderbilt University. Personal Communication.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(38) Hickey, K.D. 1981. ``Dermal and Respiratory Exposure of SprayerOperators to Benomyl, Mancozeb, and ETU During Loading and Spraying.''Prepared under Research Agreement No. 801-15-73 with the U.S. Departmentof Agriculture.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(39) Honeycutt, R.C., G. Zwieg, and N.N. Ragsdale, eds. 1985. <T3>Dermal Exposure Related to Pesticide Use. </T3>ACS Symposium Series273. Washington, DC: American Chemical Society.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(40) Hunter, K.W., D.E. Lenz, A.A. Brimfield, and J.A. Naylor. 1982.``Quantification of the Organophosphorus Nerve Agent Soman by CompetitiveInhibition Enzyme Immunoassay Using Monoclonal Antibody.'' <T3>FEBS Letter </T3>149: 147-151.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(41) Jacobs, W.W. 1980. ``Closed Systems Mixing and Loading.'' Presentedat the Pesticide Exposure Conference, Hershey, Pennsylvania.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(42) Johnson, M.D., 1969. ``Delayed Neurotoxic Action of Some OrganophosphorusCompounds.'' <T3>British Medical Bulletin </T3>25: 231-235.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(43) Kahn, E. 1986. California Department of Health Services. Personalcommunication.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(44) Knaak, J.B., P. Schlocker, C.R. Ackerman, and J. Seiber. 1980.``Reentry Research: Establishing of Safe Pesticide Levels on Foliate.''<T3>Bulletin of Environmental Contamination and Toxicology </T3>24: 796-804.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(45) Kurtz, P.H. 1986. California Department of Health Services. Personalcommunication.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(46) Laughlin, J., C. Easley, and R.E. Gold. 1985. ``Methyl ParathionResidue in Contaminated Fabrics After Laundering.'' In <T3>Dermal Exposure Related to Pesticide Use, </T3>pp. 177-187. SymposiumSeries 273. Washington, DC: American Chemical Society.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(47) Lavy, T.L. 1984. ``Exposure of Forestry Applicators Using FormulationsContaining 2,4-D, Dichloroprop, or Picloram in Non-aerial Applications.''Project Completion Report to the U.S. Forest Service.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(48) Leavitt, J.R.C., R.E. Gold, T. Holcslaw, and D. Tupy. 1982. ``Exposureof Professional Pesticide Applicators to Carbaryl.'' <T3>Archives of Environmental Contamination and Toxicology </T3>11(1):57-62.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(49) Leininger, C., J. Bergsten, and W. Liao. 1984. ``Summary of theAtlantic Coast Migrant Stream Pesticide Study.'' Research Triangle Park,North Carolina: Research Triangle Institute.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(50) Lunchick, C., J. Reinert, and A. Nielsen. 1987. ``EngineeringControls and Protective Clothing in Reduction of Pesticide Exposure toTractor Drivers.'' Presented at the American Society of Testing MaterialsSecond International Symposium on the Performance of Protective Clothing,Tampa, Florida, January 19-22, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(51) Maddy, K.T. 1975. ``Worker Reentry Safety IV: The Position ofthe California Department of Food and Agriculture on Pesticide ReentrySafety Intervals.'' <T3>Residue Reviews </T3>62: 9-14.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(52) Maddy, K.T. 1986. California Department of Food and Agriculture.Personal communication.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(53) Maddy, K.T. and H.R. Fong. 1983. ``Monitoring Worker Exposureto Dinoseb.'' Sacramento: California Department of Food and Agriculture.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(54) Maddy, K.T. and S.C. Edmiston. 1982. ``Pesticide Safety Programof the California Department of Food and Agriculture Based Upon Measurementsof Potential Work-place Exposure and the Elimination of Excess Exposures.''American Chemical Society.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(55) Maddy, K.T., R.G. Wang, and S.C. Edmiston. 1982. ``Measurementof Workplace Exposure and the Elimination of Worker and Other Excess Exposureof Persons to Pesticides in California.'' Presented at American ChemicalSociety meeting, Kansas City, Missouri.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(56) Maitlen, J.C., R.C. Sell, L.M. McDonough, and S.N. Fertig. 1982.``Workers in the Agricultural Environment.'' In <T3>Dermal Exposure to Carbaryl, </T3>pp. 83-103. Symposium Series 182.Washington, DC: American Chemical Society.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(57) McNeill, Jennifer and Carolyn Stuart. 1986. ``Report on State-LevelPesticide Poisoning Activities.'' Research Triangle Park, North Carolina:Research Triangle Institute.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(58) Mengle, D. 1986. California Department of Health Services. Personalcommunication.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(59) Midtling, John E., P.G. Barnett, M.J. Coye, A.R. Velasco, P.Romero, C.L. Clements, M.A. O'Malley, M. Tobin, T.G. Rose, and I.H. Monosson.1985. ``Clinical Management of Field Worker Organophosphate Poisoning.''<T3>Western Journal of Medicine </T3>142: 514-518.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(60) Milby, T.H., F. Ottoboni, and H.W. Mitchell. 1964. ``ParathionResidue Poisoning Among Orchard Workers.'' <T3>Journal of the American Medical Association </T3>189: 351-356.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(61) Morgan, Donald P. 1982. <T3>Recognition and Management of Pesticide Poisonings, </T3>3d ed. Washington,DC: U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(62) Morgan, Donald P. 1986. The University of Iowa. Personal communication.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(63) Murphy, S.D. 1980. ``Pesticides.'' In <T3>Casarett and Doull's Toxicology: The Basic Science of Poisons.</T3>Edited by J. Doull, C.D. Klaassen, and M.O. Amdur. New York: MacMillanPublishing Co. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(64) Nolan, R.J. et al. 1984. ``Pharmacokinetics and Picloram in MaleVolunteers.'' <T3>Toxicology and Applied Pharmacology</T3> 76 (2): 264-269. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(65) Northeast Regional Pesticide Coordinators. 1974. <T3>Pesticide Applicator Training Manual.</T3> Ithaca, New York: CornellUniversity. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(66) Norton, S. 1980. ``Toxic Responses of the Central Nervous System.''In <T3>Casarett and Doull's Toxicology: The Basic Science of Poisons.</T3>Edited by J. Doull, C.D. Klaasen, and M.O. Amdur. New York: MacMillan PublishingCo. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(67) Orlando, J., D. Branson, G. Ayers, and R. Leavitt. 1981. ``ThePenetration of Formulated Guthion Spray Through Selected Fabrics.'' <T3>Journal of Environmental Science and Health</T3> B16(5): 617-628. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(68) Osterloh, John D., B. Cohen, W. Popendorf, and S.M. Pond. 1984.``Urinary Excretion of the N-Acetyl Cysteine Conjugate of CIS-1, 3-Dichloropropeneby Exposed Individuals.'' <T3>Archives of Environmental Health</T3> 39: 2-6. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(69) Peoples, S.A. 1986. University of California at Davis. Personalcommunication. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(70) Peoples, S.A. and J.B. Knaak. 1982. ``Monitoring Pesticide SafetyPrograms by Measuring Blood Cholinesterase and Analyzing Blood and Urinefor Pesticides and Their Metabolites.'' In <T3>Pesticide Residues and Exposure</T3>, pp. 41-57. 41-57. Symposium Series182. Washington, DC: American Chemical Society. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(71) Piper, Lanny, Jane Bergsten, and Winston Liao. 1984. ``Summaryof Documentation of the 1971-1973 and 1974-1976 National Studies of HospitalAdmitted Pesticide Poisonings.'' Research Triangle Park, North Carolina:Research Triangle Institute. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(72) Piper, Lanny, Jane Bergsten, and Winston Liao. 1984. ``Summaryof Pesticide Incident Monitoring System Data.'' Research Triangle Park,North Carolina: Research Triangle Institute. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(73) Piper, Lanny, and Jane Bergsten. 1984. ``Consumer Product SafetyCommission Emergency Room Survey.'' Research Triangle Park, North Carolina:Research Triangle Institute. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(74) Popendorf, W. 1980. ``Exploring Citrus Harvesters' Exposure toPesticide Contaminated Foliar Dust.'' <T3>American Industrial Hygiene Association of Journal</T3> 41: 652-659.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(75) Popendorf, W. 1985. ``Advances in the Unified Field Model forReentry Hazards.'' In <T3>Dermal Exposure Related to Pesticide Use.</T3> Edited by Honeycutt,Sweig, and Ragsdale. ACS Symposium Series 273. Washington, DC: AmericanChemical Society. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(76) Popendorf, W. 1985. ``Reentry Simulation Study, Phase I. DraftReport.'' Unpublished. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(77) Popendorf, W., R.C. Spear, J.T. Leffingwell, J. Yager, and E.Kahn. 1979. ``Harvester Exposure to Zolone (Phosalone) Residues in PeachOrchards.'' <T3>Journal of Occupational Medicine</T3> 21: 189-194. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(78) Putnam, A.R., M.D. Willis, L.K. Binning, and P.F. Boldt. 1982.``Exposure of Pesticide Applicators to Nitrofen: Influence of Formulation,Handling Systems, and Protective Garments.'' NCRPIAP-USDA, Report No. 157.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(79) Quinby, G.E. and A.B. Lemmon. 1958. ``Parathion Residues as aCause of Poisoning in Crop Workers.'' <T3>Journal of the American Medical Association</T3> 166: 740. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(80) Russell, L.S. 1981. ``Catalog of Protective Clothing/Safety Equipmentfor the Pesticide Applicator.'' Prepared by Mitre Corporation for U.S.EPA, Office of Pesticide Programs, under EPA Contract No. 68-01-5965. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(81) Southwick, J.W., H.D. Mecham, P.M. Cannon, et al. 1975. ``PesticideResidue in Laundry Clothing.'' Utah State Division of Health and AgriculturalChemicals. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(82) Spear, R.C., D.L. Jenkins, and T.H. Milby. 1975. ``PesticideResidues and Field Workers.'' <T3>Environmental Science and Technology</T3> 9: 308-313. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(83) Spear, R.C. 1980. ``Technical Problems in Determining Safe ReentryIntervals.'' <T3>Journal of Environmental Pathology and Toxicology</T3> 4: 293-304.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(84) Stuart, Carolyn, Winston Liao, and Jane Bergsten. 1984. ``Summaryof EPA Report 540/9-80-003_Chronic Neurological Sequelae of Acute OrganophosphatePesticide Poisonings: A Case-Control Study.'' Research Triangle Park, NorthCarolina: Research Triangle Institute. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(85) Stuart, Carolyn, Jane Bergsten, and Winston Liao. 1984. ``Summaryof California Reports on the Incidence of Pesticide Poisonings.'' ResearchTriangle Park, North Carolina: Research Triangle Institute. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(86) Stuart, Carolyn, Jane Bergsten, Lanny Piper, and Winston Liao.1984. ``Final Report: Worker Protection Standards Support.'' Research TrianglePark, North Carolina: Research Triangle Institute. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(87) Stuart, Carolyn, Winston Liao, and Jane Bergsten. 1984. ``Summaryof the Federal Government and the Incidence of Pesticide Poisonings: Surveyof Migrant and Rural Health Clinics.'' Research Triangle Park, North Carolina:Research Triangle Institute. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(88) Stuart, Carolyn, Winston Liao, and Jane Bergsten. 1984. ``Summaryof Chemical Exposure Data From Bureau of Labor Statistics and Worker'sCompensation Programs in Oregon and Ohio.'' Research Triangle Park, NorthCarolina: Research Triangle Institute. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(89) Stuart, Carolyn, Winston Liao, and Jane Bergsten. 1984. ``Summaryof Reports Concerning Pesticide and Chemical Exposures in North Carolina,Wisconsin, South Carolina, Washington, and Pennsylvania.'' Research TrianglePark, North Carolina: Research Triangle Institute. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(90) Taschenberg, E.F., J.B. Bourke, and D.F. Minnick. 1975. ``AnAir Filter-Pressurization Unit to Protect the Tractor Operator ApplyingPesticides.'' <T3>Bulletin of Environmental Contamination Toxicology</T3> 13: 263. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(91) Task Group of Occupational Exposure to Pesticides. T.H. Milby,Chairman. 1974. ``Occupational Exposure to Pesticides.'' Report to theFederal Working Group on Pest Management, Washington, DC. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(92) Tomatis, L. 1976. ``The IARC Program on the Evaluation of theCarcinogenic Risk of Chemicals to Man.'' <T3>Annals of the New York Academy of Sciences</T3> 271: 396-409. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(93) U.S. Congress. Office of Technology Assessment. 1985. <T3>Preventing Illness and Injury in the Workplace</T3> (OTA-H-256), Chapter8, Washington, DC: Government Printing Office. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(94) U.S. Department of Agriculture and U.S. Environmental ProtectionAgency. 1983. <T3>Applying Pesticides Correctly: A Guide for Private and Commercial Applicators.</T3>Raleigh, North Carolina: North Carolina State University. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(95) U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. National CancerInstitute. 1986. ``Cancer and Agricultural Herbicides.'' Press release,September 4, 1986. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(96) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. Office of Pesticide Programs.1976. <T3>National Study of Hospital Admitted Pesticide Poisonings</T3>. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(97) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. Office of Pesticide Programs.1980. <T3>National Study of Hospitalized Pesticide Poisonings 1974-1976</T3>.Washington, DC: Government Printing Office. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(98) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. Office of Pesticide Programs.1986. ``Report to Congress: Hospital Treated Pesticide Poisoning Survey.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(99) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. Office of Pesticide Programs.1986. <T3>Pesticide Safety for Farmworkers.</T3> Washington, DC: Government PrintingOffice. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(100) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. Office of Pesticide Programs.1986. <T3>Pesticide Safety for Non-Certified Mixers, Loaders, and Applicators</T3>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(101) Vitzthum, E.F., R.E. Gold, and D.L. Olson. 1984. ``AssessingPesticide Impact on Human Health in Nebraska: A Survey of Ambulance Servicesand Rescue Squads.'' Research project funded in part by the National AgriculturalPesticide Impact Assessment Program (NPIAP) of the U.S. Department of Agricultureand conducted jointly by the Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources,University of Nebraska-Lincoln and the University of Nebraska Medical Center,Omaha. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(102) Waldron, A.C. 1985. ``The Potential for Applicator-Worker Exposureto Pesticides in Greenhouse Operations.'' In <T3>Dermal Exposure Related to Pesticide Use</T3>. Edited by Honeycutt,Zweig, and Ragsdale. ACS Symposium Series 273. Washington, DC: AmericanChemical Society. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(103) Wasserstrom, Robert F. and Richard Wiles. 1985. <T3>Field Duty: U.S. Farmworkers and Pesticide Safety</T3>. Washington,DC: World Resources Institute. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(104) Wester, R.C., and H.I. Maibach. 1985. ``In Vivo PrecutaneousAbsorption and Decontamination of Pesticides in Humans.'' <T3>Journal of Toxicology and Environmental Health</T3> 16: 25-37. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(105) Whorton, M.D. and D.L. Obrinsky. 1983. ``Persistence of SymptomsAfter Mild to Moderate Acute Organophosphate Poisoning Among 19 Farm FieldWorkers.'' <T3>Journal of Toxicology and Environmental Health</T3> 11: 374-354. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(106) Wolfe, H.R. 1972. ``Protection of Individuals Who Mix or ApplyPesticides in the Field.'' In: <T3>Proceedings of the National Conference on Protective Clothing and SafetyEquipment for Pesticide Workers.</T3> Washington, DC: EPA Federal WorkingGroup on Pest Management. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(107) Wolfe, H.R. 1973. ``Workers Should Be Protected from PesticideExposure.'' <T3>Weeds, Trees and Turf, </T3>Vol. 12, No. 4.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(108) Wolfe, H.R., W.F. Durham, and J.F. Armstrong. 1967. ``Exposureof Workers to Pesticides.'' <T3>Archives of Environmental Health </T3>14: 622-632.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(109) Wolfe, H.R., D.C. Staiff, J.F. Armstrong, and S.W. Comer. 1972.``Exposure of Spraymen to Pesticides.'' <T3>Archives of Environmental Health </T3>25: 29-31.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(110) Yeary, Roger A. 1986. Chemlawn Services Corporation. Personalcommunication.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(111) Zweig, Gunter, J.D. Adams, and J. Blondell. 1980. ``MinimizingOccupational Exposure to Pesticides: Federal Reentry Standards for FarmWorkers (Present and Proposed).'' <T3>Residue Reviews </T3>75: 103-112.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(112) Zweig, Gunter, R. Gao, and W.J. Popendorf. 1983. ``SimultaneousDermal Exposure to Captan and Benomyl by Strawberry Harvesters.'' <T3>Journal of Agricultural and Food Chemistry </T3>31: 1109-1113.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(113) Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration.1987. ``Field Sanitation; Final Rule.'' 52 FR 16050. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(114) Ames, R.G., S.K. Brown, J.W. Stratton, D.C. Mengle, E. Kahn,R.J. Jackson. 1987. ``Cholinesterase Activity Depression Among CaliforniaPesticide Applicators: Results from the 1985 Cholinesterase MonitoringProgram.'' California Department of Health Services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">IX Regulatory Requirements</ITAG>A. Executive Order 12291Under Executive Order 12291, EPA must judge whether a regulation is ``major''and must submit its analysis supporting its findings to the Office of Managementand Budget (OMB) for review. The Agency has determined that this proposedrevision of Part 170 is a major regulation as defined by E.O. 12291. Aregulatory impact analysis has been developed and submitted to OMB as required.This document is available for public inspection at the address given atthe beginning of this <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. A summary follows. EPA proposes to revise 40 CFR Part 170 to specify requirements that wouldmitigate the risks from exposure to pesticides and their residues by pesticidehandlers and agricultural workers. EPA has developed, considered and analyzedmany approaches to mitigating these risks and proposes to issue regulationscovering reentry intervals, personal protective equipment, training, notification,decontamination, emergency medical duties and cholinesterase monitoring.The proposed regulations would serve to protect the hired labor force of2.3 million persons exposed either directly or indirectly to pesticidesas a result of their occupations on farms, in forests, in nurseries, orin greenhouses. This workforce includes 1.8 million hired farmworkers,150 thousand commercial pesticide applicator personnel, 7.2 thousand workersin forestry, 125 thousand workers in nurseries and 175 thousand workersin greenhouses. The total incremental cost (not including costs already incurred) in thefirst year of this proposed regulation, given existing regulations at theState and Federal level, is an estimated $170.0 million, representing anaverage cost per worker protected of $74. Total incremental costs attributableto specific requirements ranged from $6.0 million for emergency medicalduties (an average of $2.22 per worker) to $35.4 million for cholinesterasemonitoring (an average of $15.39 per worker). These costs would affectsectors of the agricultural economy according to their intensity of pesticideuse and types of pesticides used. The estimated first year nonincrementalcost by sector ranges from $167 for an average feed/grain farm to $611for an average vegetable farm to $3,515 for an average greenhouse to $8,910for an average commercial pesticide application firm. The benefits that would accrue to pesticide handlers and field workersfrom the proposed regulation would include reduction in lost time fromthe workforce, reduced medical expenses and overall increased productivityfrom having a workforce less affected by pesticide exposure. While thesebenefits cannot be quantified, the Agency believes that these types ofbenefits would be substantialB. Regulatory Flexibility ActThis rulemaking has been reviewed under the Regulatory Flexibility Actof 1980 (Pub. L. 96-354; 94 Stat. 1164; 5 U.S.C. 601-612). The resultsof that review have been incorporated into the regulatory impact analysis.The proposed regulation was found to affect farms in all size categories.The vast majority of farms are small businesses. The Agency is seekingfurther information on the impact of this proposal on small agriculturalestablishments. <ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG>The Office of Management and Budget (OMB) has approved the informationcollection requirements contained in this proposed rule under the provisionsof the Paperwork Reduction Act, 44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq., </T3>and has assigned OMB control number 2070-A326. Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto average 6.5 hours per response, including time for reviewing instructions,searching existing data sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed,and completing and reviewing the collection of information. Send comments regarding the burden estimate or any other aspect of thiscollection of information, including suggestions for reducing this burden,to Chief, Information Policy Branch, PM-223, U.S. Environmental ProtectionAgency, 401 M St., SW., Washington, DC 20460; and to the Office of Informationand Regulatory Affairs, Office of Management and Budget, Washington, DC20503, marked ``Attention: Desk Officer for EPA.'' The final rule willrespond to any OMB or public comments on the information collection requirementscontained in this proposal.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 40 CFR Parts 156 and 170 </ITAG>Environmental protection, Labeling, Pesticides and pests, Intergovernmentalrelations, Occupational safety and health.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: June 28, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">A. James Barnes, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Administrator.</ITAG>Therefore, it is proposed that Chapter I of Title 40 be amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 156_LABELING REQUIREMENTS FOR PESTICIDES AND DEVICES </ITAG>1. In Part 156: a. The authority citation continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>7 U.S.C. 136-136y.</ITAG>b. By adding new Subpart K, to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart K_Agricultural Worker Protection Statements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">156.200 Scope and applicability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">156.202 Authority of the Agency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">156.205 Reference statement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">156.206 General statements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">156.210 Reentry statements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">156.212 Posting statements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">156.215 General personal protective equipment statements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">156.216 Personal protective equipment for handlers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">156.217 Personal protective equipment for early reentry workers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart K_Agricultural Worker Protection Statements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;156.200 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope and applicability. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Scope. </T3>This subpart prescribes labeling requirements for the protectionof agricultural pesticide handlers and workers in pesticide-treated areas.The statements incorporate by reference the worker protection standardsof Part 170 of this chapter. This subpart also prescribes reentry intervaland personal protective equipment statements which must be placed on labeling.(b) <T3>Applicability. </T3>(1) The requirements of this subpart apply to eachpesticide product that bears directions for use or whose labeling reasonablypermits use in the production of any agricultural plant on or in any farm,forest, nursery, or greenhouse. (2) The requirements of this subpart do not apply to a product that bearsdirections solely for uses exempted by andSection;170.3(b)(2) of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;156.202 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Authority of the Agency. </ITAG>The Agency, upon its own initiative or upon application by a registrantor other person in accordance with andSection;andSection;156.210, 156.216 or156.217, may modify or waive the requirements of this subpart, or may permitalternative labeling statements to be used. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;156.205 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reference statement. </ITAG>The label of each product shall bear the reference statement: ``On or infarms, forests, nurseries, or greenhouses, use only in accordance withPart 170 of Title 40, Code of Federal Regulations, EPA regulations forthe protection of agricultural workers and pesticide handlers. These regulationsare part of the labeling of this product and should be obtained by theuser. Some States have more restrictive worker protection requirements;consult your State agency responsible for pesticide regulation for informationon your State's requirements.'' <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;156.206 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General statements. </ITAG>(a) The labeling of each product shall bear the statement: ``Do not applythis product in a way that will contact unprotected workers, either directlyor through drift. Only protected handlers may be in the area during application.''(b) If the product is assigned to Toxicity Category I or II in accordancewith andSection;162.10(h)(1) of this chapter: (1) The signal word shall appear in Spanish as well as English. (2) The statement, ``Si usted no lee ingles, no use este producto hastaque el etiqueta haya sido explicado ampliamente,'' shall appear on thelabel in close proximity to the Spanish signal word. [Translation: If youcannot read English, do not use this product until the label has been fullyexplained to you.] (c) If the product contains an organophosphate or N-methyl carbamate, oris a fumigant, the label shall so state. The identification may appearas part of the product name, as part of the product type identificationor as a separate statement. It may not appear only within the ingredientsstatement. (d) If the product is required to bear the skull and crossbones on thelabel, the product labeling shall also bear the statement: ``Visual orvoice contact must be made at least every two hours with any person whois mixing, loading, or applying this product.'' (e) If the product is a fumigant, the product labeling shall bear the statement:``Visual contact must be maintained by an observer at all times with anyperson who is applying this product in a greenhouse or similar structure,or who enters the greenhouse before the reentry interval has expired. Theobserver must have immediate access to the same personal protective equipmentrequired for an applicator of this product.'' <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;156.210 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reentry statements. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirement. </T3>Each product shall bear reentry statements as prescribedby this section. The statements consist of: (1) The prohibition against immediate reentry specified in paragraph (c)(1)of this section. (2) The reentry statement specified in paragraph (c)(2) of this section,if applicable. (3) The interim or product-specific reentry interval in accordance withparagraph (d) or (e) of this section, if applicable.(b) <T3>Location of reentry statements. </T3>The statements required by paragraph(a) (1) and (2) of this section shall be located in the use directionsof the product labeling under the heading ``REENTRY.'' If the statementsare not located on the label of the product but are in supplemental labelingaccompanying the product during distribution or sale, the human hazardprecautionary section of the label shall contain a reference statementto the reentry statements elsewhere. The required statements may be combinedto avoid redundancy as long as the requirements and conditions under whichthey apply are clearly identified. The interim or product specific reentryinterval required by paragraph (a)(3) of this section shall be associatedon the labeling with each crop or use to which it applies, immediatelypreceded or followed by the words ``Reentry Interval'' (or the letters``REI'' if previously defined in the labeling). If the same reentry intervalapplies to all crops and uses, the reentry interval may be listed oncetogether with other statements under the heading ``REENTRY.'' (c) <T3>General reentry statements. </T3>(1) Each product shall bear the statement,``Do not enter or allow entry into treated areas until [sprays have dried/dustshave settled/vapors have dispersed, as applicable] to perform hand labortasks. A person may enter the area to perform other tasks only if the personis wearing the personal protective equipment listed on the label for apesticide handler.'' (2) Each product for which an interim or product-specific reentry intervalhas been established shall bear the statement, ``After [sprays have dried/dustshave settled/vapors have dispersed, as applicable] do not enter or allowentry into the treated area until the reentry interval has expired, unlessthe person entering the treated area is wearing the personal protectiveequipment listed on the label for early reentry.'' (d) <T3>Product specific reentry intervals. </T3>A product-specific reentryinterval is established based on reentry protection data submitted in accordancewith andSection;158.140 of this chapter and Subdivision K of the PesticideAssessment Guidelines. A product specific reentry interval shall supersedeany interim reentry interval applicable to the product. (e) <T3>Interim reentry intervals</T3>_(1) <T3>Existing interval. </T3>An interim reentry interval established bythe Agency prior to the effective date of this subpart will continue toapply unless a longer interim reentry interval is required by paragraph(e)(2) of this section. However, if reentry protection data were requiredat the time of the establishment of the existing interval and flagged forexpedited review, the existing interval will continue to apply even ifa longer interim reentry interval is required by paragraph (e)(2) of thissection. (2) <T3>Interval based on acute toxicity of the active ingredient. </T3>(i)If there is no existing reentry interval, or if an existing reentry intervalis superseded under paragraph (e)(1) of this section, an interim intervalshall be established, based upon the acute toxicity of the active ingredient(s)in the product. The Toxicity Category of each active ingredient in theproduct shall be determined based upon a comparison of data on the acutedermal toxicity, eye irritation effects, or skin irritation effects ofthe ingredient to the criteria of andSection;162.10(h)(1) of this chapter.If no dermal toxicity data are available, data on oral toxicity shall alsobe considered in this comparison. (ii) If the product contains a sole active ingredient which is in ToxicityCategory I and which belongs to the organophosphate or N-methyl carbamatechemical class, the interim reentry interval shall be 48 hours. (iii) If the product contains any other sole active ingredient which isin Toxicity Category I, the interim reentry interval shall be 24 hours.(iv) If the product contains a sole active ingredient which is in ToxicityCategory II and which belongs to the organophosphate or N-methyl carbamatechemical class, the interim reentry interval shall be 24 hours. (v) If the product contains any other sole active ingredient which is inToxicity Category II, there shall be no interim reentry interval. (vi) If the product contains only active ingredients which are in ToxicityCategory III or IV, there shall be no interim reentry interval. (vii) If the product contains more than one active ingredient, the interimreentry interval shall be the longest interval among the active ingredientsdetermined by the criteria in paragraphs (e)(2) (ii) through (vi) of thissection. (f) <T3>Modification based upon Special Review. </T3>If the Agency concludes,in accordance with andSection;154.25(c) of this chapter, that a pesticideshould be placed in Special Review because of a determination that it meetsor exceeds the criteria of andSection;154.7(a) (1) or (2) of the chapterfor human health effects, the Agency will at that time also determine anappropriate interim reentry interval. (g) <T3>Modification based upon submission of data. </T3>The Agency may, basedupon data submitted by any person demonstrating that exposure levels resultingfrom the application of a pesticide product warrant a shorter or longerreentry interval than that required by this section, modify the reentryinterval on a case-by-case basis. Supporting data may be in accordancewith Part 158 of this chapter and Subdivision K of the Pesticide AssessmentGuidelines, or other medical, epidemiological, or health effects studies.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 156.212 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Posting statements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirement</T3>_(1) Each product that has a reentry interval of greaterthan 48 hours for any crop or use site shall bear the statement: ``Areastreated with this product are subject to posting.''(2) Each product that has a reentry interval of 48 hours or less, and thateither bears directions for use in greenhouses or nurseries or whose labelingreasonably permits use in greenhouses or nurseries shall bear the statement:``If this product is used in nurseries or greenhouses, treated areas mustbe posted before application and must remain posted until the reentry intervalhas expired.''(b) <T3>Location.</T3> The posting statement required by paragraph (a) (1)or (2) of this section may be located on the product labeling with thespecific crops or sites to which it applies or, if it applies to more thanone crop or site, may be located in the general use directions.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 156.215 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General personal protection equipment statements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirement.</T3> Each product shall bear the personal protective equipment(PPE) statements prescribed by andSection;andSection; 156.216 and 156.217.PPE requirements for a product established prior to the effective dateof this subpart shall use the more protective of the requirements for eacharea of the body. However, any existing label prohibition on the use ofgloves or boots overrides the corresponding requirement of this subpart.(b) <T3>Location of PPE statements. </T3>PPE statements shall be located inthe use directions of the product labeling under the heading ``PERSONALPROTECTIVE EQUIPMENT.'' If the statements are not located on the labelof the product but are in supplemental labeling accompanying the productduring distribution or sale, the human hazard precautionary section ofthe label shall contain a reference statement to the PPE statements elsewhere.The required statements may be combined to avoid redundancy as long asthe requirements and conditions under which they apply are clearly identified.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 156.216 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Personal protective equipment for handlers.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Minimum PPE requirements.</T3> The table in paragraph (b) of this sectionsets out the minimum PPE requirements for pesticide handlers and earlyreentry workers entering treated areas before sprays have dried, dustshave settled, or vapors have dispersed, based upon the acute toxicity ofthe formulated product by route of exposure. The labeling shall specifythe PPE for each route of exposure, based upon data on the acute toxicityof the product by that route of exposure. If data to determine the acutetoxicity of the product by an applicable route of exposure are lacking,the Toxicity Category of the formulated product as a whole shall be usedto determine PPE required for that route of exposure.(b) <T3>Table.</T3><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,i1,s50,r125,r125,r50,r50</C><T4>Minimum Personal Protective Equipment and Normal Work Attire for PesticideHandlers and Workers Reentering Treated Areas Before Sprays Have Dried</T4><H1>Route of exposure</H1><H1>Formulated product toxicity category</H1><H2>I</H2><H2>II</H2><H2>III</H2><H2>IV</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">Dermal or skin irritation potential \1\<D>Protective suit \2\; Chemical-resistant gloves \3\; Chemical-resistantshoes, shoe covers, or boots</D><D>Protective suit; Chemical-resistant gloves; Chemical-resistant shoes,shoe covers, or boots</D><D>Normal work attire \4\; Chemical-resistant gloves</D><D>Normal work attire.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Inhalation<D>Respiratory protection device \5\</D><D>Respiratory protection device</D><D>No minimum \6\</D><D>No minimum.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Eye irritation potential<D>Goggles or face shield</D><D>Goggles or face shield</D><D>No minimum</D><D>  Do.</D><F>\1\ If dermal toxicity and skin irritation potential are known to bein different Toxicity Categories, the more toxic of the two shall be used.</F><F>\2\ A protective suit is a loose-fitting one-or two-piece garment, suchas a fabric coverall, that is worn over normal work attire and covers ata minimum the entire body except for the head, hands and feet.</F><F>\3\ ``Chemical-resistant'' material allows no measurable movement ofpesticide through the material during exposure.</F><F>\4\ Normal work attire consists at a minimum of long pants and longsleeved shirt, shoes and socks.</F><F>\5\ Respiratory protection device approved by the National Instituteof Occupational Health and Safety (NIOSH) and the Mine Safety and HealthAdministration (MSHA) for the intended pesticide use.</F><F>\6\ Although no minimum PPE is required by this Section for this ToxicityCategory and route of exposure, PPE may be required by the Agency underthese circumstances on a product-specific basis.</F></ITAG></ITAG>(c) <T3>Modifications based upon exposure pattern. </T3>In addition to theminimum requirements given in paragraph (b) of this section, the followingPPE instructions (or substitutions, as applicable) shall be included onthe labeling of each product that is in Toxicity Category I or II by dermaltoxicity or skin irritation potential.(1) <T3>Mixing/loading. </T3>Unless a chemical-resistant protective suit isotherwise required, the labeling shall specify that during mixing and loadinga chemical-resistant apron shall be worn in addition to other PPE.(2) <T3>Closed system mixing/loading. </T3>If the product may be mixed or loadedby a closed system that eliminates open atmospheric contact with the pesticideand its rinsate during transfer from the original container to the applicationequipment, the labeling may specify that under these circumstances:(i) Normal work attire, chemical-resistant apron and chemical-resistantgloves may be worn in lieu of other PPE;(ii) If pressure is used during closed system mixing or loading, gogglesor a face shield shall be worn in addition to other PPE; and(iii) All other PPE for a handler shall be available nearby for the mixer/loader'suse in case of equipment failure or other emergency.(3) <T3>Overhead exposure. </T3>If the product may be applied in a manner suchthat overhead exposure to the pesticide may occur, the labeling shall specifythat a chemical-resistant hat with a wide brim or a hood shall be wornin addition to other PPE.(4) <T3>Enclosed cab application. </T3>If the product may be applied usingan enclosed cab with positive pressure ventilation, the labeling may specifythat under these conditions normal work attire may be worn in lieu of PPE,which shall be available in the cab for the applicator's use when leavingthe cab while still in the treated area.(5) <T3>Aerial application. </T3>If the product may be aerially applied, thelabeling may specify that:(i) If an enclosed cockpit is used, normal work attire may be worn in lieuof other PPE, and chemical-resistant gloves shall be available in the cockpitfor the applicator's use when leaving an aircraft that is contaminatedwith pesticide residues.(ii) If a nonenclosed cockpit is used, chemical-resistant shoes, shoe coveringsor boots may be omitted and a helmet with a visor may be worn in lieu ofa hat and goggles or face shield.(6) <T3>Equipment cleaning and repair. </T3>The labeling shall specify thatduring cleaning and repair of mixing, loading and application equipment,a chemical-resistant apron, chemical-resistant gloves and chemical-resistantshoes, shoe coverings or boots shall be worn.(d) <T3>Modification based upon the toxicity of the product as diluted foruse. </T3>If the labeling requires the product to be diluted by the userbefore application, the registrant may propose to modify the PPE requirementsof paragraph (b) or (c) of this section for all handlers except mixer/loaders.In support of such proposal, the registrant shall submit or cite data onthe toxicity of the product as diluted for use by the routes of exposurefor which modification of PPE is sought. The PPE requirements for all handlersexcept mixer/loaders may then be based upon the data submitted for theproduct as diluted for use.(e) <T3>Modification based upon Special Review. </T3>If the agency concludesin accordance with andSection; 154.25(c) of this chapter that a pesticideshould be placed in Special Review because of a determination that thepesticide meets or exceeds the criteria of andSection; 154.7(a)(1) or (2)of this chapter for human health effects, the Agency will at that timealso determine appropriate interim PPE for handlers.(f) <T3>Modification based upon data submission. </T3>The Agency may, basedupon data submitted by any person demonstrating that exposure levels resultingfrom handler activities warrant different minimum PPE requirements thanrequired by this section, modify the minimum PPE requirements on a case-by-casebasis. Supporting data may be either data required by Subdivisions U orK of the Pesticide Assessment Guidelines or other medical, epidemiological,or health effects data.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 156.217 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Personal protective equipment for early reentry workers. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Minimum PPE requirements. </T3>The table in paragraph (b) of this sectionsets out the minimum PPE requirements for early reentry workers enteringtreated areas after sprays have dried, dusts have settled or vapors havedispersed and before the expiration of the reentry interval, based uponthe acute toxicity of the active ingredient by route of exposure. The labelingshall specify the PPE for each route of exposure, based upon data on theacute toxicity of the active ingredient by that route of exposure. If datato determine the acute toxicity of the active ingredient by any route ofexposure are lacking, the Toxicity Category of the active ingredient asa whole shall be used to determine PPE required for that route of exposure.(b) <T3>Table.</T3><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,i1,s50,r125,r125,r50,r50</C><T4>Minimum Personal Protective Equipment for Workers Reentering TreatedAreas After Sprays Have Dried and Before the Expiration of the ReentryInterval</T4><H1>Route of exposure </H1><H1>Active ingredient toxicity category</H1><H2>I </H2><H2>II </H2><H2>III </H2><H2>IV</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">Dermal or skin irritation potential.\1\ <D>Protective suit; \2\ Chemical-resistant gloves; \3\ Chemical-resistantshoes, shoe covers, or boots </D><D>Protective suit; Chemical-resistant gloves; Chemical-resistant shoes,shoe covers, or boots </D><D>No minimum \4\ </D><D>No minimum.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Eye irritation potential <D>Goggles or face shield </D><D>Goggles or face shield </D><D>No minimum </D><D>  Do.</D><F>\1\ If dermal toxicity and skin irritation potential are known to bein different Toxicity Categories, the more toxic of the two shall be used.</F><F>\2\ A protective suit is a loose-fitting one- or two-piece garment,such as a fabric coverall, that is worn over normal work attire and coversat a minimum the entire body except for the head, hands and feet.</F><F>\3\ ``Chemical-resistant'' material allows no measurable movement ofpesticide through the material during</F><F>\4\ Although no minimum PPE is required by this section for this ToxicityCategory and route of exposure, PPE may be required by the Agency underthese circumstances on a product-specific basis.</F></ITAG></ITAG>(c) <T3>Modification based upon Special Review, </T3>If the Agency concludes,in accordance with andSection; 154.25(c) of this chapter, that a pesticideshould be placed in Special Review because of a determination that thepesticide meets or exceeds the criteria of andSection; 154.7(a)(1) or (2)of this chapter, for human health effects, the Agency will at that timealso determine appropriate interim PPE for early reentry workers.(d) <T3>Modification based upon data submission. </T3>The Agency may, basedupon data submitted by any person demonstrating that exposure levels resultingfrom the early reeentry activities warrant different minimum PPE requirementsthan required by this section, modify the minimum PPE requirements on acase-by-case basis. Supporting data may be either data required by SubdivisionsU or K of the Pesticide Assessment Guidelines or other medical, epidemiologicalor health effects data.2. By revising Part 170 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 170_WORKER PROTECTION STANDARDS FOR AGRICULTURAL PESTICIDES</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70"/><T3>Sec</T3>.<ITAG tagnum="26">170.1 Purpose and overview.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.3 Applicability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.5 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.7 Duties of persons covered under this part.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.9 Violations of this part.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Standards for Pesticide Handlers and Early Reentry Workers</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.10 Applicability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.12 Training.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.14 Access to labeling information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.16 Duties related to personal protective equipment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.18 Decontamination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.20 Cholinesterase monitoring.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Common Standards for Workers on or in Farms Forests, Nurseriesand Greenhouses</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.30 Applicability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.32 General pesticide safety information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.34 Emergency duties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.36 Precautions during application of pesticides.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.38 Decontamination</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Special Standards for Workers on Farms and in Forests</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.40 Applicability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.42 Information about pesticide applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.44 Posting.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.46 Reentry.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Special Standards for Workers in Nurseries</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.50 Applicability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.52 Information about pesticide applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.54 Posting.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.56 Reentry.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart F_Special Standards for Workers in Greenhouses</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.60 Applicability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.62 Information about pesticide applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.64 Posting.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">170.66 Reentry.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>7 U.S.C. 136w.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and overview.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Purpose. </T3>The purpose of this part is to set standards, to be incorporatedinto pesticide labeling, designed to help protect persons who work on orin farms, forests, nurseries, or greenhouses from injury or disease thatmight result from occupational exposure to pesticides or pesticide residues.This part requires workplace practices designed to lessen the risk of exposureand to deal with exposures that may occur.(b) <T3>Overview of the organization of this part. </T3>This part consistsof six subparts:(1) Subpart A describes the coverage of this part, defines terms used throughoutthis part, and describes generally the duties of persons and the conditionsunder which these persons are subject to penalties for failure to performthe duties.(2) Supbart B contains standards for the protection of handlers and earlyreentry workers on all use sites.(3) Subpart C contains standards for the prorection of all workers on alluse sites.(4) Subpart D contains standards for the protection of all workers on farmsand in forests.(5) Subpart E contains standards for the protection of all workers in nurseries.(6) Subpart F contains standards for the protection of all workers in greenhouses.Pesticide labeling requirements that are related to this part are containedin Subpart K of Part 156 of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The requirements of this part apply if any pesticideto which this part applies (see paragraph (b) of this section) is usedon or in any farm, forest, nursery, or greenhouse to which this part applies(see paragraph (c) of this section).(b) <T3>Pesticides to which this part applies</T3>_(1) <T3>General rule. </T3>This part applies to any pesticide product whoselabel bears directions for use in the production of any agricultural plantand contains either the reference statement set forth in andSection; 156.205of this chapter or any other reference to this part.(2) <T3>Exceptions. </T3>This part does not apply to any pesticide to the extentthat it is used or applied only:(i) For public mosquito abatement or similar public pest control programssponsored by government entities, not including such programs that takeplace entirely on property owned or leased by the sponsoring governmentalentity; (ii) On livestock or other animals; (iii) On golf courses or on turf areas that are not located on turf orsod farms or in greenhouses; (iv) In such structures as malls, atriums, or office buildings where agriculturalplants are present primarily for aesthetic or climatic modifications; (v) In and around habitations, including, but not limited to, on noncommercialcrop or ornamental gardens, in non-commercial greenhouses, or on lawns,shrubs, or trees; (vi) By injection directly into agricultural plants (however, this partdoes apply to ``hack and squirt'', ``frill and spray'' and other techniquesthat do not involve direct injection); (vii) In a manner which is not directly related to the production of agriculturalplants, including, but not limited to, structural pest control, controlof vegetation along rights-of-way and in other noncrop areas, control ofvertebrate pests, and attractants and repellents in containers; (viii) After harvest on the harvested portions of agricultural plants;or (ix) For research purposes by any person, if the purpose of the researchis primarily to determine the properties or effects of pesticides and ifall handling activities and hand labor tasks associated with such researchare performed by or under the direct supervision of the person conductingthe research. (c) <T3>Sites to which this part applies. </T3>This part applies to any farm,forest, nursery, or greenhouse on or in which: (1) Any worker performs any work related to the production of agriculturalplants; and (2) Any pesticide to which this part applies is used in the productionof agricultural plants. (d) <T3>Effect of this part on compliance with pesticide labeling statementsby certain persons. </T3>Although an owner of a farm, forest, nursery orgreenhouse and immediate family members of an owner are not consideredto be workers for purposes of this part, such persons are required to complywith pesticide labeling statements pertaining to reentry and personal protectiveequipment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>Terms used in this part have the same meanings as they do in the FederalInsecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act, as amended. In addition, asused in this part, the following terms shall have the meanings stated below:``Agricultural plant'' means any agricultural, ornamental, or forestryplant, or part thereof. Agricultural plants include, but are not limitedto, food, feed and fiber plants, trees, turf, flowers, shrubs, and seedlings.``Chemical-resistant,'' when applied to any material, means that therewill be no measureable movement of the pesticide product through the materialduring the period of use. ``Early reentry worker'' means any worker who is directed to enter a reentry-restrictedarea prior to the expiration of any reentry interval that applies to thatarea. ``Employer'' means any person who employs any worker or handler, for anytype of compensation, to perform tasks relating to the production of agriculturalplants. ``Farm'' means any area that is used, in whole or in part, for the productionof agricultural plants, that is not a forest, nursery or greenhouse. ``Forest'' means any area containing trees and associated vegetation used,in whole or in part, for the commercial production of wood fiber or timberproducts. The term does not include trees located in any nursery. ``Greenhouse'' means any structure or space that is enclosed with nonporouscovering, that is of sufficient size to permit worker entry, and that isused, in whole or in part, for the production of agricultural plants. Suchstructures include greenhouses, polyhouses, mushroom houses, rhubarb housesand similar structures. ``Hand labor tasks'' means harvesting, detasseling, thinning, weeding,topping, planting, sucker removal, pruning, disbudding, roguing, or anyother task that causes any worker to come into substantial contact withsurfaces (such as plants, plant parts or soil) that may contain pesticideresidues. ``Handler'' or ``pesticide handler'' means any worker who: mixes, loads,transfers, transports, applies or disposes of pesticides; acts as a flagger;or cleans, adjusts, or repairs contaminated parts of mixing, loading, orapplication equipment. The term does not include any worker who transportspesticides in containers that have never been opened. ``Normal work attire'' means, at a minimum, long pants, long-sleeved shirt,shoes, and socks. ``Nursery'' means any property that is not enclosed with nonporous coveringand that is used, in whole or in part, for the production of agriculturalplants which will be used in their entirety in another location. ``Owner'' means any person who has a present possessory interest (fee,leasehold, or other) in land on which a farm, forest, greenhouse or nurserycovered by this part is located, by virtue of which interest the personhas the legal right to prevent other persons from entering the land orto require them to leave it. ``Person'' means any individual, partnership, association, or corporation,or any organized group of persons, whether incorporated or not. ``Personal protective equipment'' means devices and clothing that are wornover, in place of, or in addition to normal work attire for the purposeof protecting the human body from contact with pesticides or pesticideresidues. ``Pesticide-treated area'' means any area to which a pesticide has beendirected. ``Potable water'' means water that meets the standards for drinking purposesestablished by State or local authority having jurisdiction or water thatmeets the National Interim Primary Drinking Water Standards, set forthin Part 141 of this chapter. ``Protective suit'' means any loose-fitting, one- or two-piece garmentthat is worn over normal work attire and covers at a minimum the entirebody except for the feet, hands, and head. ``Reentry interval'' means the period of time after the end of a pesticideapplication on, in, or near an area during which entry into the area isrestricted, including at a minimum the period of time required for spraysto dry, dusts to settle and vapors to disperse.  ``Reentry-restricted area'' means the pesticide-treated area and any additionalarea into which entry is restricted during the reentry interval becauseof drift or overspray of pesticides beyond the pesticide-treated area.``Supervisor'' means any person who directly or indirectly exercises controland direction over any worker. ``Worker'' means any person employed for any type of compensation to performtasks relating to the production of agricultural plants. The term doesnot include an owner of a farm, forest, nursery or greenhouse or the immediatefamily of an owner, the immediate family including only an owner's spouse,children, stepchildren, foster children, parents, stepparents, foster parents,brothers, and sisters. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;170.7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Duties of persons covered under this part. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Duties of owner</T3>. The owner of any farm, forest, nursery or greenhouseshall: (1) Assure that any pesticide that is used on such property is used ina manner that is consistent with the labeling of the pesticide includingthe requirements of this part. (2) Assure that any worker who works on such property receives the protectionsrequired by this part. (3) Provide, to each person who performs or supervises any work on suchproperty, information and directions sufficient to assure that each workeron such property receives the protections required by this part. Such informationand directions shall include where and when pesticides will be or havebeen applied, which areas have restrictions on reentry, and which personsare responsible for actions required to comply with this part: (4) Require each supervisor of any worker on such property to assure complianceby the worker with the provisions of this part and to assure that the workerreceives the protections required by this part. (b) <T3>Duties of other persons</T3>. Each person who performs or supervisesany work related to the production of agricultural plants or the use ofany pesticide on or in any farm, forest, nursery or greenhouse shall: (1) Comply with all instructions and directions given by the owner or otherpersons acting for the owner, or by the person's employer, that are intendedto assure compliance with this part. (2) Assure that any worker the person supervises receives the protectionsrequired by this part. (3) Assure that any pesticide the person uses or supervises the use ofis used in a manner that is consistent with the labeling of the pesticide,including the requirements of this part. (c) <T3>Prohibited actions</T3>. No owner, employer, or supervisor shall allowor direct a worker to violate any requirement of this part, or take anyaction intended to prevent or discourage any worker from complying or attemptingto comply with any requirement of this part. However, this part does notprohibit an owner, employer, or supervisor from discharging or otherwisedisciplining any worker for failure to comply with instructions to takean action required by this part or to refrain from an action prohibitedby this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;170.9 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Violations of this part. </ITAG>(a) Under FIFRA section 12(a)(2)(G) it is unlawful for any person ``touse any registered pesticide in a manner inconsistent with its labeling.''EPA interprets the term ``to use any registered pesticide'' as referringto, among other things, application, arranging for or allowing application,making necessary preparations for application, or supervising applicationof a pesticide, or taking any required postapplication actions. Each personwho uses a pesticide must not use it in a manner inconsistent with itslabeling, including the requirements of this part. (b) A person who has a duty under this part (see andSection;170.7) and whofails to perform that duty violates FIFRA section 12(a)(2)(G) and is subjectto a civil or criminal penalty under FIFRA section 14. (c) FIFRA section 14(b)(4) provides that a person is liable for a penaltyunder FIFRA if another person employed by or acting for him violates anyprovision of FIFRA. The term ``acting for'' includes both employment andcontractual relationships. (d) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) through (c) of this section, if a personwho is under contract to perform services on the property of an owner,or who is the employee of such a contractor, violates any requirement ofthis part, the owner of the property shall not be considered to have committedan unlawful act solely because of such violation if the violation did notoccur on the property of the owner. (e) The fact that a person covered under this part failed to obey instructionsto take an action required by this part (or instructions to refrain froman action prohibited by this part) shall not preclude enforcement actionagainst other persons who have duties under this part. However, any suchnon-compliance that is directly related to a violation of this part shallbe taken into account in administrative decisions concerning initiationof enforcement action and determination of penalties with regard to suchviolation. <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart B_Standards for Pesticide Handlers and Early Reentry Workers</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;170.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability. </ITAG>This subpart contains standards to protect pesticide handlers and earlyreentry workers for pesticides used on or in farms, forests, nurseriesand greenhouses. In this subpart, the word ``worker'' refers only to pesticidehandlers and early reentry workers. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;170.12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Training. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General</T3>. Each worker shall be trained under the provisions ofthis section, unless such person is a certified commercial or private applicatorunder Part 171 of this chapter. (b) <T3>Training programs</T3>. (1) A trainer shall present general informationon pesticides to workers orally or audiovisually and shall answer questionsthat arise. The trainer shall be a certified commercial or private applicatorunder Part 171 of this chapter or otherwise designated by a State or Federalagency as a trainer of certified applicators. (2) General information on pesticides shall include at a minimum the following:(i) Format and meaning of information contained on pesticide labels andin supplementary labeling, including safety information such as human hazardprecautionary statements; (ii) Acute and chronic hazards of pesticides; (iii) Common signs and symptoms of pesticide poisoning, including signsand symptoms of cholinesterase inhibition; (iv) Routes through which pesticides can enter the body; (v) Appropriate use of personal protective equipment; (vi) Emergency first aid for pesticide injuries or poisonings; (vii) How to find emergency medical care; (viii) Safety requirements for handling, transporting, storing, and disposingof pesticides, including procedures for spill cleanup; (ix) Safety requirements for routine washing of face and hands before eating,drinking, using the toilet, or using gum or tobacco; (x) Safety requirements for whole body decontamination in an emergencyexposure situation and at the end of the handling activities, includinginstructions not to wear home or take home contaminated personal protectiveequipment; (xi) (If applicable) Information that pesticides are applied in irrigationwater in some areas. Warnings not to enter such areas when the irrigationsystem is operating and until foliage has dried and soil surface waterhas disappeared. Instructions not to drink, bathe in, use, play in, orenter the water in furrows, puddles, ponds, canals, or ditches associatedwith an irrigation system used to apply pesticides; (xii) Basic information on the safe and appropriate operation of mixing,loading, and application equipment; (xiii) Environmental concerns such as drift, runoff, and wildlife hazards.(c) <T3>State requirements. </T3>(1) A State may impose additional requirementsfor training consistent with those set forth in this section. (2) A State shall petition the Agency for approval of any training requirementinconsistent with those set forth in this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.14</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Access to labeling information. </ITAG>Any information from the labeling of any pesticide that is being or isscheduled to be handled, or the labeling itself, shall be provided uponrequest to any handler of that pesticide.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.16</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Duties related to personal protective equipment. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Provision. </T3>When personal protective equipment (PPE) is requiredby the labeling of any pesticide for any worker, such PPE shall be providedin clean and operating condition to such worker. (b) <T3>Use. </T3>(1) All required PPE shall be used correctly for its intendedpurpose and in accordance with any manufacturer's instructions. (2) No worker shall be allowed or directed to perform any task requiringthe use of a chemical-resistant protective suit when conditions such astemperature, humidity and length of time required to complete the taskmight be expected to cause heat prostration or other heat-induced illness.(3) A clean place away from pesticide storage and pesticide use areas shallbe provided where workers may put on PPE at the start of any exposure period,store any personal clothing not in use, and change out of PPE at the endof any exposure period. Soap, towels, and a sufficient amount of potablewater for workers to wash after removing PPE shall be available at theend of any exposure period. (4) When not in use, PPE shall be stored away from pesticide-contaminatedareas and separately from personal clothing. (5) No worker shall be allowed or directed to wear home or take home pesticide-contaminatedPPE. (c) <T3>Cleaning and maintenance. </T3>(1) All PPE shall be thoroughly washedwith detergent and hot water, or cleaned according to manufacturer's instructions,after any day on which it is used and before it may be reused. All PPEshall be thoroughly dried before being stored or shall be put in a wellventilated place to dry. (2) Any person responsible for cleaning the PPE shall be informed thatsuch equipment may be contaminated with pesticides and that it should bekept and washed separately from any other clothing or laundry. (3) Any PPE that cannot be properly cleaned shall be disposed of in accordancewith any applicable Federal, State, and local regulations. Any nonchemical-resistantprotective suit which becomes drenched or heavily contaminated with anundiluted pesticide which has the signal word DANGER or WARNING on thelabel shall always be disposed of rather than being used. (4) Respirator filter pads, cartridges, and canisters shall be replacedat least as often as recommended by the manufacturer. (5) Before each day's use, all PPE shall be inspected for leaks, holes,tears, or worn places and any damaged equipment shall be repaired or discarded.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.18</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Decontamination. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirement. </T3>Water for washing off pesticides and pesticide residuesshall be made available to each worker. (b) <T3>General conditions. </T3>(1) The water shall be potable. (2) The water shall be at a temperature that will not injure the eyes.(3) If the water is stored in a tank, the water shall not also be usedfor mixing of pesticides, unless the tank is equipped with properly functioningvalves or other mechanisms which prevent movement of pesticides into thetank. (4) The water shall be reasonably accessible from each worker's place ofwork.(5) The water shall not be located within a reentry-restricted area. (6) The water shall be made available in adequate supply for routine washingof hands and face by workers as well as for emergency whole-body decontamination.(7) Soap and single-use towels, in quantities sufficient to meet workers'needs, and a clean change of clothing, such as coveralls, shall be availableat each decontamination water location. (c) <T3>Emergency eye flushing. </T3>An eye flush dispenser containing at leastone pint of water shall be made available to each worker who is requiredby the pesticide labeling to wear goggles or a face shield for the activitybeing performed. The dispenser shall be either carried by the worker, locatedon the vehicle which the worker is using, or otherwise immediately accessible.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cholinesterase monitoring. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirement. </T3>Any worker who handles, for compensation on propertynot owned or rented by him or his employer, any pesticide product withthe signal word ``DANGER'' or ``WARNING'' on the label containing any organophosphateactive ingredient, on each of 3 consecutive days, or on any 6 days in a21-day period, shall be monitored for cholinesterase inhibition. (b) <T3>Employer duties. </T3>The employer of any commercial pesticide handlercovered under paragraph (a) of this section shall: (1) Engage the services of a licensed physician to supervise the cholinesterasemonitoring of the handler. The agreement shall provide that the physician:(i) Use the guidelines for cholinesterase monitoring provided by the Agencyor other equivalent guidelines; (ii) Advise the employer when changes to work practices may be warranteddue to decreased cholinesterase levels; (iii) Advise the employer when the handler should be removed from furtherexposure due to significantly decreased cholinesterase levels; and (iv) Advise the employer when cholinesterase levels have regenerated toa level permitting return to exposure. (2) Follow all recommendations of the physician concerning matters of cholinesterasemonitoring, including frequency of testing and removal from exposure. (3) Inform the handler that changes to work practices or removal from exposuredue to excessive cholinesterase inhibition has been recommended by thephysician, upon any such recommendation by the physician to the employer.(c) <T3>Recordkeeping. </T3>The employer of any commercial pesticide handler,whether or not such handler is covered under paragraph (a) of this section,shall maintain a record for at least 2 years, to be made available uponrequest to State and Federal enforcement officials, of: (1) All handling activities involving pesticide products with the signalword DANGER or WARNING on the label containing any organophosphate activeingredient, including date of handling and name of the pesticide producthandled, for all handlers in his employ; and (2) Any agreement made pursuant to paragraph (b)(1) of this section. (d) <T3>State requirements. </T3>A State shall have the authority to modifythe requirements of this section so long as cholinesterase monitoring ofcommercial pesticide handlers is required under conditions substantiallyequivalent to those described in this section. (e) <T3>Guidelines. </T3>The Agency will develop and furnish on request toany individual, organization or State, guidelines for cholinesterase monitoringwhich will cover as a minimum: appropriate test methods, baseline testing,frequency of testing after exposure begins, and decreases in plasma andred blood cell levels for which work practices should be investigated andthose for which medical removal of a worker from exposure should be made.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under Control Number2070-A326)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart C_Common Standards for Workers on or in Farms, Forests, Nurseriesand Greenhouses</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability. </ITAG>This subpart applies to, and contains standards to protect all workersfrom, pesticides used on or in farms, forests, nurseries and greenhouses.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.32</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General pesticide safety information. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirement. </T3>The general pesticide safety information specifiedin paragraph (f) of this section shall be displayed in a prominent locationon or in each farm, forest, nursery or greenhouse during the growing season.(b) <T3>Access. </T3>Each worker shall be informed of the location of the informationand allowed reasonable access to it. (c) <T3>Language. </T3>All information displayed shall be in English. If anyworker cannot read English but can read another language, then a translationinto that language shall be displayed, either of each item of informationor else of the words ``THIS INFORMATION IS ABOUT PESTICIDES AND YOUR HEALTH.IF YOU DO NOT UNDERSTAND THE INFORMATION, HAVE SOMEONE EXPLAIN IT TO YOU''.(d) <T3>Legibility. </T3>The information shall be displayed in such a mannerthat it remains legible for the duration of use. (e) <T3>Updating. </T3>Each worker shall promptly be informed of any changeto the information.(f) <T3>Content</T3>. The information shall include:(1) The name, address and telephone number of the nearest physician's office,clinic, or hospital that is equipped to provide emergency medical carein case of a pesticide-related poisoning or injury.(2) A facsimile of the pesticide warning sign used for posting on the propertyand where the warning signs will be placed.(3) The following statements concerning pesticide hazards, recommendedsafety practices, and duties of persons covered under this part:(i) Some pesticides can cause death, injury, or disease.(ii) Some pesticides that get on the skin can cause rashes or sores, andsome pesticides that get in the eyes can cause eye injury or irritation.(iii) Pesticides may enter the body through the mouth, skin, eyes, andlungs.(iv) Pesticides may remain on surfaces, such as crops or soil, even thoughthey cannot be seen or tasted.(v) By taking steps to avoid or reduce exposure, you can help protect yourselffrom pesticide injury.(vi) If you may have pesticides on your hands or face, you should washbefore eating, drinking, using the toilet, or using gum or tobacco.(vii) You should wash thoroughly and change into clean clothing at theend of each workday if you may have come into contact with pesticides.(viii) Pesticides can accumulate on work clothing, so clothing worn ona workday involving contact with pesticides should be washed separatelyfrom other clothing before being worn again.(ix) You should not pick, eat, or take home plants or food, without thesupervisor's permission, because the food may be unsafe because of pesticides.(x) You should not take home empty pesticide containers because they arenot for home use and could injure you or your family.(xi) Whether pesticides are applied in irrigation or watering systems onthe property, and (if so) the kind of system used, that the worker shouldnot drink, touch, or use water associated with the system, and that theworker should not enter these areas except at the direction of the supervisor.(xii) Unless you are directed by a supervisor, you should not enter anyarea that has been treated with a pesticide if the pesticide sprays havenot dried, the dusts have not settled, or the vapors have not dispersed,or if a reentry interval is in effect, or if a warning sign is posted.(xiii) If you are accidentally sprayed directly or through drift, you shouldwash immediately in the nearest available water and then as soon as possibleshower, shampoo and change into clean clothing.(xiv) You should promptly seek medical attention and inform the supervisor,if you notice signs or symptoms of pesticide poisoning or pesticide injury.(xv) The following information about pesticide applications will be providedto you upon request: location of the treated area, date or time of application,reentry interval, product name, registration number and active ingredients.(xvi) Federal law establishes other safety rules for protecting workersfrom pesticide hazards, and requires workers, supervisors, employers, andowners to comply with those rules.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.34 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Emergency duties.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Duty to provide transportation to emergency medical care</T3>. Whenthere is reason to believe that a worker has been poisoned or injured bya pesticide, or when an exposure to a pesticide has occurred that mightbe expected to lead to the poisoning or injury of any worker, prompt transportationto an appropriate medical facility shall be provided to the worker.(b) <T3>Duty to provide emergency information</T3>. Upon request, the followinginformation shall be provided if available to any worker or treating medicalpersonnel who have grounds to suspect that a worker has been poisoned orinjured by a pesticide:(1) The product name, EPA registration number, and active ingredient(s)of the pesticide.(2) Antidote or first aid information.(3) Information about the circumstances of application or use of the pesticideon the property, or about the exposure of the worker to the pesticide.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.36 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Precautions during application of pesticides.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Presence of workers</T3>. No worker shall be allowed or directed toenter or remain in an area during application of any pesticide to thatarea, unless the worker is a handler involved in the application of thepesticide.(b) <T3>Contact with workers</T3>. No pesticide shall be applied so as to contactany worker directly or through drift. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.38 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Decontamination.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirement</T3>. Water for washing off pesticides and pesticide residuesshall be provided for any worker during any task which causes the workerto come into contact with any surface that has been treated with a pesticideduring the agricultural production cycle in which the task occurs. (b) <T3>General conditions</T3>. (1) The water shall be potable. (2) The water shall be at a temperature that will not injure the eyes.(3) If the water is stored in a tank, the water shall not also be usedfor mixing of pesticides, unless the tank is equipped with properly functioningvalves or other mechanisms which prevent movement of pesticides into thetank.(4) The water shall be reasonably accessible from each worker's place ofwork.(5) The water shall not be located within a reentry-restricted area.(6) The water shall be made available in adequate supply for routine washingof hands and face by workers.(7) Soap and single-use towels shall be available at each water location,in quantities sufficient to meet workers' needs.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart D_Special Standards for Workers on Farms and in Forests</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.40 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability.</ITAG>This subpart applies to, and contains standards to protect all workersfrom, pesticides used on farms and in forests.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.42 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Information about pesticide applications.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirement and exception_</T3>(1) <T3>Requirement. </T3>Information about the application of any pesticideto an area of a farm or forest shall be provided orally to each workerin accordance with paragraph (b) of this section and upon request in accordancewith paragraph (c) of this section.(2) <T3>Exception. </T3>Information need not be provided to a worker if, fromthe start of application until the end of the reentry interval, the workerwill not enter, work in, remain in, or pass through, on foot or in an openvehicle, the pesticide-treated area or any neighboring areas, includinggrowing areas and labor camps that are contiguous or separated only bya roadway from the treated area.(b) <T3>Information to be provided orally. </T3>Whenever required by paragraph(a) of this section, information about the application of a pesticide shallbe provided orally to each worker, in a language the worker can understand.The information shall be provided to each worker on the day of applicationat the beginning of the work day, and on each subsequent day that any reentryinterval for that application is in effect. The information shall include:(1) The specific location and description of the pesticide-treated areaor area to be treated.(2) The period of the work day during which workers may not enter withoutdirection.(c) <T3>Information to be provided upon request. </T3>Whenever required byparagraph (a) of this section, any of the following information about theapplication of a pesticide shall be provided to any worker if requestedduring the period beginning with the day of application and ending withthe expiration of the reentry interval:(1) The specific location and description of the pesticide-treated area.(2) The product name, EPA registration number and active ingredient(s)of the pesticide.(3) The time or date the pesticide was applied (or the scheduled time ordate of application).(4) The reentry interval for the pesticide.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.44 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Posting.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirement and exception_</T3>(1) <T3>Requirement. </T3>If a pesticide having a reentry interval of greaterthan 48 hours is applied to an area of a farm or forest, the pesticide-treatedarea shall be posted with warning signs in accordance with paragraph (b)of this section.(2) <T3>Exception. </T3>Posting is not required if, from the start of applicationuntil the end of the reentry interval, no worker (other than a pesticidehandler applying the pesticide) will enter, work in, remain in, or passthrough, on foot or in an open vehicle, the pesticide-treated area or anyneighboring areas, including growing areas and labor camps that are contiguousor separated only by a roadway from the treated area.(b) <T3>Warning signs. </T3>The posting of warning signs shall be in accordancewith the following criteria:(1) The warning signs shall contain the words ``DANGER'' and ``PESTICIDES''at the top and ``KEEP OUT'' at the bottom. Near the center of the signshall be a circle containing an upraised hand on the left and a stern faceon the right. Letters for all the words shall be red and at least 2\1/2\inches high and clearly legible. The background outside the circle shallbe white. The hand and a large portion of the face shall be white. Thelength of the hand shall be at least twice the height of the letters andthe length of the face shall be only slightly smaller than the hand. Theremainder of the inside of the circle shall be red. A small black-and-whitefacsimile of a warning sign meeting these requirements follows.<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M 001</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert Illustration(s) 2-1643</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-C </ITAG>(2) The signs shall be visible from all usual points of worker entry tothe pesticide-treated area, including each access road, each border withany labor camp adjacent to the pesticide-treated area, and each footpathand other walking route that enters the pesticide-treated area. When thereare no usual points of worker entry, signs shall be posted in the cornersof the pesticide-treated area or in any other location affording maximumvisibility.(3) The signs shall:(i) Be posted no sooner than 24 hours before the scheduled applicationof the pesticide.(ii) Remain posted during application and throughout the reentry interval.(iii) Be removed within 3 days after the expiration of the reentry intervaland before worker reentry is permitted, other than reentry authorized byandSection; 170.46.(4) The signs shall remain legible for the duration of use.(5) When several contiguous areas are to be treated with pesticides ona rotating or sequential basis, the entire area may be posted. Worker reentry,other than reentry authorized by andSection; 170.46, is prohibited for theentire area while the signs are posted.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.46 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reentry.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General restriction and exceptions.</T3> No worker shall be allowedor directed to enter or remain in a pesticide-treated area before the reentryinterval specified on the pesticide labeling has expired unless either:(1) The worker will have no contact with pesticide residues on treatedsurfaces or in soil, water or air; for example:(i) Before sprays and dusts have settled and vapors have dispersed, theworker is operating in a closed vehicle with a positive pressure filtrationsystem;(ii) After sprays and dusts have settled and vapors have dispersed,(A) The worker is performing activities that do not involve contact withsoil subsurface, following a soil incorporated pesticide application,(B) The worker is wearing chemical resistant shoes, shoe coverings or bootsand is performing activities that do not involve hand contact with thesoil, planting media or plant, following a soil-directed or basal-directedapplication,(C) The worker is operating in an open vehicle such as a tractor, the cropis not tall and dense (would not brush against the worker) and the workeris not in a position where trees and other plants could drop pesticideresidues on the worker; or(2) The following requirements for early reentry workers are met:(i) Personal protective equipment specified on the pesticide labeling isworn.(ii) Duties related to personal protective equipment specified in andSection;170.16 are met.(iii) Decontamination provisions specified in andSection; 170.18 are available.(iv) Training specified in andSection; 170.12(b) is given.(v) Any other requirement regarding early reentry specified on the pesticidelabeling is met.(b) <T3>Prohibited activities.</T3> No worker may enter a pesticide-treatedarea to perform any hand labor task until all sprays have dried, dustshave settled, or vapors have dispersed.(c) <T3>Multiple reentry intervals.</T3> When two or more pesticides are appliedat the same time, the reentry interval shall be the longest of the applicableintervals. When a pesticide has a reentry interval in addition to the ``sprayshave dried'' interval, both shall be observed.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Special Standards for Workers in Nurseries</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability.</ITAG>This subpart applies to, and contains standards to protect all workersfrom, pesticides used in nurseries.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.52 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Information about pesticide applications.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirement.</T3> The following information about the application ofany pesticide to an area of a nursery shall be provided to any worker ifrequested during the period beginning with the day of application and endingwith the expiration of the reentry interval:(1) The specific location and description of the reentry-restricted area.(2) The product name, EPA registration number and active ingredient(s)of the pesticide.(3) The time or date the pesticide was applied (or the scheduled time ordate of application).(4) The reentry interval for the pesticide.(b) <T3>Exception.</T3> Information need not be provided to a worker if, fromthe start of application until the end of the reentry interval, the workerwill not enter, work in, remain in, or pass through, on foot or in an openvehicle, the treated area or any neighboring areas, including growing areasand labor camps that are contiguous or separated only by a roadway fromthe treated area.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.54 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Posting.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirement.</T3> If a pesticide is applied to an area of a nursery,the reentry-restricted area shall be posted with warning signs in accordancewith andSection; 170.64(b). A sign must be of the appropriate size and beplaced in a suitable location to meet the requirement of andSection; 170.64(b)(2)for each type of nursery growing area, e.g., benches, pots on the groundand fields of plants growing in the ground.(b) <T3>Exception.</T3> Posting is not required if, from the start of applicationuntil the end of the reentry interval, no worker (other than a pesticidehandler applying the pesticide) will enter, work in, remain in, or passthrough, on foot or in an open vehicle, the reentry-restricted area orany neighboring areas, including growing areas and labor camps that arecontiguous or separated only by a roadway from the treated area.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.56 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reentry.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General restriction and exceptions.</T3> No worker shall be allowedor directed to enter or remain in a reentry-restricted area before thereentry interval specified in paragraph (b) of this section has expired,unless:(1) The worker will have no contact with pesticide residues on treatedsurfaces or in soil, water, or air; or(2) The following requirements for early reentry workers are met:(i) Personal protective equipment specified on the pesticide labeling forearly reentry activities is worn.(ii) Duties related to personal protective equipment specified in andSection;170.16 are met.(iii) Decontamination provisions specified in andSection; 170.18 are available.(iv) Training specified in andSection; 170.12(b) is given.(v) Any other requirement regarding early reentry specified on the pesticidelabeling is met.(b) <T3>Reentry-restricted areas and intervals_</T3>(1) <T3>Soil-directed applications.</T3> For any pesticide applied from a maximumheight of 12 inches from the soil, either using a dry formulation or usingcoarse spray droplets and pressure less than 40 p.s.i., the reentry-restrictedarea shall be the pesticide-treated area until the reentry interval specifiedon the product labeling has expired. However, if the labeling of the pesticiderequires the use of a respirator during application, the reentry-restrictedarea shall be as defined in paragraph (b)(2) of this section.(2) <T3>Downward-directed applications.</T3> When any pesticide is appliedfrom a height of greater than 12 inches from the soil, applied using finespray droplets, or applied using pressure greater than 40 p.s.i. but lessthan 150 p.s.i., and is directed downward, not including aerial applications,the reentry-restricted area shall be an area extending at least 25 feetbeyond the perimeter on the downwind side of the pesticide-treated areaand at least 10 feet beyond the perimeter of the pesticide-treated areain all other directions until sprays or dusts have settled. After spraysor dusts have settled and until the reentry interval specified on the pesticidelabeling has expired, the reentry-restricted area shall be the pesticide-treatedarea.(3) <T3>Other applications.</T3> For any pesticide applied aerially, directedupwards, or applied using pressure greater than 150 p.s.i., the reentry-restrictedarea shall be the pesticide-treated area and any moistened or dusted areasoutside the pesticide-treated area, until spray or dusts have settled.After spray or dusts have settled and until the reentry interval specifiedon the pesticide labeling has expired, the reentry-restricted area shallbe the pesticide-treated area.(c) <T3>Prohibited activities.</T3> No worker may enter a reentry-restrictedarea to perform any hand labor task until all sprays have dried, dustshave settled, or vapors have dispersed.(d) <T3>Multiple reentry intervals.</T3> When two or more pesticides are appliedat the same time, the reentry interval shall be the longest of the applicableintervals. When a pesticide has a reentry interval in addition to the ``sprayshave dried'' interval, both shall be observed.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_Special Standards for Workers in Greenhouses</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.60 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability.</ITAG>This subpart applies to, and contains standards to protect all workersfrom, pesticides used in greenhouses.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.62 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Information about pesticide applications.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirement.</T3> The following information about the application ofany pesticide to an area of a greenhouse shall be provided to any workerif requested during the period beginning with the day of application andending with the expiration of the reentry interval:(1) The specific location and description of the reentry-restricted area.(2) The product name, EPA registration number and active ingredient(s)of the pesticide.(3) The time or date the pesticide was applied (or the scheduled time ordate of application).(4) The reentry interval for the pesticide.(b) <T3>Exception.</T3> Information need not be provided to a worker if, fromthe start of the application until the end of the reentry interval, theworker will not enter, work in, remain in, or pass through the greenhouse.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.64 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Posting.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirement and exception</T3>_(1) <T3>Requirement.</T3> If a pesticide is applied in a greenhouse, the reentry-restrictedarea shall be posted with warning signs in accordance with paragraph (b)of this section.(2) <T3>Exception.</T3> Posting is not required if, from the start of applicationuntil the end of the reentry interval, no worker (other than a pesticidehandler applying the pesticide) will enter, work in, remain in, or passthrough the greenhouse.(b) <T3>Warning signs. </T3>The posting of warning signs shall be in accordancewith the following criteria:(1) The warning signs shall contain the words ``DANGER'' and ``PESTICIDES''at the top and ``KEEP OUT'' at the bottom. Near the center of the signshall be a circle containing the upraised hand on the left and a sternface on the right. Letters for all the words shall be red and legible.The background outside the circle shall be white. The hand and a largeportion of the face shall be white. The remainder of the inside of thecircle shall be red. The length of the hand shall be at least twice theheight of the letters and the length of the face shall be only slightlysmaller than the hand. A black-and-white facsimile of a warning sign meetingthese requirements is provided in andSection; 170.44.(2) The warning signs shall be visible from all points of access to thereentry-restricted area.(3) The warning signs shall:(i) Be posted immediately before the application of the pesticide.(ii) Remain posted during application and throughout the reentry interval.(iii) Be removed within 1 day after the expiration of the reentry intervaland before worker reentry other than reentry authorized by andSection; 170.66is permitted.(4) The warning signs shall remain legible for the duration of use.(5) When several contiguous areas are to be treated with pesticides ona rotating or sequential basis, the entire areas may be posted. Workerreentry other than reentry authorized by andSection; 170.66 is prohibitedfrom the entire area while the signs are posted.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.66</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reentry.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General restrictions and exceptions. </T3>No worker shall be allowedor directed to enter or remain in a reentry-restricted area before thereentry interval specified in paragraph (b) of this section has expired,unless:(1) The worker will have no contact with pesticide residues on treatedsurfaces or in soil, water, or air; or (2) The following requirements for early reentry workers are met:(i) Personal protective equipment specified on the pesticide labeling forearly reentry activities is worn.(ii) Duties related to personal protective equipment specified in andSection;170.16 are met.(iii) Decontamination provisions specified in andSection; 170.18 are available.(iv) Training specified in andSection; 170.12(b) is given.(v) Any other requirement regarding early reentry specified on the pesticidelabeling is met.(b) <T3>Reentry-restricted areas and intervals_(1) </T3><T3>Fumigant applications. </T3>For any pesticide identified on the pesticidelabeling as a fumigant, the reentry-restricted areas shall be the entirenonporous enclosed area within which the pesticide is applied. The reentryinterval shall extend until all vapors have dispersed, as defined by oneof the following criteria:(i) Two hours of ventilation using fans or other mechanical ventilationsystems.(ii) Four hours of ventilation using vents, windows, or other passive ventilationsystems.(iii) Eleven hours with no ventilation, followed by 1 hour of mechanicalventilation.(iv) Eleven hours with no ventilation, followed by 2 hours of passive ventilation.(v) Twenty-four hours with no ventilation.(vi) The air concentration of the fumigant is measured to be less thanor equal to the permissible exposure level specified on the product labeling.(2) <T3>Smoke, mist, fog and aerosol applications. </T3>For any pesticide appliedin the form of a smoke, mist, fog, or aerosol, the reentry-restricted areashall be the entire nonporous enclosed areas within which the pesticideis applied until the reentry interval specified on the pesticide labelinghas expired.(3) <T3>Soil-directed applications.</T3> For any pesticide applied from a maximumheight of 12 inches from the soil, either using a dry formulation or usingcoarse spray droplets and pressure less than 40 p.s.i., not including fumigant,smoke, mist, fog or aerosol applications, the reentry-restricted area shallbe the pesticide-treated area until the reentry interval specified on theproduct labeling has expired. However, if the labeling of the pesticiderequires the use of a respirator during application, the reentry-restrictedareas shall be as defined in paragraph (b)(4) of this section.(4) <T3>Plant-directed applications. </T3>For any pesticide applied from theheight of more than 12 inches from the soil, applied using fine spray dropletsor applied using pressure greater than 40 p.s.i., not including fumigant,smoke, mist, fog or aerosol applications, and ventilation occurs duringapplication or before sprays and dusts have settled, the reentry-restrictedarea shall be the entire nonporous enclosed areas within which the pesticideis applied until sprays and dusts have settled. However, if no ventilationoccurs during this period, the reentry-restricted area shall include anarea within the greenhouse extending 25 feet beyond the perimeter of thepesticide-treated area. After sprays and dusts have settled, the reentry-restrictedarea shall be the pesticide-treated area until any reentry interval specifiedon the pesticide labeling has expired.(c) <T3>Prohibited activities. </T3>No worker may enter a reentry-restrictedarea to perform any hand labor task until all sprays have dried, dustshave settled, or vapors have dispersed.(d) <T3>Multiple reentry intervals.</T3> When two or more pesticides are appliedat the same time, the reentry interval shall be the longest of the applicableintervals. When a pesticide has a reentry interval in addition to the ``sprayshave dried'' interval, both shall be observed.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-15416 Filed 7-7-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>